A 2
CHAPTER I.
Rural Scenes and rural Manners.
Somewhere
about the time of the old French
war, there resided on the rich border that skirts the
Hudson, not a hundred miles from the good city of
Albany, a family of some distinction, which we shall
call Vancour, consisting of three brothers whose names
were Egbert, Dennis, and Ariel, or Auriel as it was
pronounced by the Dutch of that day. They were
the sons of one of the earliest as well as most
respectable
of the emigrants from Holland, and
honourably
sustained the dignity of their ancestry, by
sturdy integrity, liberal hospitality, and a generous
public spirit.
On the death of the old patriarch, who departed
this life almost a century old, according to the
custom
of those early times, the estate was amicably
divided among his three sons; the portion of the eldest
being alone distinguished from that of the others by
comprising the old mansion-house. This was the
sole compliment paid to the right of primogeniture,
which in almost every other Christian country
swallows
up the inheritance of the younger offspring, and
enables one man to wallow in overgrown luxury, at
the expense of all the rest of his blood and name.
This concession was rather a voluntary
acknowledgment
of the younger, than claimed by the elder
brother. Neither at this early period of our infancy
was it the general custom for people that had
children
to make their wills; and however singular it
may seem, there were fewer lawsuits concerning the
division of property among heirs, than there is now,
when such particular care is taken in the devising of
estates, that it generally takes three or four courts,
six or eight lawyers, and the like number of years
to interpret the oracle. And how can it be
otherwise
,
since I once heard a great pleader affirm, that
there never were three words put together, in any
language, that would not admit of three different
interpretations
.
Here, however, there was no
necessity
for the interference of strangers; the children
knew the wishes of their parents, and for the most
part complied without a murmur.
The settlement of Mr. Vancour's affairs was
actually
made without consulting a lawyer; partly,
perhaps
,
for the reason that there was no person of that
description within less than one hundred and sixty
miles, at New-York. According to Pliny, Rome
subsisted five hundred years without a physician;
which fact, however incredible it may appear, is
equalled by the miracle of the city of Albany and
the surrounding country having flourished for the
best part of a century without the aid of a single
lawyer. People can no more go to law without
lawyers
,
than to war without arms; deprive them of
both, and there would be no more occasion for peace
societies. But to return.
Among the many good old fashions that prevailed
in the days of ignorance and simplicity among our
forefathers, was that of paying their debts themselves,
instead of leaving it to their posterity. They knew
little or nothing of the virtues of the
post obit;
nor, I
believe, did it ever happen to occur to them, that it
was a capital speculation to revel in luxuries and
support a splendid establishment during life, leaving
the penalty to be paid by their offspring. When old
Mr. Vancour died, he paid the only debt he owed
the debt of nature.
In the division of the estate, Egbert, the elder
brother
,
received the third part, which occupied the
centre
,
with the old mansion-house; Dennis, that on the
right, and Ariel, that on the left-hand. Each of these
occupied the space which lay between a range of
hills and the banks of the Hudson, on which they
bordered about two miles equally. With a view to
this arrangement, Mr. Vancour had erected, at
different
times, a comfortable mansion on either of the
extremities of his estate; so that the two younger
brothers were saved the expense of building.
At the period in which our history commences, the
old gentleman had been dead many years, and Ariel,
the youngest of the three brothers, was fast verging
towards that stage of life in which a man runs
imminent
risk of being set down as an old bachelor by
the young ladies. Dennis, the second brother, was
a widower without issue; and Egbert was blessed
with a most notable wife, the mother of an only
daughter
verging towards womanhood, and finishing her
education at a boarding-school in New-York. The
house occupied by Mr. Vancour was built when it
was customary for men to anticipate the possibility
of their descendants', some one of them at least,
inheriting
and dwelling in their old nestling places. It
was a large four square mansion of two low stories,
built of little yellow Dutch bricks, imported from
Holland, as much from veneration for the
Faderland
,
as from a certain unconsciousness of the
capacity to do any thing out of the ordinary way, that
long beset and still in some degree besets the
occupants
of this western world. Right through the
centre
ran a wide and stately hall, wainscotted with
oak; from the farther end of which a broad
staircase
rose in such a gentle ascent as to be almost as
easy as a railway. This staircase was defended
on the outerside by a row of chubby mahogany
banisters
,
ranged so as almost to touch each other, and
presenting in their plump exuberance fit models for
the legs of all the gallant burghers of the country
round. We know not whether it was in sympathy
with these classical patterns, or from some other more
occult influence, but certain it is, there hath not, since
the fashion of them changed, been seen so goodly a
set of legs, not even in the picture of the
Declaration
of our Independence, as was exhibited every
Sabbath-day in summer-time, in woollen hose, at
the little eight-square stone church of the Flats, at
the time of which we are treating.
The furniture of the mansion corresponded with
its Doric dignity and simplicity. There was nothing
too fine for use, or which was not used whenever
occasion
required; although we are willing to confess,
there was one hallowed room, dignified with the
name of the spare room, which was difficult of
access
,
and into which no one intruded except on very
particular occasions. Here was the sacred deposite
of ancestral heirlooms. Chairs with high and haughty
backs and worked satin bottoms, from the old
country
;
a Brussels carpet; two vast china jars, on either
side of the chimney, nearly five feet high; and the
treasure of all treasures, a Dutch cabinet, exactly such
A 3
a one as is now to be seen at Hampton court, left there
by King William, so exuberantly and yet so tastefully
and richly ornamented with brass hinges and a lock
covering almost half its front, that when properly
rubbed, as it was every day, it was dazzling to
behold
.
The brass had a silvery whiteness, a delicate
lustre, such as is never exhibited by the bastard
imitation
of these degenerate days. But the most
valued
and valuable part of the embellishments, were a
number of fine pictures of the Flemish school, which
the elder Mr. Vancour had brought with him from
Holland, and which have since been lost by the
burning
of the mansion of one of his later descendants.
The house stood about a quarter of a mile from
the river, in the midst of a rich meadow, dotted here
and there with a vast primeval elm, standing like a
wide umbrella, under which the lazy herds lay
ruminating
free from the midday sun. Four of these
surrounded
and almost hid the mansion, all but its front,
and furnished retreats for a host of twittering birds.
Within a hundred yards on one side ran a brook,
which descended from the hills about a mile in the
rear, and which in the course of ages had made a
deep ravine, skirted on either side with a wilderness
of various woods, and plants, and briers, and wild
flowers, and vines of every sort, where was, in the
genial season, a perpetual concert of nature's
nevertiring
and never-tired songsters. This copse was
wide enough to shelter an invisible road, the only
passage to and from the home; so that all around it
was nothing but one fair carpet of delicious green,
unbroken by road or pathway.
The river in front slept between its verdant banks,
for its course was so slow, so quiet, so almost
imperceptible
,
that it seemed to partake in that repose which
it diffused all around. Besides the elms and
sycamores
which the rich alluvion fostered into majestic
exuberance, its borders were fringed at intervals with
silvery willows drinking its pure moisture, and other
dwarfish fry, from whose branches hung grape
vines and vines of various other names, forming
canopies
,
through which the pattering shower could
scarcely win its way. The stream was about a
quarter of a mile wide, so that every rural sight and
rural sound could be clearly distinguished from side
to side; and at the extremity of the rich meadows on
the opposite shore, there rose a bold precipice of
gray-beard rocks, enamelled with light green mosses,
and bearing on its summit a crown of towering pines
of everlasting verdure.
There is certainly in the majesty of nature, its
hoary rocks, its silent shadowy glens, foaming
torrents
,
and lofty mountains, something that awakens
the soul to high contemplation and rouses its
slumbering
energies. But there is in her gentler beauties,
her rich and laughing meadows enamelled with
flowers
,
and joyous with sprightly birds, her waving fields
of grain, her noiseless glassy streams, a charm not less
delightful and far more lasting than the high wrought
enthusiasm of the other. Both have, without doubt,
their influence on the human character. He who
dwells in the rude regions of the mountain solitude
will generally prefer dangerous and fatiguing
enterprise
to easy and wholesome labours. He would
rather risk his safety for a meal, or go without it
entirely, than earn it by the sweat of his brow in the
cultivation of the earth. But the inhabitant of the
rich plain, that pours from its generous bosom an
ample
reward for every hour of labour he bestows,
is enamoured of security; he hates all changes
but those of the revolving seasons; is seldom
buffeted
by extremes of passion, never elevated to
enthusiasm
,
or depressed to despair. If let alone, his
life will probably glide away as noiselessly, if not as
pure, as the gentle stream that winds its way unheard
through his lowland domain. It has been said a
thousand
times, that the inhabitants of mountains are
more attached to their homes than those of the
lowlands
;
but I doubt the truth of the observation.
Take any man away from his home and his
accustomed
routine of life, and he will sigh to return to
them, the native of the plain, as well as the sojourner
among the hills. The former we doubt would be
as wretched among the rocks and torrents, the wild
beasts, and hunters equally wild, as the latter in the
laborious quiet of the fruitful valleys.
However this may be, the brothers to whom the
reader has just been introduced, partook in a great
degree of the character of the scene of their birth and
of their inheritance, but modified in some particulars
by certain peculiarities in their situation. Peaceful
as was the abode they inhabited, and the aspect of all
around them, they were not always reposing in the
lap of security. Within thirty or forty miles, in
almost every direction, roamed various tribes of
Indians
,
whose fierce, unsteady, and revengeful nature
made their friendship as precarious as their enmity
was terrible. True, they were now at peace, or
rather
they had begun to submit to their inevitable
destiny
;
yet still their friendship could not be relied
on, and they not unfrequently approached the
neighbouring
settlements in the dead of the night, where
they committed the most horrible atrocities. This
state of things contributed to keep up a warlike spirit
and habits of dangerous enterprise, among the early
settlers, and they partook of the opposite characters
of husbandman and soldier, in a degree which has
seldom
been known in the inhabitants of the rest of the
world. The Vancours and their neighbours all found
it necessary to mingle the arts of peace and war
together
;
all had their arms at hand, and all knew how
to use them.
The Vancours were people of fashion, as well as
fortune. The elder more especially, from inhabiting
the family mansion, and having a regularly established
household, saw a great deal of company at times
from Albany, New-York, and elsewhere. His house,
indeed, was open to all respectable visiters, and was
seldom without the presence of some stranger, friend,
or relative from a distance. They were received
and treated with that plain, unostentatious, quiet
hospitality
which always bespeaks a welcome.
Madame
Vancour, as she was called by way of eminence,
was a New-York lady, born and bred, partaking
almost equally in the blood of the genuine Hollander,
the Englishman, and the Huguonot. New-York,
being
at that time the residence of the English
governor
,
was of course, the focus of fashion. The
governor
affected somewhat of the kingly state; and there
being always a considerable number of troops in
garrison
,
the place swarmed with red coats, as some of
our eating cellars now do with boiled lobsters. These
ruddy sons of Mars were the prime objects of the
ambition of our city belles, and happy was the
damsel
and proud the mother that could unite their fate
and family with the lieutenant of a company of
British
grenadiers. His excellency, like most other
excellencies
,
had plenty of aids-de-camp to keep up his
state, write his invitations, pick up news, and carve
at his table. These important functions, of course,
entitled them to great distinction among our provincial
belles, and it is on record in the traditions of those
times, that the good matrons of the capital could
never
sleep quietly the night before a ball at the
government-house
,
for thinking whether their daughters
would dance with an aid-de-camp. They
occasionally
demeaned themselves by marrying a provincial
heiress, and many of the largest estates in the
province
,
with a blooming damsel at the back of them,
were exchanged for a red coat and a pair of gorgeous
epaulettes, to the infinite contentment of the mothers,
who partook largely in the dignity of the connexion.
I cannot affirm that the fathers and brothers shared
in these triumphs; for already the fine airs of the
pompous intruders, and their undisguised assumptions
of superiority, had awakened in the bosoms of these
homely provincials a feeling, which, in after-times
mingling with others equally powerful, produced
a revolution, of which the world yet feels, and
will long feel the influence. The Vancours had
many connexions in New-York, among the most
wealthy and fashionable of the inhabitants, and
seldom
missed paying them a visit of a few weeks in
the course of every autumn. They were always well
received, and as the governor never came to Albany,
without partaking in their hospitalities, he thought
himself bound to repay them when they visited the
place of his residence. This intercourse with the
gay world kept up certain feelings and habits, which
seldom fail to accompany it; but still, in the main,
their characters partook largely of the simplicity of
the country where they resided. In manners they
might not be particularly distinguished from the
polite
and well-bred people of the world; but in habits
and modes of thinking they were essentially different.
There was a certain doric simplicity in their mode
of life, which has long since passed away, leaving
behind what I sometimes feel inclined to doubt is
but an inadequate compensation for its loss.
Dennis and Ariel, the two younger brothers, being
the one a lonely widower, the other an equally lonely
bachelor, spent a good deal of their time at the old
mansion, where they were as much at home as at
their own houses. The two elder brothers were
greatly attached to each other, and fond of being
together
in their own quiet way. They sometimes
passed a whole morning without exchanging half a
dozen words. They had a way of communicating
their thoughts by certain little expressive inarticulate
sounds and unobtrusive gestures, which each one
understood
as well as he did his mother tongue. Ariel,
on the contrary, was ungovernably impatient of
idleness
,
and never could sit still fifteen minutes at a
time without falling into a doze. He was a great
hand at grafting and inoculating fruit-trees; an
industrious
seeker after mushrooms; and mighty in all
undertakings which had for their object the
furtherance
of good eating. In truth, he was one of those
persons who are seldom without a project for the
benefit
of their neighbours, and who, though they never
by any chance succeed in their own undertakings, can
always tell to a nicety what will be most for the
advantage
of others. Dennis, on the other hand, had a
horror of all innovation and improvement in rural
economy
;
he despised labour-saving machines from the
bottom of his soul, and held it as incontrovertible, that
the human hand was the most perfect instrument ever
invented. Ariel one year spent the proceeds of a whole
crop in devising inventions for exterminating field
mice; while Egbert secured half of his by labour and
attention. Somehow or other, so it was, that one
grew richer every year, and the other was always in
want of money.
They won't be here to-day, said Dennis, one
morning, after his elder brother and himself had been
sitting with their heads inclined towards each other
about two hours, without exchanging a word.
They won't be here to-day, echoed Egbert, and
there ended the conversation for an hour at least.
I think it will clear up before noon, quoth
Dennis
,
eyeing the clouds as they separated above,
disclosing
a little piece of clear blue sky.
I think it will, responded Egbert, and the
matter
was settled.
The expected arrivals were Colonel Vancour's
wife and daughter, the latter of whom, having finished
her education at the boarding-school, was now on her
way home from New-York with her mother. The
reader will be pleased to recollect that this was long
before the invention of steamboats, and when a
genuine
Albany packet never dreamed of sailing but
with a fair wind, nor scarcely ever passed the
Overslaugh
without paying it the compliment of running
high and dry aground. We ourselves well
remember
,
in long after-times, having once lain there seven
days within seven miles of Albany; yet such
appeared
the immeasurable distance, that no one on
board ever dreamed of leaving the vessel and going
to the city by land. All waited patiently for an
easterly-wind or a heavy rain, to float them off again;
and spent the time pleasantly in eating and smoking.
In truth, there is no greater help to patience than a
pipe of Blaze Moore's tobacco. But the fact is,
people
were neither so much in a hurry, nor was their
time half so precious as it is now. In those days a
man was all his life in making a fortune; at present
he cannot spare so much time, because he has not
only to make, but to spend a fortune before he
dies. It would have been next to an impossibility to
persuade a man to risk a quick passage to the other
world, for the sake of shortening his journey in this.
The daughter, accompanied by her mother and
Tjerck, an old black servant, had been expected more
than a week, every day of which precisely the same
colloquy as that we have just recorded passed
between
the two brothers. We ought to mention, that
Mr. Egbert Vancour was prevented attending the
ladies home by having been appointed a
commissioner
to hold a treaty with the Five Nations at
Schenectady
.
The past week had been one of almost
continual rain, and the three brothers each began to
manifest impatience in his own way. The two elder
by frequent emigrations from the chimney corner to the
window; and the younger by marching out every five
minutes, in the intervals between his naps, squaring
himself with his thick short legs wide apart, and
reconnoitring
the weathercock, which, I ought to
mention
,
was an iron shad, through whose sides were cut
the letters D. V., in honour of the family.
At length, towards evening the yellow sun broke
through the opening western clouds, most gorgeously
gilding the weeping landscape, and turning the cold
drops of rain which had condensed on the grass and
waving branches of the trees to sparkling diamonds
bright. A brisk yet mellow south wind sprung up,
and a fleet of sloops with snow white sails appeared
below, ploughing their merry way up the river. All
turned out to see if they could distinguish the
Patroon
,
the vessel in which the ladies had taken
passage
.
The indefatigable Ariel was down at the
wharf, in front of the mansion-house, making a
prodigious
noise, and calling out to every vessel that passed
to know if the Patroon was coming, every now and
then clearing his throat, as was his custom, with
a-hem! that at length startled a flock of black ducks,
which had maintained its station in a little
neighbouring
cove for several days past. Sloop after sloop
passed on, without stopping, until Ariel got out of all
patience; he stamped about from one side of the wharf
to the other; the Patroon was the worst of all
vessels
,
and the captain the most lazy, slow motioned,
stupid of all blockheads.
I knew it; dn him, I knew it. I'll bet my
life he is high and dry on the Overslaugh.No! hey!
no: dn it, there she comesthere she is at
last; and he darted across the wharf towards her
with such enthusiasm, that he broke his shins against
a post; whereat he gave the Patroon and her
captain
another broadside, not forgetting the post.
Ariel was not mistaken: it was the Patroon, and
in a few minutes, Madame Vancour and her
daughter
Catalina were welcomed once more at the
fireside
of their best friends, with a quiet speechless
warmth which nature dictated and nature understood.
All but Ariel spoke through their eyes; but it was the
characteristic of that worthy bachelor, to make a
noise on all occasions of merriment or sadness; the
more he felt, the more noise he made, and this
propensity
followed him even in his sleep; he being a
most sonorous and indefatigable snorer, in all its
varieties
.
He paraded round the young woman, crying,
A-hem! bless me, how you have grown; a-hem!
zounds, I should'nt have known you; why, ahem!
dn it you're almost as tall as I am! And then he
measured his little square stumpy figure with that of
the tall graceful girl. Finally, having exhausted all
his waking noises, he placed himself in an arm chair
and fell into a sleep, from which he was only roused by
the music of setting the supper-table, which above all
others was most agreeable to his ear. Hey!
dn it, what have you got for supperhey! and
he marched round, taking special cognizance of the
ample board.
But where is Sybrandt? asked Madame
Vancour
,
I expected, to be sure, he would be here to
welcome us home.
Oh, that's true, Dennis, said Egbert, what has
become of the boy?
I can't tell.
Ariel broke into one of his inspiring laughs, I
can, said he; the poor fellow sneaked away home,
as soon as he knew the Patroon was in sight.
Egbert shrugged his shoulders; Dennis twisted a
piece of celery with such a petulant jirk, that he
overturned
the whole arrangement of the dish, the pride
of Dame Phillis, presiding goddess of the kitchen.
Ariel cried, A-hem! like a stentor, and madame
and her daughter exchanged significant looks, and
smiled. Sybrandt appeared not that night, and
nothing
more was said on the subject.
As this young gentleman is destined to make some
figure in our story, we will take this opportunity to
introduce him more particularly to the reader's notice.
CHAPTER II.
The Reader is introduced to a bashful young Gentleman!
Sybrandt Westbrook
was the only son of a
distant female kinswoman of the Vancour family;
once, it was supposed, a great favourite of Mr.
Dennis, who had been suspected of something
more than a mere liking to the lady. She was a
beauty and an heiress, and married a British officer
at New-York, who dissipated her fortune, and finally
went home and never returned. She left an only
son, without fortune, or a protector to his infancy.
But he found one in Mr. Dennis Vancour, who,
after the death of his wife, took the boy home,
adopted him as his son, and superintended his
education
.
Dennis was a worthy man, with a vast
many peculiarities. He cherished the old
primitive
Dutch manners, and above all the old primitive.
Dutch language, the only one he could now ever be
brought to speak, although master of English. He
had a great distaste for New-York names, modes,
and follies; and ever since he was cut out by a red
coat, cherished a mortal antipathy to every man who
wore that livery. He disliked the new system of
education
daily gaining ground in the province, and the
thousand innovations which its change of masters had
introduced. The fashionable young men were
coxcombs
,
and the fashionable young women only fit to
dance, flirt, and make fools of themselves with the
red coats.
For these and divers other substantial reasons, he
determined that his adopted son should receive a
domestic
education, under the care of the good
Dominie
Stettinius, pastor of the congregation. The
dominie
was a stanch pillar of the Reformed Dutch
church, a profound scholar, and a man of great piety
as well as simplicity of character. He was bred at the
famous university of Leyden; that renowned
seminary
,
where Erasmus, Grotius, Grvius, and a thousand
other illustrious scholars were educated; and where
Scaliger, Salmasius, and a thousand illustrious
masters
presided from time to time. It was at Leyden,
in the United
Republics
of Holland, that scholars
sought refuge from monkish bigotry, that the liberty
of thought, speech, and writing, maintained itself
against the persecutions of church and state; and it
was there that the greatest, the most indefatigable,
and the most useful scholars that perhaps the world
ever knew were protected as well as rewarded for
their labours in the cause of learning and liberal
opinions. The rival nations of France, Italy, and
England have sought to monopolize the glories of
learning, science, and philosophy; but if we resort to
history and fact, we shall find that the civilized world
is at least equally indebted to the
Free States of
Holland
, and that at one period, comprising a century
or more, had they not found a refuge there, they would
in all probability have been persecuted into silence,
if not unto death.
Dominie Stettinius had been a laborious student, and
was now a ripe scholar. This was some distinction
in those days, when it required the labours of years
to collect that knowledge which was then dispersed
among thousands of bulky volumes, but is now
collected
and condensed in encyclopedias, dictionaries,
and compendiums of various kinds. But the
dominie
was only a scholar and a pious divine; he
possessed
no one accomplishment except learning, nor
had he a respect for any other; his manners were
simple, almost rustic; and such was the sobriety of
his notions, that, though a kind-hearted being as ever
existed, he could hardly tolerate the smiles, the
gayety, and the gambols of happy childhood.
This worthy divine, by desire of Mr. Dennis
Vancour
,
took the entire charge of Sybrandt, at the age
of seven years, and made a great scholar of him at
nineteen. The good man was so zealous in plying
him with books that he forgot men, and above all,
women, who are as necessary to the formation of
mind and manners as they are to the creation of the
man himself. The consequence was, that the youth
grew up a shy, awkward, reserved, abstract being,
without the vivacity of his age, and ignorant as a
child of that knowledge of the world which, like
small change, is essential to the every day
transactions
of life. There was nothing on the face of the
earth he was so much afraid of as a woman,
particularly
a young woman, whose very presence seemed
to turn him into stone, and lock up the springs of
thought as well as action. But notwithstanding all
this, woman was the divinity of his soul, worshipped
in secret in his rural walks and solitary
contemplations
.
Some ideal mistress of his own creation was
ever present to his imagination, and the propensity
to love, which is the universal characteristic of
youth, only became the more intense from his entire
abstraction from the will and the means of its
gratification
.
Thus, while from a consciousness of his
awkwardness and embarrassment, he shunned all
personal communion with woman, his whole soul was
filled and animated by a latent smothered fire, a
sleeping Cupid, which, when once roused into action
by opportunity and an object, was destined to
become
the ruling influence of his life.
The person and aspect of Sybrandt were eminently
handsome; but his manners and address deplorably
rustic and ungainly. When addressed abruptly, his
awkward embarrassment had the appearance of
stupidity
;
and such were his habits of abstraction that
he often gave the most silly answers imaginable.
Thus he grew up with little to recommend him to the
respect or affection of his fellow-creatures around
but a sort of harmless stupidity, which the good
dominie was pleased to call the gravity of wisdom.
His vivacity, if nature had ever given him any, was
entirely repressed by hard studies, want of
company
,
and relaxation, reinforced by the stern gravity
of the worthy Stettinius, who plied him with tasks day
and night. His shoulders had become rounded like
those of advancing decrepitude, and he had acquired
a habit of stooping which destroyed the manliness
and dignity of his figure.
With him, the happy days of childhood had been
the season of perpetual toil. While he saw from the
window of his scholastic prison the little urchins of
the neighbourhood sporting in the meadows, or on
the white sandy river-beach, and heard their shrill
shouts of unchecked vivacity, nature would yearn in
his heart to partake in the frolic which she herself
had provided for the little sons and daughters of men.
But every glance from the everlasting book of tasks
was watched and checked by the good dominie, who
had long outlived the recollection of his youthful
feelings
,
and buried every impulse of nature under the
mighty mass of scholastic rubbish, which the
incessant
labours of threescore years had concentrated in
his memory. Assuredly learning is a thing of almost
inestimable value; but still I doubt it may be bought
too dearly. Why should the season of childhood,
which God and nature have ordained to be a period of
freedom from cares and toils, be converted into one
of labour and anxiety, for the sake of a little
premature
knowledge, which the early and tender intellect
is unable to comprehend, or the comprehension of
which requires an effort of the mind which stints its
growth for ever afterward? Knowledge should only
keep pace with the natural growth of the human
faculties. If it comes to exceed the powers of the
mind, and to be too great for the grasp of our reason
and judgment, the overburthened intellect becomes
but an ass, laden with treasures of no use to the bearer,
and only calculated to oppress the wholesome vigour
and vivacity of nature. When I see a little urchin,
who ought to be enjoying nature's holyday, and
strengthening his constitution by wholesome exercise
to bear the vicissitudes of the world in after-times,
kidnapped and sent to school, to sit on a bench for
four or five hours together, employed in learning by
rote what he is unable to comprehend, I cannot help
contemplating him as the slave and the victim of the
vanity of the parent and the folly of the teacher.
Such a system is only calculated to lay a foundation
for disease and decrepitude, to stint the physical
and intellectual growth, and to produce a premature
old age of body and mind.
Sybrandt had seen but little of his cousin Catalina,
as their relationship was denominated, previous to
her being sent to the boarding-school; and less of
her from that time. True, the young lady spent her
vacations at home, but Sybrandt was either too hard
at his studies, or too bashful to be much in her
company
.
When this happened, he was pretty certain
to be more than commonly stupid and embarrassed,
so that Catalina had long set him down as little better
than a sleepy country bumpkin of the first pretensions.
The youth had anticipated her arrival and final
sojourning
at her father's mansion, as an event of great
interest to him. True, he felt convinced in his own
mind, that he should never dare to look her full in
the face, or enjoy either ease or pleasure in her
society
.
Yet still her abode so near him would furnish
a new and charming object for his abstract devoirs
and solitary contemplations. She would become the
ideal companion of his rambles; the bright vision of
his imagination, and give a zest to his existence in
that visionary world which furnished almost all the
materials of his happiness. He was excessively
anxious to see her, and punctual in his attendance at
the mansion house while the storm lasted and there
was no immediate prospect of the young lady's
arrival
;
but the moment the Patroon came in sight
his heart failed him, and he retreated into the fields,
there to enjoy an imaginary meeting which he dared
not encounter in reality. He embraced his cousin;
kissed her cheek; made the most gallant, eloquent
speeches; gazed in her face with eager eyes of
admiration
;
and, in short, enjoyed in imagination a
scene exactly opposite to that which the reality would
have presented. Happy, thrice happy is the man
who can thus create a paradise around him, and
spin his enjoyments, as it were, from his own
materials
.
This is a species of domestic manufacture
that certainly ought to be encouraged by the
government
.
Mr. Dennis Vancour was somewhat indignant at
Vol. I.B
the ignominious retreat of Sybrandt, to whom he
delivered
a Dutch lecture at their next interview, on
his sheepishness. The good man took especial care
not to recollect that it was, in a great measure, owing
to the system of education inflicted upon him by
the dominie, with his entire approbation. He
insisted
on his accompanying him, the next morning,
to pay his devoirs to the young lady; and accordingly
an interview took place between them. On the part
of Sybrandt it was shy and embarrassed, a mixture
of pride and timidity; on that of Catalina, sprightly
and good-humoured, with a sly expression of
slighting
superiority, which to one of his quick feelings
was calculated to increase his embarrassment, and
make him appear still more awkward and stupid.
The noisy, but well-meaning Ariel, made matters
still worse, by occasionally urging the young man to
buck up, as he called it, to the young lady, and
show his breeding. Poor Sybrandt wished himself
a thousand miles away. By the time dinner was
served, his head felt like a great bag of wool, and
his heart ached with an oppressive load of imaginary
contempt and ridicule, which he thought he saw in
the eyes of every one, more especially those of
Catalina
.
Ariel, who sat next him was perpetually
jogging him in the side, to offer some civility to the
young lady, and at length wrought him up to the
hardihood
of asking her to take a glass of wine, which
he did in a voice so low that nobody heard him.
Try again, whispered Ariel; zounds! man, you
could not hear yourself, I am sure.
Sybrandt tried again, but his voice died away in
murmurs. Ariel was out of patience. A-hem!
roared he in a voice that made Sybrandt quake.
Ahem!Catalina, your cousin asks you to drink
wine with him. The glasses were filled, but
unfortunately
Ariel, who was none of the smallest, sat
directly between the young people and intercepted
Sybrandt's
view of his cousin. When Sybrandt leaned
forward to catch the lady's eye, Ariel did the like,
from an inherent sympathy with motion, originating
in his inveterate antipathy to sitting still; and thus
they continued bobbing backwards and forwards till
Catalina could restrain herself no longer, and laughed
outright. Habits and dispositions like those of
Sybrandt
never fail to take the laugh and the ridicule
all to themselves, even when they are only parties
concerned. The young man actually perspired with
agony, and when at length he gained an opportunity
of bowing to the lady, his nerves were in such a state
of agitation that he was incapable of swallowing.
The wine took the wrong way, and nearly suffocated
the luckless lad, who was only relieved by an
ungovernable
fit of coughing, during which he precipitated
his draught in the face of honest Ariel.
Blitzen! exclaimed Dennis, in an under tone;
for he was extremely anxious his adopted son should
do credit to his education.
A-hem! zounds! cried Ariel, wiping his eyes,
why, Sybrandt, one would think you mistook it for
a dose of physic. The young lady exchanged a
significant
smile with her mother, and the good Egbert,
according to his custom, said nothing.
The dinner passed off without any other
catastrophe
,
though poor Sybrant trembled to his very
heart-strings, and shuddered when he put any thing
into his mouth, lest it might go the wrong way.
He escaped as soon as possible, and sought his usual
communion with his friend and counsellor, solitude.
Here his imagination revelled in tortures of its own
B 2
creation, and painted in the most exaggerated colours
the scenes that had just occurred. Under the Doric
roughness and simplicity of his appearance and
manners
,
this young man concealed a proud sensibility,
that withered under the sense of ridicule and
contempt
.
The very thought, the very shadow of a
thought, that he had been the object of either, stung
him with a feeling of self-abasement, of keen-cutting
mortification, that brought drops of agony from his
heart and wrung the perspiration from his aching
forehead
.
Such a temper aggravates the slightest
matters
into stings and nettles; with a watchful, anxious
solicitude, it lies in wait for poisons to nourish its own
infirmity, and makes its own keen sensibilities to the
merest trifles the measure of the feelings of others.
In five minutes after Sybrandt's departure from the
mansion-house, every circumstance connected with
his mortifications was entirely forgotten by all but
himself. But the recollection continued to rankle in
his mind for a long while afterward, rendering him,
if possible, a thousand times more shy, apprehensive,
and sensitive than before. He never entered the
old mansion that the scene of the dinner-table did
not present itself with accumulated circumstances of
mortification, paralyzing his gayety, oppressing his
understanding, and giving to his actions a degree of
awkward restraint that made his company painful
as well as irksome to Catalina. It was indeed but
seldom that he could be induced to seek her society,
though she was ever the companion of his solitude;
the theme of a thousand airy visions of the future,
which he indulged without the remotest idea, or even
wish to realize. He lived upon his own imaginings,
of which, though self was always the centre, the
circumference
comprehended the universe. The
influence
of solitude on the selfish principle is almost
omnipotent. He who lives to himself, and by
himself
,
becomes as it were, the object of his own
idolatry
.
Having little to draw off his attention from
himself alone, the claims, the actions, the desires, the
happiness of his fellow-creatures never intrude, or if
they intrude at all, it is as mere auxiliaries, or
obstacles
to his supreme dominion. Upon him the social
feeling, which is the source of a thousand virtues,
never operates, except perhaps in some imaginary
revery that calls up a momentary impulse of
kindness
or humanity, which dies away without ever
being
imbodied into action. He lives and moves, and
has his being, his enjoyments, his regrets, and
disappointments
concentrated in himself alone.
Sybrandt was an example of these truths. His
principles were all good, and he practised no vices.
Yet neither his talents nor his virtues were ever
brought into exercise in a communion with his
fellow-beings, because his pride, timidity, and
sensitiveness
drove him continually from society, to
nourish
the perpetual contemplation of self, by
pondering
on the ridicule and contempt which was ever
present to his imagination. Thus all his
acquirements
and all his good qualities lay dormant, amid
the violent action of feelings and considerations
that were exclusively selfish. It remained to be
seen what such a being might or would become
when placed in conflict with his fellows, under the
incitements and temptations of the world.
CHAPTER III.
A Young Lady who would have been one hundred years old had
she lived long enough.
Catalina Vancour
was a very pretty and, in the
main, a very good girl, although she had been bred
at a boarding-school at New-York, and danced with
an aid-de-camp. She had lost much of the Doric,
but had acquired a corresponding portion of the
Corinthian
.
She often sighed for the more piquant
and gorgeous amusements of the capital, and more
especially the society of the gay gallants in scarlet
uniform. But still she had not quite lost the rural
feeling, nor entirely thrown off the witching influence
which nature and her various beauties exercise over
the hearts of those who, though they have sat at the
world's great banquet, still preserve a relish for more
wholesome aliment and plainer luxuries. She
sometimes
,
in the gayety of her heart, sported with the
feelings of poor Sybrandt, and rallied his shyness,
unconscious of the pangs she inflicted upon his
apprehensive
self-love, and without noticing the dew of
agony that gathered upon his forehead, as she
playfully
reproached him with being afraid of the young
ladies.
The intercourse of young people in those times
was very different from what it is at present. I
pretend
not that one age is, upon the whole, wiser or
better than another; or to sit in judgment upon my
contemporaries. But I often catch myself
contemplating
,
with something like sober regret, those days
of unostentatious simplicity, easy, unaffected
intercourse
,
and manly independence. Who, indeed, that
hath gathered from history and tradition a picture
of the manners, modes, and morals of the ancient
patriarchs of Albany and its neighbourhood, but will
be inclined to contrast them dolefully with those of
the present times? Who but will sigh to behold
their places usurped by gilded butterflies,
ostentatious
beggary, empty pretence, and paltry affectation?
In the room of men independent of the smiles and
frowns of bankers or bankrupts, he will find
speculators
glittering in their borrowed plumage for an
hour or two, then passing away, leaving nothing
behind
them but the wrecks of their unprincipled
career
.
Where once sat the simple magistrates,
administering
the few simple laws necessary to
regulate
the orderly community over which they presided,
is now collected a body of garrulous, ignorant,
visionary
,
or corrupt legislators, pampering their own
private
interests at the expense of the public good, and
sacrificing the prosperity of one portion of the State
to the grasping avidity of another. In the room of
prosperous yeomanry and independent mechanics,
we behold crowds of hungry expectants, neglecting
the sure and only means of competency, and
begging
,
in the abjectness of a debased spirit, permission
to sacrifice their independence for a wretched
pittance
,
held under the wretched tenure of a man who
has no will of his own. The once quiet city, where
the name and the idea of political corruption was
unknown, is now a whirlpool of intrigue, where empty
bubbles are generated and kept alive by the
agitation
of the waters, and boiling and conflicting
eddies
gather into one focus all the straws, and chaff,
and feathers, and worthless nothings, that float upon
the surface of the stormy puddle.
Undoubtedly simplicity of manners is one of the
great pillars of morality. It circumscribes our wants,
and thus diminishes those besetting temptations to
extravagance and dishonesty which originate in and
receive their power from the love of dress, splendour,
display, and luxury. Those who set an inordinate
value upon the qualification of these vanities will
come in time to sacrifice to their attainment all that
solid stock of happiness which is derived from the
possession of integrity and independence. An age
of simplicity is therefore an age of morality; and
hence it is that the wisest writers of antiquity have
made simplicity of manners essential to the
preservation
of that liberty which cannot be sustained by
a luxurious and corrupt people. That our own high
feelings of independence are rapidly fleeing away
before the quick steps of ostentation and luxury, and
that the love of wealth, as the means of attaining to
these gratifications, is becoming the ruling passion,
must be obvious to all observers.But enough of
this; the subject belongs-to graver heads than ours.
One smiling morning in June, when nature, to use
the fashionable phrase, sent out her cards of
invitation
to all the living imps of earth, from two legs to a
thousand, to come and revel at her banquet of flowers,
zephyrs, and woodland harmoniesnot
forgetting
the strawberries and creamCatalina,
aceording
to the doric fashion of the times, had made a
party with some of the lads and lasses of Albany
to visit a little island lying lengthwise along the
river; a mile or two below the mansion-house. Such
parties were common in those days, when rural fields,
and smiling landscapes, and woody recesses, where
vines and wild flowers, and tuneful birds, and
whispering
zephyrs, came in the place of crowded rooms,
conflicting
vanities, soul cloying confectionaries, sleepy
fiddlers, and midnight revels. Here, on the soft
bosom of tranquil nature, the young people rambled
about till they were tired, and then sat down on the
green sward under the protecting shade of some little
copse of half-grown trees canopied by grape vines,
forming a vast umbrella over their heads. Here,
at a proper time, they brought out their stores; and
a collation, to which health, exercise, and
cheerful
innocent hearts gave zest, succeeded. Many a
sober youth and red-ripe damsel were first awakened
to a gentle preference in these rich smiling solitudes;
and many a long uncertain beauty was here brought,
at last, to know, and acknowledge her own mind to
the chosen swain.
Catalina was resolved that Sybrandt should
accompany
the party; not that she admired her shy and
awkward cousin, or valued his society: but, I know
not how it is, there is a wayward wilfulness in
woman
which, being common to all past times, is probably
a gift of nature. We allude to the propensity to
carrying
a point, whether a favourite one or not; to
overcome oppositionin short, to have their own
way in every thing. Had Sybrandt sought her
society
,
or discovered a disposition to be attentive,
Catalina would have probably been tired to death of
him in a little while, and affronted the youth downright.
But he kept at a distance; he avoided her whenever
he could; he sometimes excited her curiosity and
sometimes her anger, by his lonely habits, and total
neglectin short, he was not to be had at all times, or
at any time, and was, therefore, in spite of himself,
an object of consequence to his cousin. But the
difficulty
C 3
was to catch this wayward monster, and Ariel
was deputed for that purpose. There was nothing
he loved like being employed upon the affairs of
other people; and Catalina had gained his whole
heart by sending him to Albany every day, to
purchase
a paper of pins, a skein of thread, or a
pemryworth
of some kind or other.
Ariel, who knew some of the haunts of Sybrandt,
took his gun, and went, as he said, to hunt this
strange animal. Among the rugged hills that bounded
these rich flats inland; was a deep romantic glen,
through which a fine stream tumbled in foaming
volumes
from rock to rock. It was overshadowed by
vast pines and cedars, which threw their gloomy
arms and locked their fingers half way across the
abyss. Here was a perpetual twilight, throughout
all times of the day and every season of the year.
In the hottest days of summer there was a refreshing
coolness diffused around, that came with exquisite
zest to the lazy and relaxed frame, and made the
spirit wax fit for vigorous thoughts. Every rock,
and stump, and half-decayed branch of a mouldering
tree was coated with velvet moss; and all along the
margin of the brook, the green fringe kissed the foamy
waters as they glanced away. It was here that
Sybrandt was often found, deep in the reveries of a
wandering mind, seeking some steady rational object
of pursuit, and floating clumsily about without
purpose
,
like a bark away from its anchor. His mind
was a perfect chaos, wanting the powerful stimulus
of some master-passion, some great pursuit to
arrange
its intellectual forces, and marshal them to
usefulness if not to deeds of noble daring.
Ariel was an astonishing man for killing two birds
with one stone. He always had two irons in the
fire at once; and nothing was more common with
him than to forget them both in pursuit of a third.
It is related of him, that being one day waiting with
his horse to cross the ferry at Albany, he was so
taken up with the dd stupid blundering of the
ferryman in bringing his boat to the stairs, that he
let go his own bridle, whereat his horse trotted
gallantly
away. His master pursued, and finally came
up with him. But just as he seized the bridle and
turned round, he saw the ferry-boat leaving the
stairs. Whereupon he let go the bridle, and ran as
fast as his little short drumsticks would permit
towards
the boat, hallooing to the d----d stupid
blockhead to stop. The man, being now in the
current
of the stream, could not or would not return.
Whereupon Ariel turned round in a great passion to
his horse; but the horse was gone too, past all
recovery
,
having this time mended his pace to a
gallop
,
and made straightway for home. So Ariel missed
both ferry-boat and horse by not attending to one at
a time.
As he was proceeding in the execution of his
commission
for Catalina, lucklessly for the wishes of that
young lady, Ariel espied at some distance a noble
flock of pigeons perched on a dead tree. The last
thing and the last object was always sure to carry
all before it with Ariel. He forgot every thing else,
and trudged away with all his speed towards this
new and powerful attraction. He got a copse
between
him and the birds; he advanced cautiously
under cover; he gained a station within gunshot,
while the unconscious victims sat perfectly quiet; he
cocked his piece, raised it to his shoulder, and was
just taking aim, when his irresistible propensity to
clearing his throat came across him, and he essayed
such a stout magnificent ahem! that the birds
took the alarm and flew away. Dn it, quoth
Ariel, and scampered after, following them with his
eye, till he unfortunately plumped into a ditch, where
he got most gloriously garnished with a coat-of-mail,
and was fain to make the best of his way home,
leaving the pigeons to their fate and Sybrandt to his
solitude.
Well, uncle, said Catalina, when she saw him,
did you see the white savage?
No, zounds! they all flew away, replied Ariel,
thinking of the pigeons.
Flew away! what are you talking about, uncle?
Why, zounds! I tell you, just as I was going to
let fly at them, they flew away, and I fell into a ditch
trying to follow.
Follow whom, said the young woman, who
began
to suspect honest Ariel had lost his wits.
Why, the pigeons.
Pigeons! I thought you went in search of
Sybrandt
?
Bless my soul! a-hem! bless my soul, so I did.
But the truth is, Catty, I took my gun with me, by
way of company, and met a flock of pigeons that led
me plump into a ditch, and I forgot all about it.
The young lady was half-vexed, half-diverted,
though well acquainted with her uncle's inveterate
habit of running after the last object which presented
itself. He once lost an excellent opportunity of
getting married, by stopping on the way to show
some boys how to catch minnows.
I'll go this minute and look for him, added Ariel,
after a moment's hesitation.
Do, uncle; but don't take your gun with you.
No, no.
And don't run after the pigeons.
O no.
And take care you don't fall into the ditch.
O never fear, and away went the good-natured
Ariel, clearing his throat with a sonorous a-hem!
On his way to the house of his brother Dennis, he
saw a number of little peach-trees, just fit for
inoculating
,
which tempted him sorely. But luckily for
the consummation of his errand, he had left his
jackknife
at home, and there was an end of the matter.
He proceeded on, therefore, and found Sybrandt at
home. He had been considering all the morning
whether he should go over and see his pretty
cousin
,
and had just wrought himself up to the feat,
when Ariel arrived with his message, which threw
him into great perplexity. In going to see her of
his own accord, and alone, he had privately come
to an understanding with himself, that if his heart
failed him by the way he could turn back again, and
nobody would be the wiser. But here was a
different
predicament, a message and a companion, and he
felt greatly inclined to demur.
Come, come! zounds, man, why don't you stir
yourself? When I was of your age, if a pretty girl
sent for me, I was off like a shot.
Yes, but you never hit the mark, uncle, said
Sybrandt, smiling.
A-hem, quoth Ariel, but, zounds! come along,
will you? I've got fifty things to do this morning.
Let me seeI promised to show the dominie how to
ring his pigs' nosesafter that, I must go and tell
the widow Van Amburgh how her geese ought to be
yokedthen to squire Vervalen's to show them how
to stew mushroomsthen to Brom Van Riper's, to
see if his sugar-pears are ripeandbut come along;
dn it, I shall never get through half my business
this morning. Accordingly he seized the youth by
the arm and dragged him along, half-willing,
half-reluctant
.
A man is sometimes pleased with a little
violence, which saves him the trouble of making up
his mind when he don't know exactly what he would
be at; and so is a woman if she is not very much
belied.
Well, here he isI've caught him at last,
shouted Ariel, as he entered the hall where Catalina
sat enjoying the sweet south breeze that gathered
coolness as it sailed up the river.
What, unclethe pigeons? and the young lady
smiled at the recollection of yesterday's disaster.
No; the goose, replied Ariel, bursting into a
great laugh at his own happy rejoinder.
Reader, art thou a modest, bashful, or what is still
more, a sheepish young person, as proud as Lucifer,
and with feelings more wakeful and skittish than a
wild partridge? and hast thou ever been made the
object of laughter? If so, thou wilt be able to
enter into the agonies of Sybrandt, as he stood
perspiring
under the consciousness that he cut rather a
ridiculous figure. No one can ever know what a man
suffers in such a situation, except persons of the
temperament
I have described. If they didif they
could enter into the recesses of their hearts, and see
the strings quivering with keen and bitter
mortifications
,
the most ill-natured, malignant being that was
ever created would be careful not to play rudely upon
an instrument so easily disposed to tormenting
discords
.
There are thousands of young persons, and
all of the higher order of intellect, who in the days of
their probation, before their hearts are seared in the
fires of indulgence, or deadened by disappointments,
suffer more from the careless disregard to their
feelings
,
and the thoughtless ridicule indulged in by the
domestic circle in which they move, than from all
other causes combined.
It was thus with Sybrandt. At once a hundred
daggers buried their points in the bosom of his
self-love
.
His apprehensive pride conjured up spectre
after spectre, grinning and pointing their fingers at
him in bitter or playful scorn; or whispering in his
ringing ear, that his cousin had sent for him to make
sport with his infirmity. His mind lost its poise, and
his faculties became suspended, as he stood, in
awkward
embarrassment, the image of stupid insensibility
at the moment his heart and brain were pregnant
with feelings which, could he have rallied the
confidence
to utter, would have astounded his uncle,
and waked in the kind bosom of Catalina respect
and commiseration. As it was, she considered him
a proud, stupid, conceited bookworm, whose neglect
of her society and marked avoidance arose from
indifference
to her person and contempt for her
understanding
.
From the moment she entertained this
conviction, he became an object of consequence in
her eyes, and she resolved either to overcome this
dislike or indifference, or revenge the injured dignity
of womanhood, by worrying his pride and laughing
at his airs of superiority.
Sybrandt stood twirling his hat, immersed in a chaos
of conflicting feelings that took away all presence of
mind, when Ariel slapped him on the shoulder, in his
good-humoured boisterous way, and roared out, in a
voice that caused the young man to drop his hat on
the floor,
Zounds! man, can't you speak? Why don't
you ask your cousin what she wants.Heya-hem!
C 2
If I was a young fellow like you, I'd have got it all
out of her in less than no time. But I suppose I'd
better leave the young couple togethera-hem!
And with a most significant look, he departed to teach
the dominie how to ring his pigs' noses.
This allusion to the young couple affronted
Catalina, and made poor Sybrandt feel more sheepish
than ever. At length the young lady, assuming an
air of taunting distance, masked under affected
humility
,
said
Mr. Westbrook, I am afraid, is offended at the
liberty I have taken in sending for him.
IndeedII could not imagineI was surprised
I and here his tongue cleaved to the roof of his
mouth.
I beg pardon for the liberty; but I thought it
might be agreeable to Mr. Westbrook to go with a
little party to-morrow to the island, if the day is fair.
But I supposeI see you can't leave your books.
These little rural pastimes are beneath a philosopher:
and she concocted her rosy lips and ivory teeth into
a pretty sneer, as she uttered this truly female
oration
.
I wouldI willI should like much to go with
youbut and here the demon of sheepishness
conjured up a hundred reasons for not going.
O, very wellI suppose Mr. Westbrook thinks
the company of common folks, especially young
women
who don't understand Greek, beneath his notice.
Sybrandt was a little nettled at this, and anger soon
overcomes timidity.
Miss Vancour is inclined to be satirical, I will
not say ill-natured, to-day.
Wonderful! why he has found his voice. Mr.
Westbrook condescends to speak to a poor damsel.
Surely he mistakes her for one of the seven wise men
of Greece? How could you let down your dignity
so! and the lady made him a low obeisance.
Sybrandt's face and heart glowed with a feeling of
insult.
Miss Vancour does not do me justice if she
thinks me proud. She cannot know my feelings, nor
enter into the mortifications I suffer daily, from the
consciousness that Ithat I and here his proud
shy spirit shrunk from disclosing the wayward
mysteries
of his feelings and deportment. He remained
silent and embarrassed; yet his face glowed with an
expression, and his eye kindled with a fire, Catalina
had never seen lighted there before. She was
delighted
to discover that he had feelings which it was
in her power to awaken. It was a proof that he did
not think her altogether beneath his notice.
What is it, then, said she, that keeps you from
my father's house, where you are always welcome;
from the society of the young men who would be
proud of your company; and from all share in the
amusements of our female friends? If it is not pride,
what is it?
At one moment Sybrandt determined to give his
cousin an analysis of his feelings; the next he
shrunk from the disclosure; and the conflict of
opposing
impulses threw his mind into such a
confusion
,
that for the soul of him he could not utter a
connected sentence.
Well, well, Mr. Westbrook, said Catalina, after
waiting the event of this struggle, I do'nt wish to
intrude upon your secrets, nor to persuade you to go
any where against your will. You had better ask
the dominie's permission. I won't intrude any further
on your studies. And the young lady left the room,
saying within herself, He is not such a senseless
block after all, as I thought him. A man that can
blush must have a heart, certainly.
Sybrandt could have knocked his head against a
stone wall. He buried himself in the woody solitudes,
where his mortified pride and keen apprehensive
sensibility
dwelt with exaggerated agony, on the ridiculous
figure he had made in this interview, the laugh of
Ariel, and the cutting ridicule of his cousin. He
called himself fool, oaf, idiot, in his very heart, and
it may be fairly questioned whether any pang he
afterward experienced, arising from actual suffering
or misfortune, ever came up to the keen malignity of
this his present feeling of mortified pride and insulted
sensibility, combined with the consciousness that he
had made himself ridiculous.
CHAPTER IV.
The Morning's smiles, the Evening's tears.
The
next morning Ariel came over, and found
Sybrandt
half-willing, half-afraid to accompany the party
to the island, of which he was to be the
commander-in-chief
.
Never man was so busy, so important, and so
happy as the good Ariel, at having something to do
for a whole day. Blessed, indeed, yea, thrice blessed
is he whom trifles can make happy. It is this which
forms the bliss of childhood and the consolation of
old age, each of which finds its appropriate
enjoyments
in an exemption from the serious labours and
oppressive anxieties of the world's great business.
It was a cheerful and inspiring morning as ever
shone upon the rich plains of the happy Hudson
happy in being the chosen river on whose bosom floats
the tide of fashion to and fro; on whose delicious
borders dwell in rustic competency thousands of
contented
human beings, enjoying the fruits of their
labours amid the fruitions of a blameless life and a
quiet spirit. The day was such a one as I myself
prefer to all others; when the sun diffuses his
influence
through a gauzy veil of semi-transparent
clouds, which temper his rays into a mild genial
warmth, that, while it takes, perhaps, from the vigour
of the body, communicates to the mind a delicious
and luxurious aptitude for the indulgence of the
gentler
emotions. In such days, and through such a
medium
,
the beauties of nature exhibit only their softest
features; and display their greatest varieties of shade
and colouring; the winds are hushed; the waters
smooth and glassy; the foliage wears a fleecy
softness
;
the hills appear more beautiful; the mountains,
magnified in the misty vagueness of distance, seem
blended with the skies; the different shades of green
that deck the bosom of the earth become more
distinct
yet more harmonious than when basking in the
glare of the sun; and every sound that meets the ear,
like every object that attracts the eye, partakes in
the gentle harmony that reigns all around. It is in
the remembrance of such scenes in after-life, and
amid the struggles, hopes, and disappointments which
checker the course of manhood, that we are apt to
contrast our present cares with our former
enjoyments
,
exaggerating both, and giving a false estimate
of the different periods of an existence, which, if we
fairly hold the balance, will be found pretty much
the same in all its various changes, from the cradle
to the grave.
Our little party consisted of Master-commandant
Ariel, chief manager, factotum, &c., as busy as a bee,
as noisy as a caty-did, and as merry as a cricket;
Catalina, Sybrandt, and some half a score of the
beaux and belles of Albany, who had come to the
mansion-house bright and early in the morning, all
dressed in neat and simple attire, befitting a ramble
among the wild roses and clambering vines of the
happy island. This little paradise, to speak in
learned phrase, was an alluvial formation of times
long past, composed of the rich spoils of the
surrounding
lands, deposited by the river. It was as
level as the surface of the stream in which it was
embosomed
,
and covered with a carpet of rich, luxuriant
verdure, which, when it was not pastured, gave to
the scythe a glorious harvest three times a year. On
every side and all around, the banks were fringed with
the light silvery foliage of the water-willows, mingled
with tufts of wild roses, and growths of nameless wild
flowers of every hue and various odours; and
canopied
at intervals with clambering vines, whose long
tendrils sometimes bent down and waved to and fro
on the gliding waters as they passed slowly by.
Within this leafy barrier was nothing but a green
sward, shaded at various intervals by the vast giants
of the alluvial growthelms and plane-trees, of such
towering majesty, that they overlooked the gentle
eminences which bounded the flats on either side.
The witching murmurs of the waters, as they glided
along under the willow branches and nodding vines,
mingled with the chorus of a thousand birds, who
remained all summer in undisturbed possession; and
though the pipe of the shepherd was never heard in
these pleasant abodes, it was aptly supplied by the
music of harmonious nature, the murmuring waters,
and the warblers of the woodlands.
Under the skilful guidance of the active,
indefatigable
Ariel, the little party arrived at the scene of their
anticipated pleasures, all gay and happy, save our
friend Sybrandt, who, from the moment he joined the
group, felt the spell of the demon besetting him sorely.
His gayety was repressed, his faculties benumbed,
and his youthful vigour changed to a leaden inertness
by that habitual shyness and awkwardness the very
consciousness of which prevented all efforts to shake
it off. He was always either behind or before the
party, and generally too far from it to hear what was
said. Thus, when the hilarity of the youthful spirit
effervesced into a sprightly laugh, the demon of
pride, suspicion, and consciousness, whispered that
the laugh was at him. The other young men were,
indeed, quite as awkward, and without his
knowledge
and acquirements; but they made an
excellent
figure, notwithstanding, and performed their
parts with a gay, gallant frankness, such as woman
in all situations loves. They had lived in the world
at Albany, mixed in its business, and dissipated their
self-love in the pursuit of various objects, while poor
Sybrandt had passed his youth in nursing the
offspring
of solitudesensibility, pride, and
selfishness
.
It is social intercourse alone that, by calling
us off from self-contemplation, and making it
necessary
to remember and to administer to the wants or
the enjoyments of others, can make man happy
himself, and an instrument of happiness to others.
When they came to the river-side, where lay the
little boat which was to take them to the island,
Sybrandt
had sworn to himself that he would offer his
hand to Catalina to assist her in embarking. But
he was so long before he could screw himself up to
the direful feat, that one of the Albany lads, more
gallant as well as alert, was beforehand with him.
A bashful man is like a tiger; he makes but one
effort
,
and if that fails, slinks away to his jungle, and
essays not another. I myself have my own
experience
to vouch for this; having in the far-off days
of my gallantry, full many a time and oft, in dining
out, gathered myself together with a gallant ferocity
to ask the lady of the feast for the honour of a
glass of wine with her. But alas! if peradventure
the lady listened not to my first demonstration, I
was prone to relapse into an utter and incurable
incapacity
to repeat the mighty effort. The sound of
my voice died suddenly, and word spoke I
nevermore
.
So was it with master Sybrandt, who,
having expended his powder in a flash of the
pan, sunk only the lower for the exertion he had
made.
The little party landed, and pursued their
pleasures
in separate groups, or couples, as chance or
inclination prompted. In those days of Doric
innocence
and simplicityand thanks to Heaven, it is
so still in our happy countryyoung people of
different
sexes could enjoy the pleasures of a rural
ramble, in parties or in pairs, without the remotest idea
of impropriety, and without waking a single breath of
scandal. If there be any thing in the music, the repose,
the lasoinating and quiet beauties of nature that excites
to love, it is gentle and virtuous love; an awakening
impulse rather than an ungovernable passion; and
if perchance it works to final mischief, it is rather
from accident than purposenature than depravity.
It is not here that the sensual passions acquire their
overpowering energies; but at midnight revels,
where dazzling lights, artificial splendours, seducing
music, high-seasoned viands, and luxurious wines,
pamper the senses into lascivious longings, and
swell the imagination to exaggerated conceptions of
pleasure, which carry us away we know not and we
care not whither. Long may it be before it is the
fashion to abridge the freedom of virgins, and extend
that of wives, in our country.
Catalina having carried her point in making
Sybrandt
one of the party, was rather in a better
humour
with him than usual. She plagued him now
and then in various sly ways, and sometimes raised
a laugh at his expense. The first fine edge of the
feelings, fortunately for mankind, both in pleasure
and pain, is worn off by the first enjoyment and the
first suffering. Were it not sobut I am insensibly
becoming a moralist, when I only aspire to
storytelling
.
Sybrandt by degrees already felt like a
musical instrument, in better tune for being played
upon, and two or three times caught himself actually
enjoying the scene and the festivity of his
companions
.
The ridicule of women sometimes makes
bold men only more bold and confident; and I have
known a most exemplary modest person made
downright
saucy by the freedoms of others. Indeed
there is not in the world so impudent a being, as a
shy man forced out of his shyness. The very
impulse
carries him to the opposite extreme. The
bent of Sybrandt's mind had, however, been too long
and too rigid to be relaxed all at once.
I pity the most exalted of all created beings who
cannot feel the inspiration of the balmy air, the
music and the smiles of nature; for he can have
neither sensibility nor imagination. It was not so
with Sybrandt; though apparently a most
unpromising
pupil for the school of romance, there were, if we
mistake not, certain springs of action and certain
latent fires hidden and buried in his head and heart,
which only required to be touched or lighted to make
him a far other being than he seemed just now. As
the morning passed, he insensibly began to feel less
awkward, and his shyness gradually wore away.
He ventured to speak to some of the young damsels,
and finally had the unparalleled intrepidity to attach
himself to the side of his cousin in a stroll under the
vines and willows that skirted the shores of the little
island.
By degrees the feelings which nature had
implanted
in his heart opened and expanded, like the
seeds which lay dormant in the deep shades of the
forest for years, until the trees being cut down, the
warm sunbeams waken them to life and vegetation.
The emotions of his heart for a while overpowered
his long-cherished timidity, and lent to his tongue an
eloquence that pleased, while it surprised Catalina.
The rich stores of imagery which long reading and
contemplation had gathered in his mind, where they
had lain enchained in the icy fetters of timidity, were
let loose by the new-born warmth that thrilled
through his frame, and flowed forth without study or
effort into striking observations, tender associations,
and sparkles of a rich and glowing fancy. Catalina
listened with astonishment to the animated statue;
and as she looked him in the face while pouring forth
the treasures of his mind, and saw the divinity that
sparkled in his eyes, she once or twice detected
herself
in thinking Sybrandt almost as handsome as an
aid-de-camp. He, too, felt elevated in his own
estimation
;
for the first time in his life he had listened
to his own voice without feeling his heart beat with
apprehension, and for the first time he could look
back upon an hour spent in the society of a female,
without a pang of the keenest mortification.
Sybrandt, at length said Catalina, why don't
you talk so every day?
Because every day is not like to-day; nor are
you, my cousin, always what you are now.
A silence ensued, from which they were roused by
the cheerful, joy-inspiring shouts of Ariel, who had
prepared his collation, and was summoning all the
rambling lads and lasses to come and partake of the
blessings of his prudent forethought. To him
eating
was an affair of the first consequence; he never
joined a party, either of business or pleasure, without
first reducing it to a certainty that there would be no
starvation attending it; and it was almost as
affecting
as a last dying speech to hear him relate the
Vol. I.C
melancholy story of the ruin of a brace of the finest
woodducks he ever saw, by the dd stupid
folly of his cook, who roasted them in a pot instead
of before the fire. The good Ariel had spread his
stores on a snow-white tablecloth of ample
dimensions
,
laid upon the rich greensward beneath a canopy
of vines, that clambered over the tops of a clump of
sassafras, whose aromatic buds sent forth a grateful
fragrance. Here he marshalled his forces with great
discretion, placing the lads and lasses alternately
around the rural repast, and enjoining upon the former
the strictest attention to his nearest neighbour. As to
himself, he could never sit still where there was room
for action. He curvetted around the little circle like
a merry spaniel; cracked his jokes, and laughed
only the louder when nobody joined him; helped
himself, and ate and talked, all at the same time, with
a zest, an hilarity, and honest frankness that
communicated
themselves to all about him, infecting them
with a contagious merriment. The birds chirped
over their heads, the flowers grew beneath their feet,
the mild summer breezes played upon their cheeks,
hope glowed in their hearts, and youth and health
were their handmaids; why then should they not
laugh and be merry?
But a plague on Nature! she is a female, after all,
and there is no trusting her. As thus they sat
unheeding
all but themselves and the present moment,
Nature had been at work unnoticed by the little crew,
gathering into one great mass a pack of dark rolling
clouds along the western horizon. The banks of
the little isle were, as we said before, fringed all
around by trees and shrubbery, and tangled vines,
that quite hid the opposite shores, making it a little
world within itself. The dark tempest gathering in
the west had therefore escaped the notice of the party,
until the moment when a burst of merriment was
interrupted
by a flash of lightning, and a quick, sharp
crash of thunder. When the Creator speaks, all
nature
is silent; and if, as some suppose, the leaping
lightning is the quick glancing of his angry eye, the
thunder the threatening of his voice, no wonder if
every sound is hushed when they break forth from
the pitchy darkness of the heavens. The laugh
ceased; the birds became silent in their leafy bowers;
the trees steeled their sweet whisperings; the insects
chirped no longer, and the river murmured no more.
There was a dead pause in the air, the earth, and the
waters, save when the Creator of them all spoke from
the depths of his vast obscurity.
The merrymakers looked at each other in silence,
and in silence sat, until Ariel ventured to clear his
voice with a-hem! which, to say the truth, lacked
much of its wonted vigorous energy and clearness.
Sybrandt gained a position whence he could overlook
the island barrier, and came back running to
announce
that a thunderstorm was coming on rapidly
so rapidly that it would be impossible to cross the
river and gain the nearest house in time to escape its
fury. The damsels looked at the young men, and
the young men looked at the damsels. One had on
her best hat, another a new shawl, a third her holyday
chintz gown, and each and all wore some favourite piece
of finery, which, though peradventure Dolly the cook
and Betty the chambermaid would scorn to wear,
even on week-days, in this age of rapid unparalleled
improvement, was still dear to their simple, innocent
affections. The boys too, as they were called, and
still are called among the old lords of the land, had
on their Sunday gear, which, as they never ran in
C 2
debt to the tailor, it behooved them to nurse with
special care. What was to be done in this sore
dilemma; for now the quick, keen flashes, the equally
keen crashes that came with them, and the dead, dull
calm that intervened, announced that the rain and the
tempest was nigh.
Ariel was as busy as an assistant-alderman at a
fire, and about as useful. Being a man that was
always in a hurry when there was no occasion, it
may be naturally supposed, that when there was
occasion he would be in such a great hurry that his
resolves would tread upon one another's heels, or
impede their operations by running athwart each
other, and breaking their heads. And so, indeed, it
happened; he was ten times more busy than when
he had nothing to do; swore at the lads for not doing
something; suggested a hundred impracticable things;
and concluded, good man! by wishing with all his
soul they were safe housed in the old mansion.
Catalina had been brought up at the
boarding-school
in the fear of thunder. The schoolmistress,
indeed, always encouraged the young ladies by
precept
not to be frightened; but she never failed to
disappear in a thunderstorm, and was one time
discovered
between two featherbeds almost smothered
to death. It is to be regretted that this natural and
proper feeling of awe which accompanies the sublime
phenomena of nature should degenerate into abject
fear or irrational supersition. Divested of these, the
approach of a thunderstorm is calculated to waken
the mind to the most lofty associations with the great
Being who charges and discharges this vast
artillery
,
and to exalt the imagination into the highest
regions of lofty contemplation. But fear is an
abject
,
soul-subduing sentiment, which monopolizes the
mind, debases the physical man, and shuts out every
feeling allied to genuine piety and faith.
Suddenly an idea struck Sybrandt, which was
instantly
adopted and put into execution. The boat,
a broad, flat skiff, was drawn up the bank, and placed
bottom upwards, with one side supported by sticks,
and the other reclining on the ground towards the
west, so that the rain might run off in that direction.
The few minutes which intervened between this
operation
and the bursting of the torrent of rain were
employed by the young men in covering the open
spaces about the sides of the boat with grass and
branches, as well as the time would admit. There
was only space enough under this shelter for the
young women, though Ariel managed to find
himself
a place among them. He was in the main a
good-natured, kind-hearted man, but he did not like
being out in a storm any more than his neighbours.
The young men stood cowering under a canopy of
thick vines, which shaded the boat and a little space
besides. It was observed that Sybrandt placed
himself
nearest that end of the boat under which
Catalina
was sheltered, and that he was particular in the
disposition of the grass and branches in that quarter.
A few, a very few minutes of dead silence on the
part of our little group intervened before the tempest
sent forth its hoards of wind and rain, smiting the
groaning trees, and deluging the thirsty earth till it
could drink no more, but voided the surplus into the
swelling stream, that began anon to rise and roar in
angry violence. This storm was for a long time
traditionary for its terrible violence; and for more
than half a century people talked of the incessant
flashes of the lightning, the stunning and harsh
violence
of the thunder, the deluge of rain, the hurricane
which accompanied it, the lofty trees that were
either split with lightning or torn up by the roots by
the wind, and the damage done by the sudden
swelling
of the river on that remarkable day.
The party that found shelter under the boat fared
indifferently well; but the others were in a few
moments
wet to the skin. The little flexible willows
bent down to let the storm pass over them; but the
sturdy elms and plane-trees stood stiff to the blast
that wrung their arms from their bodies, and
scattered
them in the air like straws and feathers. The
rushing winds, the roaring of the troubled waters,
were mingled with incessant flashings of lightning,
accompanied by those quick, sharp explosions of
thunder that proclaim the near approach of the
electric power. At length the little party was roused
by a peal that seemed to have rent the vault of
heaven
,
and beheld with terror and dismay a vast
plane-tree
,
within a hundred yards' distance, directly in
front of them, shivered from top to bottom like a
reed. The explosion for a moment stilled the
tempest
of rain, during which interval the vast
dissevered
trunk stood trembling and nodding, like one
suddenly struck by the hand of death. Another
moment, and the winds resumed their empire, the
vast monarch of the isle fell to the ground with a
tremendous crash, and the force of Omnipotence was
demonstrated in the instantaneous destruction of a
work which long ages had brought to maturity.
The young women screamed, and the youths
shuddered
,
as they beheld this vast giant of nature
yielding
in an instant to a mightier power. But soon they
were drawn off to the contemplation of a new danger.
It is well known how sudden, nay, almost
instantaneous
,
is the swelling of our rivers, especially near
their sources, and where they traverse a hilly or
mountainous region. The little isle where our scene
is laid was but a few feet above the ordinary level of
the stream, and its surface as flat as the stream itself,
which now began to dash its waves beyond the usual
barrier, until at length the situation of the little party
became extremely critical. The land had become
less safe than the waters, and immediate measures
were taken to prepare for the inundation, by turning
the boat upon her bottom again. The party was
arranged on the benches to the best advantage, and
the young men stood prepared to ply the oars the
moment
the boat was floated off. Soon the tremendous
torrent rolled over the surface of the whole island in
one mighty mass of dark waters, speckled with
white foam; and the boat was carried down the
stream with the swiftness of an arrow. The difficulty
was to escape the trees and bushes, which still reared
their heads above the waters, since it was obvious
that nothing could preserve the boat but her being
kept from the slightest interruption in her course.
The great object, therefore, was to avoid every
obstacle
,
and to keep her head directly down the stream,
till they met with some little nook or cove, where
the current was less violent. In times of danger
the master spirit instinctively takes the lead, and
the lesser ones instinctively yield obedience.
Ever since the coming of the storm Sybrandt had
seemed a new being, animated by a newly-awakened
soul. The excitement of the scene had by degrees
caused him to forget his shyness; and now the
presence
of danger and the necessity of exertion roused
into action those qualities which neither himself nor
others were conscious he possessed. He who had
trembled at the idea of being introduced into a
drawing-room, and shrunk from the encounter of a
smiling female eye, now stood erect in the
composure
of unawed manhood, with a steady hand and a
steady eye, guiding the little skiff through roaring
whirlpools and angry currents, furiously conflicting
with each other, almost as skilfully as a veteran
Mississippi boatman. All else sat still in the
numbness
of irrepressible apprehension. Even the busy
Ariel was motionless in his seat, and his active tongue
silent as the grave. But neither human skill nor
human courage could struggle any length of time with
the power of the waters, every moment aggravated
by new accessions. In turning a projecting point,
round which the current whirled with increased
impetuosity
,
the boat struck the edge of an old stump
of a tree just beneath the surface, and was upset in
a single instant. Fortunately for some, though, alas!
not for all, the current made a sudden inflexion
immediately
below the projecting point into a little
shallow cove, where it subsided into repose. It was
in making for this harbour that the boat
unfortunately
encountered the stump, which, as I stated,
was not visible above the waters. It is with
sorrowful
emotions I record that the accident was fatal
to two of the innocent girls and one of the young men,
who sat in the bow of the boat, which unfortunately,
as she overturned, sheered out into the stream, and
launched them into the whole force of the current.
They were carried away and their bodies found a
day or two afterward many miles below. The
others, with the exception of Catalina, were shot
directly, and in an instant, by the sudden angle made
by the current, into the little shallow, quiet cove,
where they were all preserved. Catalina was not
one of these. Less strong, and less inured to the
sports and perils of rural life, she became insensible
the moment the accident occurred, and would have
quickly perished, had not Sybrandt swam into the
edge of the turbulent whirlpool where she was
floating
,
and brought her safely to the land.
Sadly the remnant of our little party returned to
their respective homes without their lost companions,
and sadly they contrasted the beauty of the quiet
genial morning, and the happy anticipations that
beckoned them forward to sportful revelry, with the
uproar of nature, and the gloomy shadows of the
evening
,
which closed in darkness, sorrow, and death.
The remembrance of this scene, and of the conduct
of Sybrandt, not only before but during the storm,
and in the hour of her extreme peril, was often
afterward called to mind by Catalina, and not
unfrequently
checked her inclination to laugh sometimes,
and sometimes to be downright angry with her
sheepish
,
awkward cousin.We need not dwell upon the
anxiety of the father and mother of our heroine, nor
of the good Dennis, who, in the midst of his fears,
could not help crying out against and sparing not
this new-fangled custom of making parties for the
island, though both tradition and history avouch that
these sports were coeval with the commencement
of our happy era of honest simplicity. Suffice it to
say, that the good parents received their only child
as one a second time bestowed upon them by the
bounty of Heaven, and that they were full of
gratitude
to Sybrandt,whose inspiration seemed now
departed from him. The crisis that awakened his
sleeping energies having passed away, his
long-cherished
habits again beset him; instead of
expressing
his joy at having been instrumental in preserving
Catalina, and showing his sensibility to the parents'
gratitude, he became embarrassed, silent, awkward,
stultifiedand finally vanished away no one knew
whither. We must not omit to record that from
this time forward the worthy Ariel attended the
Dominie's sermons regularly twice every Sabbath;
a custom he had never followed before, inasmuch
as he had a most sovereign propensity to falling
asleep and disturbing the congregation by snoring.
C 3
CHAPTER V.
An Irruption of Boiled Lobsters.
It
was many days before Catalina again saw
master Sybrandt, who, sooth to say, shrunk from the
usual consequences of a good deed, as skittishly as
some worthies do from those of a bad one.
Catalina
said to the woman within her, He is giving
himself airshe thinks I will send for him again
but he'll be very much mistaken this timeI hate
such proud stupid people! and she looked in the
glass, and was right pleased at what she saw there.
The reader must guess what it was, for I never
betray
a lady's secrets. When Sybrandt at last
overcame
his old enemy, and ventured into what to him
was worse than the jaws of a hungry lion, Catalina,
affronted at his long absence, under these particular
circumstances, which seemed to indicate that he
considered the saving of her life a matter of no
sort of consequence, treated him with considerable
disdain. Sybrandt, who could digest twenty
folios of metaphysics easier than comprehend the
mind of a woman, and who never dreamed that his
absence or presence was noticed by any human
being in the shape of a young female, became only
the more proud, shy, embarrassed, and stupid at this
reception. He thought to a certainty his cousin
despised
him, and he was one of those that never
court favour where they expect contempt. Thus
they continued to misunderstand each other, and
thus, it was probable, would they continue to the end
of their lives.
Not long after the adventure of the island, an
incident
occurred which occasioned a great sensation,
not only in the city of Albany, but for many miles
around. This was the arrival of a regiment of
British troops from New-York, in consequence of
expected hostilities between France and England,
whose wretched rivalry generally involved the four
quarters of the globe in war and bloodshed. A large
portion of the officers of this regiment were gay
young men without families, and the belles and
mothers
of the belles in and about Albany, saw in the
new comers a mark on which to exercise the
influence
of the charms of the one and the arts of the
other. One of the most mortifying results of the
colonial state is, that it invariably generates on the
part of the colonists a habit if not a feeling of
inferiority
,
and on the part of the parent state a haughty
arrogant disregard of propriety and decorum when
among them. The men of the United Colonies, with
the exception of perhaps those of Virginia and
South Carolina, did not, in the days of which we
are speaking, assert that proud equality which they
are now authorized to maintain wheresoever they
go; and the women, especially those who aspired to
the
bon-ton
with sorrow and mortification we
record
itby the eagerness with which they sought,
and the unconcealed vanity with which they received
the attentions of gentlemen from the old country,
contributed most materially to the depression of
their own countrymen as well as the exaltation of
foreign adventurers. Nothing indeed contributes so
much to the relative dignity and virtue of the two
sexes, as the estimation in which they hold each
other. Where women are neglected by their
countrymen
,
or where men are neglected by their
countrywomen
,
in their admiration for strangers, the result
will probably be the degradation of both in the eyes
of each other and the estimation of those whose
attentions
they court. This silly habit of admiring
foreign fashions, foreign countries, and foreigners,
became so deeply implanted in the minds of the
good provincials of the Old Thirteen, that it still
retains its influence in some degree, as may be
perceived
in the docility with which we are accustomed
to give the preference to moderate talent in a
stranger
,
over shining merit in a native; and to bow to
the decisions of ignorant pretenders, the sole weight
of whose opinions is derived from their passage
across the ocean. Like wine which has made a
voyage to China, opinions are held to be improved
by a similar adventure; and folly becomes venerable
when we can trace it to the reverend errors of
declining
age across the water. Hospitality ennobles
a nation only when it springs from nobler motives
than the silly vanity of entertaining people of more
consequence than ourselves.
The colonel of the newly arrived regiment had
attained that period of life when vanity and
ambition
take the place of love. He was gallant
and well born; he tacked honourable to his name,
and that alone was sufficient to consecrate him
in the eyes of the provincial ladies. He
belonged
to that race of beaux which has long been
extinct as a species, although we now and then see
some vestiges in the remains of an old wreck of a
soldier, whose wit and vivacity have survived his
very self, and still sparkle from the mere force of
long habit. His name was Sydenham; he was
somewhat of a coxcomb, and his exterior was
prepossessing
,
especially in a red coat and epaulettes.
His courage was undoubted; his principles not at
all doubtful, for he held the point of honour to
consist
in meeting the consequences of his actions, good
or bad, without flinching. He did not want for a
reasonable
degree of scholarship, and was not ignorant
of books; but his greatest acquisition consisted in a
consummate knowledge of the world, a manner which
enabled him to be particularly pleasing whenever he
chose, and a pliability of principles which made it
singularly easy for him to choose the path most
agreeable for the time being. The rest of the officers
were nearly all alike, as much so as so many boiled
lobsters. They all wore red coats, and all thought
themselves of a different species from the honest
burghers, whose wine they condescended to drink,
and whose wives and daughters they favoured with
their attentions in proportion as the liquor was good,
and the ladies handsome.
The mansion-house of the Vancours had ever been
open to the footsteps of all respectable strangers,
and especially to the military men who frequently
sojourned there on their passage from New-York to
the frontier posts and back again. They came and
went as they pleased, and were received and
entertained
with an easy hospitality, of which we see some
remains still lingering in the Southern States, and
making head against the silent inroads of heartless
and selfish ostentation. Independently of the
hospitality
of the house, the situation of the elder Vancour
as a public man, together with his extensive
acquaintance
with the interests of the colony, and his
singular influence over the Indians, naturally made
his house the resort of the principal officers of the
government, with whom his opinions always had
great weight.
Be this as it may, we soon find the colonel and
his officers as it were domesticated at the old
mansion-house
,
riding the colonel's horses, feasting on his
excellent fare, drinking his old wine, pronouncing him
a decent sort of an old curmudgeon, and never quizzing
the good gentleman but at their messes. Colonel
Sydenham singled out Catalina,
quo ad hoc
, as the
object of his devoirs; and the others found rural
deities among the daughters of the Van Ambrughs,
the Van Outerstoups, the Volekmaars, and the
Vervalens
of the neighbourhood, who could talk English
with their eyes, if not with their tongues. It was
not then the fashion to pay any other than the most
respectful attentions to married dames; and if it had
been, there was something in the appearance,
manners
,
and character of the good Madam Vancour, a
staid and sober dignity and quiet self-possession, that
gained even the respect of folly and impudence
combined
.
One of the young officers of the regiment
was complaining one day that he could not find any
body to fall in love with. Why don't you make
love to Madam Vancour? said another, jestingly.
Madam Vancour! replied he; I should as soon
think of throwing a glass of wine in the face of the
king!
The arrival and sojourning of these gay sparks
created a mighty sensation in that part of the
country
,
and in a little time produced great innovations in
the simple habits of the people. Independently of
the general laxity of morals which is so often the
natural consequence of the roving, uncertain life of a
soldier, and his freedom from the restraints of home,
there is always attached to every considerable body
of troops a train of vicious and worthless people of
both sexes. Corruption follows in the rear of arms;
and it is pretty certain that nothing makes more fearful
inroads upon the moral virtues of the people than the
association for any length of time with disciplined
troops. One would suppose that the proverbial
uncertainty
of a soldier's life would generate habits of
sobriety
,
reflection, and decorum; but so far from this, it
is sufficiently evident that it produces quite a contrary
effect. There is no period in which we see such
careless, high-wrought, and high-seasoned conviviality
as in an army the night preceding a battle, in which
every man is to peril his life to the uttermost.
The rural deities of the shades, and the lazy
river-gods
,
who slept in quiet in their crystal basins, save
when the breaking up of the ice in spring or the
swelling
of the river in the pelting storm disturbed their
repose
,
were anon astounded at the frolicksome racket
of these new comers. Heretofore not a dog dared
bark after eight o'clock in their quiet retreats, except
as a signal that the wild man or the wild beast was
coming. But now, preserve us! as the good
Dominie Stettinius exclaimed with lifted hands,
half the night was spentyea, even to nine and
ten o'clockin dancings and jinketings. The cows
stood lowing in the sober twilight, in expectation of
the dilatory milkmaid, who was peradventure
adorning
herself, as the victim was erst dressed in flowers,
to be sacrificed to some gross heathen divinity, whose
attributes were lust and sensuality. The sober Dutch
lads, who whilom considered the dissipation of a
Christmas sleighride the summit of delight, now
were wont to steal at midnight from the dormitory
where the watchful cares of the good father had seen
them quietly inurned, to waste their time and
health, and morals, and spend their money in revels,
that the sun saw and blushed at when he rose above
the golden tops of the eastern hills. The quiet
intrenchments
behind which our Dutch ancestors in
other quarters so strongly and obstinately maintained
their manners and habits, almost down to the present
time, were gradually sapped or stormed, and the good
Dominie Stettinius stood aghast to behold the
backsliding
propensities of the youths and maidens of his
hitherto obedient, docile flock.
He forthwith took arms to oppose this mighty
invasion
of his hitherto peaceful domainwe mean
such arms alone as comported with his age, his
habits, and his sacred function. Casting aside the
chastened zeal with which he had hitherto maintained
and enforced obedience among his quiet, simple
hearers, he arrayed himself in the mighty words of
reprehension, threatening, and denunciation; learned,
eloquent, and virtuous, he poured forth the stores of
his intellect and the enthusiasm of his soul in strains
of doric and affecting simplicity, that would have
done honour to the primitive reformers. But, alas!
what can the tongues of angels do, when example,
temptation, and opportunity knock at the threshold of
the human heart, peep in at the windows, and whisper
their seductions through the very keyholes? Some,
doubtless,and especially the more aged people,
whose passions reposed upon the memory of the
past,were checked by the pious eloquence of the
good dominie in their downhill career; but the
young, the thoughtless, and the madcap boys and
girls, many, very many of them long lived to rue the
day that saw the regiment of red-coats pitch its white,
innocent-looking tents among the rich meadows of
the matchless Hudson.
CHAPTER VI.
A Beau of the Old Regime.
Colonel Sydenham
was a veteran beau of the
old school, which, after all, I think was not a little
superior
to the present standard of dandyism. There
was a courtesy, a polish, a high-souled deference to
the ladies, which, whether originating in vanity or
a nobler feeling, was still the source of many
agreeable
qualifications, and formed a charming ingredient
in social intercourse. The little stiffnesses and
formalities
which accompanied this style of manners,
were certainly preferable to the careless, and abrupt
familiarity, or boorish neglect which a preposterous
deference to fashion has since consecrated as high
breeding and gentlemanly ease. The colonel had
served in India, which was a fortunate circumstance,
as it enabled him to ascribe his gray hairs, and
the evident debility of his person, to the effects of a
climate which, as he frequently observed, seldom
failed to produce an appearance of premature old
age. I was gray at twenty, said the colonel, who
would never use spectacles, or carry a walking stick
on any occasion, though never man stood in greater
need of both these useful auxiliaries. He was
always
deeply smitten with some youthful belle or
other, whose attentions he delighted to
monopolize
,
more from the gratification of an habitual vanity,
than from a warmer and nobler sentiment. On the
whole, however, he was a singularly agreeable man;
and in spite of his age, always made a figure, and
was welcomed in the society of both sexes. He
was soon in special favour with high and low, rich
and poor, young and old, with the single exception
of the good Dominie Stettinius, who penetrated his
easiness of principles, and was not inclined to
consider
good manners an equivalent for good morals.
The colonel early singled out Catalina as the
object
of his attentions. She was the fairest lady of
the land in which he sojourned; she was
unquestionably
at the head of the beaumonde; and she was
a great heiress in prospective, for she was the only
child of a man who owned land enough to entitle
him to vote at a German Diet. If it should happen
in the chapter of accidents, thought the colonel, that
this wood dove were to be softened by my
cooing
,
she will be worth marryingif not, there will
be no harm done. I am too much of a traveller to
pine at the wilful vagaries of a woman's heart.
Accordingly
he entered the field as Catalina's devoted
servant; and as the strict rules of military etiquette
forbade all interference with the commanding officer,
the dapper majors, captains, lieutenants, and ensigns,
always kept aloof while the colonel was making the
agreeable to the young lady.
That the young lady was not pleased and flattered
with the distinction of being the belle of the first
military man in the neighbourhood, who wore a red
coat, and tacked honourable to his name, is what we
will not say, for it would not be true. It would have
been out of nature to be insensible to such honours;
honours to which the gentle sex are prone to bow
down, because they are restricted from gaining any
other laurels than those which they pluck from the
brow of men. Their vanity and ambition can only
be gratified by leading in chains the conquerors of
others; by associating their name and their
destinies
with the master spirits who wield the powers
of the earth, or with those who inherit distinction,
as a fox does instinct, from a long line of ancestors.
The colonel and Catalina were on the best possible
terms, and in no long time, the good people of the
neighbourhood, who knew nothing of the attentions
and courtesies authorized in the intercourse of the
world, all agreed that it would be a match.
Among those who watched the progress of this
intimacy with bitterness of heart, was Sybrandt
Westbrook. The selfishness engendered by solitude
and abstraction, inclined him naturally to jealousy
of a most perverse and ridiculous kind. He
persuaded
himself that he neither had, or could ever
have, any pretensions to Catalina; nay, he would
have shrunk with shivering horror at the suspicion
that she ever suspected that his solitary hours and
silent reveries were full of her, and only her! Yet
he could not endure the remotest apprehension, much
less the sight, of any, the slightest marks of
preference
to another. When in her society, he kept
aloof, and left her entirely to the attentions of other
men; yet these very attentions cut him to the soul,
and the recollection of them poisoned his solitary
days and sleepless nights.
I do not wonder, as some have done, that women
like your gay and enterprising admirers, who never
put their timid delicacy to the task of making
advances
,
or offering undue encouragement to their
sheepishness. The province of the sex is to act
always on the defensive in the strife of love, and
nothing I should imagine is more provoking to
their pride, or painful to their delicacy, than to be
obliged to open their gates spontaneously, or even
step out of their intrenchments, to humour the
coward bashfulness, or stubborn pride, of one who
displays his affection by keeping at a distance, and
makes himself agreeable by utter neglect.
Catalina, notwithstanding the perverse behaviour
of Sybrandt, had a sort of intuitive perception,
which is common to women, and stands them in the
stead of wisdom and philosophy, that he had a
strange sort of abstract preference for her. This
idea gave him an interest in her eyes, which caused
her to watch him narrowly, at those times when she
was receiving the gallant attentions of Colonel
Sydenham
with encouraging smiles. On these
occasions
she fancied she could often detect the boiling
eddies rolling beneath the apparently unruffled
surface
of stupid indifference. Sometimes her vanity,
nay her heart was pleased with the discovery, for
she remembered that she owed her life to him, and
with all his strange and wayward neglect and
awkwardness
,
there were at long and rare intervals sparks
of intellect and spirit, which indicated the hidden
treasures
that lay buried beneath the rubbish of his
rustic
habits. Sometimes she resolved to try and bring
him forward in the society of the new comers, by
kindness and attention; at others she felt provoked
to make him the subject of ridicule, and more than
once, without a spark of illnature or malignity, she
planted daggers in his bosom. O ridicule!how
often does it in its thoughtless gambols fling
poisoned darts, and red hot shot, that blister where
they light! There are souls in this world, incrusted
with an outward shell of roughness or deformity, so
keen, so sensitive, that the pointing of the finger is
torturethe touch of scorn, madness. They sweat
with inward agonies, at the moment when pride and
timidity, so closely veil their feelings, that while
their very hearts are bursting, they exhibit to the
careless eye nothing but stupid insensibility, or
insufferable
pride. Such was this unhappy young
man, of whom at this period, it was doubtful whether
he would ever be known and properly appreciated,
even by the friend of his heart, or the wife of his
bosom; for he seemed destined never to be blessed
with either.
Though he kept as much as possible away from
the mansion-house, there were times when his
wayward temper carried him there almost in spite
of himself, or when the blustering, peremptory
gayety of Ariel would force him from his moody
solitudes into the pleasant social circle that was
almost always to be found at Mr. Vancour's. One
night a little party had collected there, consisting of
the gallant Colonel Sydenham, two or three of his
officers, the noisy Ariel, and the daughters of half a
score of the most substantial burghers of Albany.
A furious thunderstorm had come on in the early
part of the evening, and it was settled that the whole
party should remain all night where they were, to the
great delight of Uncle Ariel, whose soul expanded
with indescribable satisfaction at the thought of a
merry party and a social supper. These, or
something
like them, were the only stimulants that could
keep the good soul awake after the fowls had gone
to roost. The colonel happened to be describing a
dish of boiled fowl and rice common in the East
Indies
,
which struck Ariel's fancy wonderfully. He
disappeared shortly afterward, and continued to pass
in and out of the room occasionally, without being
particularly noticed by anybody, for he never could
be quiet when any thing was going forward about
the house.
Sybrandt, said Madam Vancour, with the
good-natured
intention of rousing him from the chaos of
stupidity in which he had remained bewildered for a
long time,Sybrandt, pray come and assist us in
finding out what this means. They had gathered
about the table, where was a number of books, into
which some were looking, while others were talking
about various matters.
'Tis Greek, said one.
'Tis Hebrew, said another.
'Tis High-Dutch, said a third.
'Tis Mohawk, said a fourth, and each one had
a different opinion.
Let me see, cried Ariel, who just at the moment
entered with a face as red as fire. He pulled out
his specs, rubbed them carefully, placed them across
his little snub of a nose, and planting himself in his
usual determined position, with his short, sturdy
drumsticks extended almost at right angles, began to
pore over the mystery. He could make nothing
of it.
Colonel, cried he to Sydenham, who had
rather
affected to be deeply engaged with Catalina,
Colonel, here, dn it, you understand Hindoo,
and all that sort of thing; interpret for us.
The rest joined in the entreaty, and the book being
handed to the colonel, he proceeded with great
gravity
to study it upside down.
Why, dn it, Colonel, shouted Ariel, you're
holding the book upside down. Here, take my
spectacles
;
I see your eyes begin to fail you as well as
mine.
The colonel would rather have marched up to a
loaded cannon, or stopped a red-hot ball, than use
spectacles in the presence of any living soul but his
valet, in whose discretion he placed unbounded
reliance. In his solicitude to remedy the blunder
so unceremoniously proclaimed by Ariel, he
unluckily
placed the cover of the book towards him,
while he rejected the spectacles with a smile and a
bow, both indicating he had no occasion for them.
Why, dn it, Colonel, shouted Ariel again, and
breaking into an explosion of laughter; why,
zounds, you've got the book with the back side
towards you this time. I insist on your taking my
spectaclesI'm sure they will suit you exactly
you and I are just about of an age. And he
continued
to press the colonel to accept of them, till the
good gentleman could hardly command his faithful
auxiliaries, the smile and the bow. It was,
however
,
a maxim with him, from which he had never
swerved for more than a score of years, never to
show either anger or mortification in company. He
contented himself with quietly handing the book to
Sybrandt, saying he must acknowledge his ignorance
of the passage, which, by-the-way, he had not been
able to distinguish, from the failure of his eyes.
But this was a secret he kept to himself, preferring
rather to be thought ignorant than blind. The whole
company gave him credit for affecting to be unable
to see merely to disguise his not being able to
interpret
the passage, which, as Sybrandt announced, was
nothing more than an English proverb, printed in
Greek characters, as we have seen practised, in the
way of a grave quiz, in some of the old specimens
of printing. There were few or no blue-stockings
in those days we are now describing; but in no age
of the world, and no class of mankind, was it ever
the case that learning and knowledge did not attract
respect. They are independent of the changing
fashions of place and time,so intrinsically useful
and respectable as to maintain their dignity at all
periods, and among all classes of people; since it
is impossible for the mind not to feel the obligation
of being made wiser than it was before. This little
incident raised Sybrandt in the scale of comparison
with the colonel, especially in the estimation of
Catalina
,
who inherited from her mother that decent
respect
for useful acquirements, which is one of the
best evidences of good sense.
The colonel's spirits seemed to flag not a little
after the adventure of the book, while those of poor
Sybrandt gained a corresponding elevation; for it is
the characteristic of such sensitive beings as he to
be about as unreasonably inflated as they are
unreasonably
mortified by trifles which to others seem
perfectly insignificant. A pause in the storm without,
and the conversation within, was interrupted by the
loud sound of voices in the direction of the kitchen,
a detached building about fifty yards in the rear
of the house, with which it was connected by
a covered way. The voices seemed to be
engaged
in hot contention; and presently Ariel came
bouncing into the roomhis face in a blaze
exclaiming
,
The old woolly-headed fool!she knows
no more about cooking than a Mohawk Indian.
The whole company expressed anxiety to know the
cause of this violent irruption; and Ariel accordingly
proceeded to explain.
CHAPTER VII.
An Invasion of State Rights.
There
reigned in the kitchen of Mr. Vancour an
African queen, whose authority, by virtue of long
and vigorous assertion, was paramount to that of the
mistress of the establishment and all other persons.
Her complexion was of the highest order of
perfection
,
according to the standard of Guinea; for
nothing
in the human shape or divine, not even the
personification of Madam Night, was so irresistibly
black as the skin of Aunt Nauntje, as she was called
by the family, young and old. She was the mother
of three generations of blacksI beg pardonof
people of colourwho all appertained to the
establishment
.
The boys at the time of their birth were
given to some one of the young white members of
the family, to whom they continued especially
attached
all their lives; and the girls were in like
manner considered the property of the young ladies,
who attended strictly to their conduct, and taught
them to be useful, as well as virtuous. They were
all treated kindly, and as a part of the family; and
there was something in the connexion of mutual
services
,
mutual good will, and mutual protection, thus
established, that made the relation of master and
slave, in those simple, honest times, one of the most
endearing and respectable of all those which subsist
between man and man. The slaves did not study
D
metaphysics, nor stultify themselves with
dissertations
on the relative claims of the two rival colours
of the present day; but they were far more happy,
virtuous, and useful both to themselves and society,
than the wretched victims of a rash and
miscalculating
philanthropy we see every day at the police
and the quarter-sessions. Their labours were not
more heavy than those of the owners of themselves
and of the soil which they cultivated; they worked
in the same fields, or at the same employments;
and when they had given to their master the fruits
of their youth and manhood, they found at his kitchen
fireside a refuge for the evening of their days.
They neither spent it in the poor-house nor the
penitentiary.
It was gratifying in those days to see the interest
which these old and faithful retainers took in the
affairs of their master, and the manner in which they
as it were identified their own characters and
consequence
with his. The master and mistress were
not afraid to go a journey, and leave the house in
charge of one of these; for they knew it would be
even more carefully attended to than if they were at
home. These poor people did not then, as they do
now, consider themselves in the light of a wronged
and injured race, whose right, nay, whose duty, it
was to resist, to run away, to defraud, to rob, or to
murder their masters, if it were necessary, in the
pursuit of freedom. The idea of a separation of
interests between them and their masters never
entered
their heads; and if it had, their hearts would
have rejected the suggestion. But to return to our
narrative.
Aunt Nauntje was despotic in that region which
among the enlightened of the present day is
considered
as the terrestrial paradise, in so far as it
pours forth the choicest of the blessings of this life.
Need I mention that I mean the kitchen? Where
she acquired her art I know not, but tradition says
that the dishes she concocted had a rich and
triumphant
relish, a rare
je ne sais quoi
, which tickled
the palate mightily, and seduced the worthy Ariel
into occasional imprudent feats of the trencher.
Nay, we record on the same venerable authority,
that Sir Henry Moore, his Britannic majesty's
governor, captain-general, and
locum tenens
in the
province of New-York, being on a visit to the
mansion-house
,
did incontinently luxuriate so lustily in
the delights of a certain nondescript dish, the art
of making which is lost in these degenerate days,
that he fell asleep before the dessert.
The active Ariel, among his other
accomplishments
,
such as grafting apple-trees, bleeding horses,
and ringing pigs' noses, was an amateur in the noble
art of cookery. He never could keep out of the
kitchen when there was a feast in preparation; and
many is the time Aunt Nauntje did violently expel
him, by dint of flourishing the gridiron, the
toasting-fork
,
or some such formidable weapon. Indeed,
something like a feud raged between them, ever
since Ariel had denounced her publicly, as a stupid
old fool of a Guinea nigger, for having committed
the enormity of roasting wild pigeons without any
stuffing.
When Ariel heard Colonel Sydenham describe the
famous East India dish of boiled chickens and rice,
which he did with a commendable minuteness, he
pricked up his ears, and thought to himself he would
go and make interest with Aunt Nauntje to surprise
the colonel with a fac-simile. Accordingly, as I
have before noted, he disappeared as soon as the
colonel had finished his detail, and sallied forth for
the empire of queen Nauntje, who was busily
engaged
in cooking a jolly, old-fashioned meal, for a
company of healthy, hearty folks, who had dined at
one o'clock, and could therefore afford to eat supper.
The inroad was by no means agreeable to her
majesty
,
but respect for the brother of her good master
always kept her within bounds, except on the spur
of some immediate cause of irritation.
Aunt Nauntje, my good soul, said Ariel, I want
you to try your hand at a famous dish I have just
heard of from Colonel Sydenham.
Ah, said Nauntje, Massa
Auriel
always some
crinkum-crankum in he head, 'bout new dishes. Well,
what is he?
Why, a dish of boiled fowl and rice, dressed with
curry. You know the colonel gave you a bottle the
other day.
Nauntje began to spit. Curryeh!stuff just
fit for a hog or an Indian.
Well, but you know, Nauntje, said Ariel,
coaxingly
.
You know, dn it, you are not obliged to
eat it. Now do, my dear soul, try, for the sake of
the colonel, will you?
Colonel, ah!wish him a hundred miles off, wid
all he crew of red coats; eat massa out of house an
hum bum-by.
Well, but your mistress will be pleased with it
come now, you clever old soul, and the next time
I go to Albany, I'll bring you a new pipe, a paper
of tobacco, and a row of pins.
To please her mistress, and get the reward
promised
by Ariel, Aunt Nauntje at length consented to
try her skill at the outlandish dish, and Ariel was
delighted beyond measure. He was in and out of
the kitchen every five minutes, giving directions and
finding fault, until it was with great difficulty she
refrained
from having resort to the gridiron or the
toasting-fork. As it was, she almost broiled with
indignation at this attempt to overrule and insult her
in her own proper dominion. At length the great
attempt was nearly brought to a crisis, and Ariel
solicited and obtained permission to taste the
eminent
concoction. But what pen can depict his
indignation
,
when he discovered that in spite of all his
cautions and injunctions Aunt Nauntje, who had a
passion for onions, had poisoned the whole affair by
a most powerful predominating infusion of that
ungenteel
vegetable production. Ariel was confounded,
thunderstruck, and indignant. He ejected the
villanous
compound into the fire, exclaiming
I'll be shot if the stupid old fool hasn't put onions
in it!
Whereupon Aunt Nauntje forgot the new pipe, the
paper of tobacco, and the row of pins. She seized
the mortal gridiron, pursued Ariel with a speed which
seemed almost supernatural when contrasted with
her appearance of extreme old age, and drove him,
as we have before related, triumphantly before her
into the parlour; at the door of which she stopped
for a moment brandishing the gridiron, and then
retired
grumbling to her strong-hold again. It is due
to the reputation and the memory of Aunt Nauntje
to state, that the dish was brought up with the rest
of the supper, and pronounced by the colonel to be
equal to any thing of the kind he had ever tasted in
India: by which righteous decision he for ever
established
himself in the good graces of that
high-seasoned
and high-seasoning divinity. The supper
went off gayly, in spite of the discomfiture of uncle
Ariel, who soon recovered his good-humour, for he
was not one of those impracticable churls who
quarrel with the good things of this life and retain
their anger at the same time they are gratifying their
appetites. He threw out broad hints concerning the
colonel and Catalina, every now and then favouring
that young lady with a significant wink or ahem!
worried poor Sybrandt out of the little
self-possession
he had been able to collect together, by
recollecting
every thing the youth wished to be forgotten;
shouted, laughed, and finally talked himself fast
asleep in the old high-backed, well-stuffed chair,
which with its fellows had been heirlooms in the
family for almost a century. The worthy Dominie
Stettinius was heart-struck the next day, when he
learned that the party had prolonged its sober revels
until the clock actually struck the half-hour between
eleven and the very witching time of midnight.
A little incident, apparently of no consequence,
which occurred this evening had a material, nay, a
controlling, influence on the future life of Sybrandt
Westbrook. As the party separated for the night
the gallant colonel besought Catalina to bestow on
him a little bunch of violets she wore in her bosom.
In the gayety of her heart, or perhaps influenced
by that little mischievous imp, demon, or godhead
who is for ever found nestling in woman's heart,
she bestowed the violets on Sydenham, with a
most gracious and seducing smile, wishing him at
the same time pleasant dreams. The gift, the
smile, and the wish were each one a dagger of
ice planted in the bosom of Sybrandt, poisoning
his rest and agonizing his feelings. The wakeful
tortures of that livelong night gave birth to a fixed
determination, which he carried into execution
without
delay.
CHAPTER VIII.
Our Hero, for the first time in his life, comes to a determination.
The
life of jealousy, mortification, and
self-reproach
he had led almost ever since the return of
Catalina from the boarding school gradually
undermined
the natural strength and vigour of Sybrandt's
intellect
,
and produced that alternation of pride, anger,
and self-reproach which is the parent of a thousand
inconsistencies. The resolution taken under the
dominion of pride or anger is abandoned under that
of self-reproach; and thus the life of such a being
is little else than a series of offences and
atonements
.
No permanent resolution can ever result
from such a state of mind. Tossed about in the
tempest of conflicting passions, the unhappy man
remains a vessel without rudder or pilot, until finally
some one acquires the mastery, and a settled
determination
is indicated by a hidden air of quiet and
repose.
It was thus with Sybrandt. The little incident of
the violets put an end to the struggle which he had
sustained for some months past, and his resolution
was irrevocably taken. In the days of which we
are speaking, the young men bordering on the
frontiers were accustomed almost universally to
commence the business of this world with a trading
voyage among the savages of the borders. Previous
to assuming the port and character of manhood, it
was considered an almost indispensable obligation to
undertake and complete some enterprise of this
kind, replete with privations and dangers. The
youth went out a boy and returned a man, qualified
to take his place among men, and to aspire to the
possession of the object of his early love. It was in
this way that the character of the patriarchs of this
country was formed; and by these means that it
exhibited a union of homely simplicity, manly
frankness
,
and daring enterprise, which at length found
their reward in the achievement and possession of
liberty.
Without consulting any human being, the
morning
after the supper we have just recorded, he
abruptly requested of Mr. Dennis Vancour the
permission
and the means to make an adventure among
the Indians of the north-west. Mr. Dennis was not
astonished, for he was a genuine Dutchman; but he
was much surprised at this abrupt application.
Why, hang it, boy, said the good man, what
is the use of it? You know you will have enough
when I am goneand while I live you can want
nothing
.
You had better stay at home and study with
the Dominie.
But I cannot study nowIand here
Sybrandt
faltered and was silent.
What, you are tired boy, hey? well, I don't
much wonder at it. I always had a great respect
for learning, but somehow or other I could never get
over the awe with which it inspired me; I always
kept at a distance from it. But are you determined?
won't you flinch, boy, when it comes to the point?
Never fear me, uncle,and he clenched his
fingers involuntarily,never fear me!
Well, then, you shall have what you ask of me.
I like thy spirit, boy. It was so I began life, and so
shall you. Fifty years ago I took a canoe and fifty
dollars' worth of goods, and old Tjerck, then but a
lad; and away I went right into the woods, where at
that time, I believe, no white man had ever been
before
me, and returned alive. The Indians were not
such good hands at making bargains as they are
now, and I returned with five hundred dollars' worth
of furs. I repeated the like every year, increasing
my capital each voyage, until I grew rich for the
times. I might have been happy, too, perhaps,
continued
the old man, but I must needs go to
New-York
,
where I fell in company with the king's
officers
,
and what was worse, fell in love with your
motherspent my fortuneruined my hopeswas
first fool and then misanthropereturned to my
father's house a disappointed prodigalinherited a
portion of my father's estate, and finally found in the
son an object for that love which the mother had
rejected
.
Mr. Dennis Vancour had never been equally
communicative
with Sybrandt before. Perhaps the idea
of parting with the boy of his adoption had opened
his heart, and for a moment overcome his long habit
of silence.
But who shall go with you? resumed the good
man, after a pause, which each had employed in
calling up recollections of the same dear object.
I have itold Tjerck is the very man.
I am afraid he is too old, sir.
Not henot he, boyhe is as tough as hickory
he'll tire you out, and starve you out, any time, I
warrant you. Besides, he speaks the Mohawk
language
.
So it was settled that old Tjerck should be
the squire of our new errant of the woods and wilds.
A few days sufficed for preparations for this toilsome
and perilous voyage and journey. As many Indian
goods as could be conveniently stowed in a light
bark canoe, a small quantity of provisions, two
rifles, or perhaps muskets, with the necessary
ammunition
,
and two stout hearts constituted the outfit
for this wayfaring in the wilderness. My readers,
if they belong to the better sort, will think this but
a paddling affair for the hero of a story; but let them
recollect that it was a dangerous enterprise, and that
courage and daring ennoble every honest
undertaking
.
From the moment Sybrandt formed the resolution,
and commenced the preparations aforesaid, he seemed
to be a new man. He had something to do, and
something to suffer worthy of a man. He had
action
,
enterprise, excitement, to call his attention from
his own selfish and petty vexations, and now he
walked erect with spirit in his step, determination in
his eye. In short, he presented an example of the
indissoluble union between the man and his
purposes
.
The one is fashioned by the other; and
nothing
is more certain than the contamination of eternal
trifling. All this time he went not near Catalina;
and it was only when thinking of herwhich he did
pretty oftenthat he relapsed into his old habitual
inconsistencies, and felt himself, as it were, becalmed
between too conflicting objects. He certainly had a
great curiosity to know what she said or thought of
his going away; wondered whether she would not
regret his absence; and secretly tried to persuade
himself that she would understandwhat he had
taken all possible pains to keep from herhis
motives
for acting as he did. He thought to himself,
that if she would only pine away a little in his
absence
,
he would forgive her on his return. At one
time he determined to depart without seeing her; at
another he determined to take leave of her with the
most sovereign indifference; and finally, he came to
no determination at all. In this state he was found by
Ariel, who was highly out of humour at having had
nothing to do in the equipment of Sybrandt. It was
the first pie that had been made in the
neighbourhood
for many a year, in which he had not had a
finger.
Dl take it, quoth he, why didn't you ask
my advice; why, I would have shown you how to
paddle your canoeto cook venison without salt
sleep with your mouth shut, to keep out the gnats
and mosquitoesand shoot an Indian. But it's too
late now; I've a great mind to go with you on
purpose
,
only I've promised the officers to show them
how to ring pigs' noses. So saying, he dragged
him away half-willing, half-reluctant, to the
mansion-house
.
When Catalina heard of the contemplated
adventure
of our hero, she mused in silence on the
subject
for hours, without being able to decide whether
to be angry or sorry. She never dreamed that her
own conduct had influenced his determination, and
therefore ascribed his omission to apprize her of what
was going forward to neglect and indifference.
Under this impression she determined to treat him
accordingly; to meet him if he came at all without
any appearance of surprise or regret at his sudden
resolution. She received him without expressing
either, or betraying a single spark of curiosity or
solicitude
about the length of his stay or the course of
his voyage. She even jested on the subject, and
begged him to exercise his scholarship on teaching
the Indians Greek and Latin; and stung him to the
very soul, by observing, with as pretty a sneer as
ever enthroned itself on the lip of beauty, that his
sojourning among the savages could not fail of
having the most favourable influence on their
manners
.
The interview became exceedingly painful to
Sybrandt
.
He would have given the world to be out
of the room, yet was riveted to the spot by that
mysterious
fascination which awkwardness and pride
and sensibility exercise over the power of motion.
He sat chained to his chair, by the withering spell
of mortified pride and despised affection. At last,
however, with a desperate effort, he arose and
muttered
his farewell. At that moment Catalina
remembered
that she owed her life to him, and that
he was going whence he might never return.
Sybrandt, said she, in a voice which these
recollections
had softened into kindness, what shall
I give you to remember me by in the woods? After
a moment's pause, she drew from her pocket,we
beg our fashionable readers to bear in mind, that this
was almost a hundred years ago,she drew from
her pocket a golden coinwe believe it was a Dutch
ducatand continued, with a tone and look of
saddened
vivacity, Take this: you can make a hole
in it, and tie it round your neck as a talisman against
Indian witchcraft. Farewell, cousin Sybrandt, and
rememberthatthat Dominie Stettinius will regret
your absence. Sybrandt took the piece of gold,
but he could not say farewell for the soul of him.
He thanked her, however, with a look so full of
meaning and sensibility, that she remembered and
wondered at it a long time afterward. Sybrandt
made a hole in the ducat, and tying it with a riband,
wore it from that moment next his heart.
CHAPTER IX.
The Wilderness.
Early
next morning, ere the tints of the bright
morning reddened the eastern sky, or the birds had
left their perches among the clustering foliage, all
things being ready, Sybrandt launched his light
canoe
on the smooth mirror of the Hudson, and assisted
by the dusky Charon, old Tjerck, paddled away
upward
,
towards the sources of that majestic river.
The first day they occasionally saw, along its low,
luxuriant borders, some scattered indications of the
footsteps of the white man, and heard amid the high,
towering forests at a distance in the uplands the axe
of the first settler, the crash of the falling tree, the
barking of the deep-mouthed hound, and the report
of a solitary, distant gun, repeated over and over by
the echoes, never perhaps awakened thus before. A
rude hut, the first essay towards improvement upon
the Indian wigwam, appeared here and there at far
intervals along the shores, the image of desertion
and desolation, but teeming with life and living souls.
As they passed along, the little half-clothed,
white-haired
urchins poured forth by dozens, gazing and
shouting at the passing strangers. Gradually these
evidences of the progress of that roving, adventurous
race, which is sending forth its travellers, its
merchants
,
its scholars, its warriors, and its missionaries,
armed with the sword and the Bible, into every
region
of the peopled earth, ceased altogether.
Nature
displayed herself naked before them, and the
innocent earth exhibited her beauties in all the
careless
,
unstudied simplicity of our first parents, ere the
sense of guilt taught them to blush and be ashamed.
There was silence on the earth, on the waters, and
in the air, save when the voice of nature spoke in
the whirlwind, the thunder, and the raging of the
river when the full-charged clouds poured their
deluge
into its placid bosom.
Night, which in the crowded haunts of men is the
season of silence and repose, was here far more
noisy than the day. It was then that the prowling
freebooters of the woods issued from their recesses
to seek their prey and hymn their shrill or growling
vespers to the changeful moon or the everlasting
stars, those silent witnesses of what mortals wish to
hide. As they toiled upward in the moonlight
evenings
against the current, which every day became
more rapid as they proceeded towards the falls, they
were hailed from the shore at intervals by the howl
of the wolves, the growling of the bears, and the cold,
cheerless quaverings of the solitary screech-owl.
When, tired with the labours of the day, they drew
their canoe to the shore and lay by for the night,
their only safety was in lighting a fire and keeping
it burning all the time. This simple expedient
furnishes
the only security against the ferocious hunger
of these midnight marauders, who never approach
within a certain distance, where they stand and
howl, and glare with their eyes, a mark for the
woodman
,
who takes his never-failing aim directly between
these two balls of living fire.
But the labours of our hero's voyage were far
greater than the dangers. He and his trusty squire
had to breast the swift current from morning until
night, and win every foot of their way by skill and
exertion combined. Sometimes the current swept
through a long, narrow reach, between ledges of
rocks that crowded it into increasing depth and
velocity
,at
others it wound its devious way by
sudden
,
abrupt turnings, bristling on every side with
sharp projections either just above or just below the
surface; and at others they were obliged to unlade
their light canoe, and carry its lading fairly round
some impassable obstruction. In this manner they
proceeded, winning their way inch by inchwatching
with an attention, an anxiety never to be relaxed for
a moment without the danger, nay, the certainty, of
the shipwreck of their frail canoe, the loss of their
cargo, and the disgrace of an unsuccessful voyage.
This last was what every young man feared beyond
all the dangers and privations of his enterprise. It
was a death-blow to his reputation, as well as his
future prospects; for not a rural damsel would
condescend
to waste a smile upon a youthful admirer
who had failed in his first adventure. The two
qualities
most valued among these good people were
courage and prudence; and it argued a want of both
of these when he lost his boat and his cargo, or
stopped short of a good market among the men of
the woods.
At length, after enduring what would demolish a
regiment of well-dressed dandies in these degenerate
times, on the fourth day, towards evening, they were
warned by a distant, dull, monotonous, heavy sound
of their approach to the falls of Fort Edward, as
they were then calledat that time a frontier
post.
Hark! massa Sybrandt, said Tjerck, as he
paused from plying his ceaseless paddle: hark!
I hear him.
Hear what? replied the other.
The falls, massa. Maybe we find some
Indians
dare to trade wid.
Sybrandt listened and could plainly distinguish
the leaden plunge of the river gradually becoming
more distinct as the canoe made its way up the
stream, which now began to whirl about in boiling
eddies
,
each crowned in its centre with a cap of
snow-white
foam. Turning a projecting point, they met
the full force of the current; which, spite of all
their efforts, jerked the bow of the light canoe
completely
round, and shot her, like an arrow from a
bow, out into the middle of the river. Finding it
impossible to proceed any farther in this way, they
landed and commenced the laborious task of
unlading
and carrying their merchandise and canoe
round the falls to meet the placid current above.
While thus occupied, they encountered a party of
Mohawks, who had come thither to fish, headed
by a chief called Paskingoe, or the one-eyed. He
was a tall, athletic savage, six feet high, of a
ferocious
appearance and indifferent character. He
had lost an eye in some drunken brawl; and having
mixed a good deal with the white men, exhibited
the usual effects of such an intercourse, in a
combination
of the vices of both races. Cunning,
avaricious
,
and revengeful, he still had sufficient
mastery
over his feelings to disguise them when
occasion
required, except under the influence of
intoxication
;
then his bad passions became
ungovernable
,
and his rage without discrimination or control.
It was said he had killed his own son in one of
these bloody paroxysms, under pretence that he
was undermining his influence with the tribe. He
was sitting with his party of four Indians besides
himself under the shade of a clump of pines that
nodded over the foaming torrent, when Sybrandt
and Tjerck, suddenly and unexpectedly to
themselves
,
came full upon them. The Indians had
seen them coming up the river afar off, with a
keenness
of vision they possess perhaps beyond even
the animals of the forest.
Welcome, brother, said the chief to Sybrandt.
Ah! Paskingoe, how you do? said Tjerck,
who had known him before. I no tink to see you
here; and I no glad neither, added he aside to
himself.
There was little ceremony practised in these
interviews
between the traders and the Indians.
Sybrandt
inquired for furs, and the chief asked what
he had to exchange for them. Finding that
Sybrandt
had brought with him two or three kegs of
that poison which has swept away the race of the
red men, and seems almost on the eve of doing the
same to the whites, Paskingoe became very earnest
with him to go to the junction of the Hudson with the
Sacondaga, where he said he had plenty of people
who would exchange commodities with him.
Tjerck shook his head, and Sybrandt paused.
What, is my brother afraid? said Paskingoe.
Is not the Mohawk the friend of the white man?
Men that are afraid should stay at home with their
wives, added he contemptuously.
I am not afraid; but
Huh! said Paskingoe; when I go to the
fort, I will tell them I met a white man who dared
not go to the Sacondaga, because he heard an old
owl screech; alluding to the shrugs and motions
of old Tjerck. My brother will get no beavers
unless he goes to Sacondaga. He will go home as
he came, and the young women will laugh at him.
Sybrandt thought of Catalina, and determined to
go with the chief. The Indians assisted him in
carrying his canoe and merchandise round the
portages
at Fort Edward and Glens Falls; and though
they cast many a longing look at the kegs of rum,
throwing out many shrewd hints at the same time,
they neither stole nor took any of it by violence.
At length, after a toilsome voyage, they reached
the junction of the two rivers, where neither was a
hundred yards wide. The mighty Hudson was
here a little pastoral stream, giving no promise of
his majestic after-course, or of the riches he was
destined to bear in future times upon his broad
bosom
.
Near the place of their uniting there were
vast tracts of low and wild meadows without trees,
coursed by the devious windings of the various
branches of the Sacondaga, which at that time
abounded with the finest trout. It was a wild,
solitary
region, entirely out of the usual route of
travellers
,
who either followed the course of the
Mohawk
river, or left the Hudson at Fort Edward, and
struck across the high hills to the end of Lake
George in the way to Canada. The nearest
settlement
was at Johnstown, towards the south, where
Sir William Johnson resided, and exercised that
sway over the tribes of Indians far and near which
still remains, and will remain for ever, a subject of
admiration and wonder.
There were neither Indians nor beaver-skins at
the station, as promised by Paskingoe, who, by
closely examining the grass, ascertained, as he said,
that the party had gone away a day or two before
towards the fishing-house. This was a small lodge
built on a little rocky elevation, just on the edge of
the vast meadows, and at the head of one of the
branches of the Sacondaga, by Sir William
Johnson
,
who sometimes came there from Johnstown to
hunt and fish. Paskingoe assured Sybrandt he
would find them not far from the lodge, which,
being
unoccupied great part of the time, the Indians
occasionally slept in when the weather was bad.
If any idea of danger crossed the mind of Sybrandt,
it was coupled with the conviction that if
Paskingoe
had any bad designs he could execute them
just as well where he was as at the place where
he wished him to go. He therefore consented to
accompany him, notwithstanding all the eloquence
of old Tjerck, who, by signs and looks, attempted
to dissuade him. Accordingly, early the next
morning, they embarked on the sluggish Sacondaga,
the Indians in their canoe, and Sybrandt with his
trusty squire in his, and paddled their way along
the devious windings of the lazy solitary stream,
that seemed a vast serpent asleep in the high grass
that skirted its banks. After proceeding some
miles they became, as it were, lost in the pathless
monotony of the vast meadows, which presented
in the hazy obscurity of a cloudy day no distinct
outline or boundary. The silence all around them
was as the silence of a winter's night, when the
wind is hushed to a freezing calm, save that the
dipping of the paddles, at measured intervals, was
heard, and scarcely heard, like the clicking of the
death-watch when all else is still. Sometimes at
rare intervals a solitary heron would raise his long
neck above the grass along the stream, and make a
strange discordant noise, which was echoed by the
Indians in mockery; but otherwise it was a dead
pause of nature; the world of sound was still, and
the world of sight presented nothing but a
landscape
of drear melancholy sameness, a sky of one
dim unvarying shade of motionless clouds.
Sybrandt felt his solitary situation, which became
gradually more disagreeable from his seeing, or
imagining
he saw, certain looks of equivocal meaning
pass between Paskingoe and his Indians. On one
occasion, turning suddenly round, he observed the
one-eyed chief shake his head in answer to an
inquiring
look of one of his companions, and point in the
direction where, peering above the dead level of the
meadow, stood the little rustic fishing-house.
Towards
evening they approached the head of the
navigation
of the stream, close by which stood the
building. For some time before the dull flashes of
the lightning, followed at lazy intervals by the
distant
chit-chat thunders, rumbling and muttering, had
indicated the approach of a storm. Gradually the
Indians plied their paddles at quicker and quicker
intervals, and so did Sybrandt and his squire, in order
to keep pace with them. At length, just as they
arrived at a little rude landing-place, where Sir
William
Johnson launched his canoe when going on a
fishing-match, the distant waving of the pine forest,
which here bordered in majestic gloom and grandeur
on the edge of the wide meadow, and the pattering
drops of rain, announced that the crisis was
approaching
rapidly. There was only time for Sybrandt to
cover his merchandise carefully, ere it came in
torrents
on the wings of a wind that laid flat the rank
high grass, and made the forest groan. The party,
both Sybrandt, Tjerck, and the Indians, made the best
of their way to the fishing-house, the door of which
was opened without ceremony, there being no one
in it, and no furniture requiring a guard.
CHAPTER X.
A Night Scene.
For
some time there was a dead silence among
the party. Paskingoe was moody, and Sybrandt,
seeing no traces of the Indians he expected to meet
at this spot, from time to time eyed him with looks of
suspicion. He could not help believing his designs
were at least questionable, nor disguise from himself
that he was entirely at the mercy of the Indians.
My brother thinks I have two tongues and two
faces, said the one-eyed chief at last, in a sarcastic
tone.
Sybrandt made no answer.
The white man, continued Paskingoe, raising
his voice, does not know what to say; he is afraid
to speak out. If I tell him the Indians and the
beavers
will come to-morrow, he will not believe me.
Why should I lie to him? Is he not a muskrat caught
in a trap?
Sybrandt felt it was true; he was completely in the
power of the Indian. Hardly knowing what to say he
continued silent. The evening was now setting in, and
the storm continued. The wind roared through the
pines, the lightning flashed almost incessantly through
the windows, accompanied by loud, angry peals of
thunder, and now and then the crash of a fallen tree
gave token of a triumph of the angry elements. The
uproar without was strongly contrasted with the
silence within. Paskingoe sat in moody silence
smoking his pipe; Sybrandt was occupied in no very
pleasing reflections on his awkward situation; and
old Tjerck, from long experience of the Indian
character
,
saw that mischief was at work in the breast
of the one-eyed chief.
Is not the white man and the black-white man
hungry? at length he said. Has he any thing
good in his canoe? Let him send for it, and we will
eat together.
Sybrandt had no disinclination to this proposal,
and Tjerck was despatched with one of the Indians
to bring in some provisions from the canoe. While
they were gone the one-eye ordered his people to
kindle a fire, which they did with some difficulty, and
the room at length became illuminated with the red
glare of the pine knots that hissed in the chimney.
In a little while Tjerck and the Indian returned,
bringing the provisions which our voyagers had laid
in, together with two guns which had been left in the
canoe. The eye of Paskingoe flashed fire.
Is the white man afraid of the bears and wolves
to-night?
I brought 'em for fear he get wet, said old
Tjerck. As the one-eye placed his blind side towards
them, Tjerck dexterously handed Sybrandt a knife
which he had concealed under his homespun linen
frock, and which the young man as dexterously hid
in his bosom. The meal being now prepared, they
sat down to partake of it. After finishing, the
one-eye
asked Sybrandt
Has the white man any fire-water in his canoe?
I have, replied Sybrandt.
After a pause of some minutes, the chief asked
Is it good?
It is.
Another pause ensued, which was again
interrupted
by the chief.
Has it never been to the spring? Our people
have been poisoned by the white man mixing too
much cold water with the fire-water.
It is very good, answered Sybrandt; and another
pause ensued.
When the white man comes among us, said
the chief, we offer the best we have. We don't
hide away our corn, and give him the husk. That is
what you white men call nigger.
No more nigger dan yourself? muttered old
Tjerck.
Some drink would be very good, said One-eye.
I am dry.
Tjerck politely handed him a horn-cup of water,
which he dashed on the floor, while his countenance
began to exhibit keen anger and impatience.
If the white man won't give, will he sell? The
Great Manitou has promised me some fire-water
to-night
.
I dreamed so last night.
You dream almost equal to Sir William Johnson,
replied Sybrandt, smiling. Paskingoe shook his
head.
No, no, said he, Sir William out-dreams me.
He dreamed away my best hunting-grounds; but I
only dreamed away his red coat. But will the white
man trade for some fire-water?
Sybrandt felt the peculiar delicacy of his situation,
thus buried alone in the depths of the wild solitudes
of the Sacondaga. He knew the danger of declining,
as well as complying with the wishes of Paskingoe.
To refuse entirely would be to provoke his violence;
to give him a moderate portion of spirits would
probably
only render him more eager for more, and
to afford the means of intoxication would be only
the prelude to violence and murder. During these
reflections, the anger and impatience of the whole
party became so evident, that he at length
determined
,
as the best alternative, to gratify them with a
small portion, in the remote hope that they would be
satisfied. He accordingly sent Tjerck for a bottle
which he had laid aside to treat the old man now
and then. Tjerck shook his head, and obeyed with
manifest unwillingness.
It is good, said One-eye, as he took a deep
draught, and handed it to the Indian next him. It
is good, but the water is very shallow; the Indian
sees the bottom too easily. And indeed, by the time
it had gone round the bottle was empty. Sufficient
had, however, been swallowed to waken the sleeping
demon that every drop of liquor conjures up in the
heart of an Indian. As it mounted into their brains
they became clamorous for more, and Sybrandt saw
that his life would fall a sacrifice to refusing any
longer. Accordingly a small keg was brought from
the canoe, and the Indians set in for a complete
savage
debauch. In a little time their howlings and
shoutings almost overpowered the uproar of the
elements
without, and their uncontrolled and
uncontrollable
animal spirits found vent in grimaces, boastings,
and antics of mingled ferocity and buffoonery. Their
eyeballs glared, they danced, and sung, and
flourished
their tomahawks and scalping-knives over the
head of Sybrandt, who stood in a corner, his right hand
in his bosom grasping his knife, in momentary
expectation
that that deep and never-dying hatred the
Indian cherishes for the white man would precipitate
them into some act of violence against him. He
kept his eye steadily and fearlessly upon Paskingoe,
who was now half-mad, recounting, with violent
gesticulations
,
and tones of crack-brained, ferocious
triumph
,
the number of white men he had butchered,
of their wives and children he had scalped, of their
homes he had burned. He told how he had gone
alone by himself to a town of the Hurons, which he
entered at midnight, and murdered every soul in one
of the wigwams, after which he retired without
leaving
any traces into the woods, and secreted himself.
The next night he came again, and murdered the
people of another wigwam, retiring as before into the
woods without being seen. The third night he was
watched, and pursued before he could achieve his
last triumph. But he related, amid the yelling
triumphs
of his companions, how he escaped from his
enemies, and brought home with him twenty-seven
of their scalps.
What white man could do this? cried he,
darting
his eye of malignant fire upon Sybrandt; What
white man would dare do this, even if his limbs were
not like those of a woman? The white man is a
coward and a liar; he cheats us of our lands, and
builds forts upon them, from behind which he shoots
us down like dogs. He thinks he is our master, and
that we are his black negroes, who have nothing we
can call our own. Then brandishing his
tomahawk
,
and dancing, and whirling himself round,
yelling
at the same time in concert with his companions,
he again went on:The white man cannot stand
before the Indian unless there is two to one. I know
itIPaskingoeI know it. At Cataragui I
buried
this tomahawk in the sculls of two of the
cowards
who were running away like deer. At
Hoshelega
I drank the blood of three bragging cowards; it
Vol. I.E
was pale and cold like that of a fish. At the great
water of Ontario I tore out their hearts, and every
where I go I drag their scalps smoking from their
quivering brains, and spit upon them, and grind
them under the soles of my feet. They could never
look me in the face, and so the cowards tried to
escape
the fire of my eyes by putting them out. But
they shall know me better with one eye than they did
with two. Ten scalps have paid for one of my eyes,
and ten more shall be paid before I sleep with my
fathers.
Gradually excited by the liquor and the stories of
these bloody exploits, the Indians and their chief
became
raving mad. They quarrelled and struck at
each other with their knives, and thirsted for blood
with the instinct of beasts of prey maddened by lust
or hunger. At length the One-eye shouted
Are we fools? Blood must be shed to-night,
but not the blood of the Indian. The Great Spirit has
sent the white man here to atone for the wrongs of
his people. Let him die!
Let us drink his blood!Let us scorch his
brain with red-hot coals!Let us tear out his
heart! shouted the yelling fiends, as they brandished
their weapons and came towards Sybrandt with
foaming mouths and eyes darting fire. At this
moment
the soul of the young man bowed to the
supremacy
of these accumulating horrors; but it sunk only
for a moment, and regained its level again. There
was no chance of retreat, and the very hopelessness
of escape nerved him to a cool and wary exertion of
his means of defence. He grasped his secret knife,
and looked round for his trusty Tjerck, whose dusky
form he saw at the moment vanishing out of one of
the windows on the opposite side of the room. Thus
left alone, he nerved himself for what might follow.
The Indians, with all their hardihood and daring, are
chary of their lives; although when it comes to the
point, no people of the earth die so coolly. But the
point of honour is to achieve their object with as little
loss as possible. They therefore advanced warily
upon Sybrandt, who stood as warily on the defence.
They approachedtheir knives and tomahawks were
raised to strike, and he was just about to spring upon
the one-eyed chief, when a loud, long war-whoop
was heard apparently close under the window,
quavering
amid the pauses of the storm.
Hush! 'tis the war-cry of the Adirondocks,
said Paskingoe.
The Indians suspended their purpose, and listened
with breathless anxiety. Nothing was heard but
the falling rain, the roaring of the forest, and the
rattling thunder.
The Adirondocks dare not come here; they
are women, said the One-eye, contemptuously.
Again they resumed their bloody purpose, and
again the shrill war-whoop sounded amid the
uproar
without, and checked them for a moment.
Sybrandt thought of retreating; but the single door
was barred by the Indians, who stood for a few
minutes expecting an attack from without.
Let us die like warriors, said Paskingoe, and
took another drink. His example was followed
by the others, and the renewed draught added fury
to their mad, malignant passions.
The white man is a traitor, they cried. He
has brought the Adirondocks upon us; and the
One-eye aimed a blow with his tomahawk that
Sybrandt
could not parry. He warded it from his
head, but it fell on his left arm, and disabled it
E 2
entirely. In dealing this blow, however, Paskingoe,
being somewhat unsteady with the liquor he had
drunk, stumbled forward, and met the weapon of
Sybrandt, which entered his bosom. He fell upon
the floor, and the rage of his party became still
more intense. They yelled like tortured fiends;
and, notwithstanding the cool determination of our
hero, a few moments must have decided his fate,
when, just at the instant that death hovered over him
at the very crisis when their tomahawks and knives
were about to let out his life-bloodthe door of the
fishing-house was violently burst open, and a tall,
majestic
white man in a hunting dress rushed into the
room, followed by half a dozen people. The arms
of the Indians, the moment they saw him, were
arrested, and their weapons remained suspended
above their heads.
CHAPTER XI.
A Woodman.
The
stranger addressed a few words in the
Mohawk
language to the stiffened warriors, with an air
of indescribable authority. They lowered their
weapons, and retired to the other extremity of the
room, to which he had waved them with his hand.
He then advanced towards Sybrandt, now become
weak with the loss of blood, and courteously asked
an explanation of the scene, which the young man
briefly gave. The stranger shook his head, and
exclaimed, in a desponding tone,
Rumrumrum! the shame of the white
man; the ruin of the red. What can I do with
these wretched people when my own do all they
can to undo what I have devoted my life to
accomplish
.
Then observing that Sybrandt leaned against the
wall, and was gradually sinking in his height, he
asked, anxiously,
Are you hurt, sir?
I believe I am, sir. I feel no pain, but my left
arm seems getting useless; and overcome by
weakness he sunk down upon the body of
Paskingoe
.
The master passion of the dying Indian for
a moment animated his waning strength. He
grasped his knife between his feeble fingers, and
raising his arm, unnoticed in the obscurity of the
dark corner, struck a delirious random blow with
the last expiring energy of despair. The knife
remained
sticking upright in the floor, and the Indian
chief died with the effort.
Who is that? cried the stranger.
Paskingoe, muttered one of his party; the
chief who gave you his lands, and whom you called
brother. Revenge him.
The stranger made no answer, but proceeded to
examine into the situation of Sybrandt, who had
fainted with loss of blood. He gave a key to one
of his attendants, who descended into the cellar, in
the wall of which was a secret recess where were
kept a variety of articles necessary to the various
privations and accidents incident to travelling or
sojourning far from the haunts of men and the
conveniences
of civilized life. The stranger applied
what was proper of these to the case of Sybrandt,
who in a short time recovered from his swoon, and
was accommodated with a mattress from the
receptacle
above mentioned. Having seen to all this, the
stranger turned to the Indians of Paskingoe's party,
who were standing in sullen silence, and demanded
the occasion of this fray.
The white man can tell you. He will make a
good story out of it. Ask him, said one of them.
Very well, replied the stranger, Take the
body of your chief away to his people, that they
may bury him. The storm is over. Go; and
when you have done this, come to me. I will see
justice done. Go, now, and take care what you
do. Take care!
The Mohawks placed the body of their chief on
a rude litter made of the sticks which had been
gathered to light the fire, and departed with
mournful
steps, shouting the monotonous death-song,
which gradually died away in the distance till it
was heard no more. The stranger then having
ascertained
that Sybrandt was in a deep, exhausted
sleep, directed all to be kept quiet, and carelessly
throwing himself upon the floor, with his cheek
supported
on his hand, soon fell into a quiet repose,
which was shared by all his companions, with the
exception of one, who was directed to watch the
slumbers of Sybrandt.
The morning dawned bright, clear, and refreshing,
finding all safe and well but our hero, whose ailment,
however, was nothing but weakness. He would have
risen with the rest, but his head grew dizzy, and he
obeyed the injunctions of the stranger to remain quiet
for that day at least.
We will pursue the amusement of hunting, the
object which in fact brought us here so opportunely,
and it shall go hard but you shall have some venison
for dinner. I would promise you trout too, but the
streams are too much swelled for fishing. Remain
quiet with your old servant, whom I have instructed
what to do, and to-morrow my people shall carry you
to my home on a litter of green boughs, which is
better than all the sedan-chairs. So saying, he
shook hands with Sybrandt, and departed, observing,
You have no fever, I see.
When they were left alone, Tjerck expressed an
honest, heartfelt pleasure at the miraculous escape of
his young master. I did all I could for young
massa, said he.
Yes, you ran away, said Sybrandt, who felt not
a little indignant at his desertion.
Aha! massa, said Tjerck, who you tink made
dat great war-whoop dat stop de rascal One-eye two,
tree minute, and save your life, hey?
I don't know; the Adirondocks, I suppose.
Old nigger! cried Tjerck, with uncontrollable
self-complacency, and laughing with all his might;
old nigger make it.
Sybrandt saw the whole plan, and thanked Tjerck
for the prompt diversion he made in his favour, which,
by giving time for the coming of the stranger,
undoubtedly
saved his life. He then gradually died
away into the slumber of weakness, while his black
guardian angel sat and watched him with the stillness
of a dead calm in the wilderness.
His repose was long and deep, and he awoke
refreshed and hungry. The stranger and his party
returned from their hunt with plenty of game, and
Sybrandt was allowed to partake sparingly of the
meal which was prepared. He had now leisure to
contemplate the person to whom he owed his rescue
from the drunken ferocity of the One-eye and his
party. He was apparently about fifty years of age,
with a form of the largest and most lofty
proportions
,
a deep ruddy, yet bronzed complexion, and a
countenance of a most singular combination of
expression
.
It united those indescribable yet
indelible
characteristics which seem inseparable from a
cultivated intellect, with the careless, fearless daring
of one whose life had been passed in the midst of
dangers and the enjoyment of unlimited sway. His
deportment, while it was easy and courteous to all,
betrayed a careless superiority, which both the
Indians
and white men seemed tacitly to
acknowledge
,
obeying implicitly every word he uttered,
every motion of his hand, and every glance of his eye.
His manner and mode of expressing himself
sufficiently
indicated that he had sat at good men's feasts
and been where bells had tolled to church, at the
same time that they were totally distinct from those
of the gentlemen Sybrandt had seen at the house of
his uncle. His motions exhibited the ease, facility,
and unembarrassed vigour of an Indian, and there was
a singular force, brevity, and richness in his
phraseology
that partook somewhat of the Indian manner of
expression. He wore a hunting dress equally
partaking
in the modes of savage and civilized man, and
indeed altogether exhibited a singular confusion of
the peculiarities of the two races. His deportment
towards Sybrandt was kind, at the same time that
his attentions were rather indifferent than very
particular
.
He took upon himself the direction of our
hero, his merchandise, and affairs, without
consulting
or seeming to think it worth while to consult
him.
To-morrow, at sunrise, said he, we shall set
out for home. My people will carry you and your
baggage. The canoe must be left where it is.
Then turning to his people, Rest, and be ready by
break of day.
In a few minutes all was quiet, though, with the
exception of Sybrandt, the floor was their bed, and
their pillow a knapsaek, a log, or perchance a stone.
In the dawn of the morning they set forth in a direction
nearly southwest, through a forest of pines, beeches,
and maples, such as nature produces but once on the
same soil, by the exertion of her unimpaired, youthful
energies. The solemn pines, straight as an arrow,
and without a single limb below a height of a
hundred
feet, seeming already shaped for the masts of
some mighty man-of-war, stood side by side, at
distances
leaving sufficient space unencumbered by
underwood
for the travellers to pass without difficulty.
But when, as it sometimes happened, their course lay
through a rich, juicy bottom land, a new creation
sprung up before them of beeches, maples, and
E 3
majestic plane trees, spreading and interlocking their
arms, and forming an impenetrable shade, only
to be visited by the bright rays of the winter sun
when the leaves fall and the branches are bare.
Beneath
their damp and gloomy reign sprung up a lesser
race of nature's progeny, consisting of shrubs, and
vines, and plants of every various name, mingling
and matting together, and forming a succession of
obstacles which only the strength, skill, and
perseverance
of a woodman might overcome.
The litter of boughs in which Sybrandt was placed
was carried alternately by the followers of the
stranger, and certainly a more easy mode of
conveyance
was never devised for an invalid. Rude, and
silent, and monotonous as was the forest through
which their journey lay, it was not devoid of gayety
or incident. Sometimes the keen eye of one of the
party would detect a black squirrel looking down
from the topmost branches of one of these towering
pines, and barking, as it were, in derision. The
leader would then propose some little prize for
bringing
it down with a single bullet, and without drawing
blood. A halt would then be made for the purpose
of disputing the prize. None but a woodman could
even distinguish these little animals among the dark
foliage of the lofty pines, clinging close to the limb,
and almost incorporating themselves with the rough
bark. Each took his turn, and the object was to
strike the bark of the tree with the ball directly where
it came in contact with the body of the squirrel, by
which he would be stunned, and fall to the ground
without any external wound. Few were capable of
this feat on the first trial, and loud were the shouts
that echoed through the forest at the successive
abortive
attempts. When each one had tried without
success, the leader would utter some little epithet of
contempt, bid them stand aside, and never fail to
bring the little animal down without breaking his
skin. So, if they met with any difficulties in their
march which the strength, skill, or intrepidity of the
others could not surmount, he took the lead and
labouring
oar, and conquered every obstacle of nature
by superior strength, management, or daring. It
was by frequent instances of this sort that the mystery
of his unbounded sway over his people was explained
to Sybrandt. The human character can only be
perfected
and consummated by the union of superior
knowledge and superior strength, directed and
animated
by a courage that dares all dangers, defies all
obstacles.
At midday they halted in an open space for the
purpose of rest and refreshment. On this spot,
said the stranger, carelessly, on this spot, about
fifteen
years ago, was fought a bloody battle between
the Hurons and the Mohawks. We were taken by
surprise and suffered dreadfully; but and his eye
kindled in triumph, we, I and my people, made
the cowards flee at last, and shot them down like
deer. The name and the nation was extinguished on
this spot at a single blow. History says nothing of
this; but if a bedrid king or superannuated queen
had died that day, it would have been carefully
recorded
.
The causes which change the destinies of
men and the face of the earth lie unseen and
unnoticed
,
while little things and little men are carefully
handed down to future times as mighty agents in the
vast business of the universe. Such is history, and
in fact tradition is no better. One conceals or
overlooks
the truth; the other tattles falsehoods. And
he mused for a little time, as if applying these
observations
to his own past experience.
CHAPTER XII.
The Woodman's Home.
On
the evening of the second day they arrived at
the residence of the stranger, a few miles from the
banks of the Mohawk river. It was a little embryo
settlement just struggling forth in the midst of the
vast empire of nature, and composed of log cabins,
the first remove from the bark huts of the Indians.
This is the capital of my kingdom, said the
stranger; it is a wide empire, not very populous;
but never mind, the time will come. He welcomed
Sybrandt to his housea large square edifice of hewn
pines, the interstices filled with mortar,with that
frank, careless hospitality characteristic of every
thing he said and did, and presented him to his wife
and children; the former an Indian woman, the latter
an evident mixture of wild and tame, the perfect
images of nature in her finest proportions.
Sybrandt remained at the house of the stranger
some weeks ere he entirely recovered from the effects
of his wound; and after his recovery, in truth, he
was in no haste to go away. It was evident, too, that
the stranger did not wish to part with him. It is
long, said he, since I have had a companion who
could talk with me on subjects connected with my
early habits and associations.
Our hero could not refrain from expressing his
surprise at seeing a person of his education and
accomplishments
thus voluntarily become an exile from
civilized society to mix with beings so different from
himself.
Why, I don't know, replied he, smiling; I was
tired of the labour of doing nothing. In my own
country I was a gentleman, but a gentleman without
fortune; and such a one, you know, cannot stoop to
be active and useful except in certain professions.
I was physically incapacitated for any sedentary
profession, for there is about me an impatience of
being still, a sort of instinctive longing for exercise,
fresh air, and freedom of action, that make me a
fitter companion for wild beasts and wild men than
for lords and ladies. They might have made a
soldier
of me; but my family was Jacobite, and neither
would we ask, nor the government grant me a
commission
.
I might have gone into a foreign service;
but the truth is, I had some qualms about one day or
other perhaps being obliged either to fight against my
own country, or desert the standard under which I had
voluntarily enlisted. It happened that an intimate
friend of mine was appointed governor of this
province
,
and the thought struck me that I should have
plenty of elbow-room in the new world, and plenty
of exercise for my ungovernable propensity to
activity
in hunting deer, wrestling with bears,
skirmishing
with the Indians, and other rural amusements.
I proposed to accompany him, and he accepted me
as a companion, under the character of his private
secretary. On our arrival in New-York he desired
me to sit down and write an account of our voyage
and safe arrival to the colonial secretary. Before I
had half finished there was an alarm in the house
that a bear had made his appearance in one of the
markets, or perhaps, as I believe was the fact, in the
only market in the city, which I suppose has grown
very much since. I threw down my pen, sallied
forth in the crowd, and after a smart skirmish with
Sir Bruin, actually killed him with my own hand.
I was excessively proud of this exploit. `I
suppose
you expect to be brevetted,' said his excellency,
smiling. Then shaking his head, he added, `I see
you won't do, my good friend. You are cut out for
a mighty hunter before the Lord, like honest
Nimrod
,
and not for a secretary. Have you an
inclination
to go as resident minister among the Mohawks,
and become the bear-leader, or, in more classic
phrase, the Lycurgus of these wild Spartan
warriors
?'
He then explained to me, that the government
had directed him to establish, if possible, an agency
somewhere on the banks of the Mohawk, for the
purpose of acquiring an influence over these warlike
tribes, for whose good graces the governors of
Canada
and New-York had been for a long while
contending
.
`What say you, my friend?' said he; `I think
you are the very man. You are about half Indian
already; and if you can only make them half white
men, you cannot but agree admirably!'
The idea caught my fancy wonderfully; and I
accepted the offer without hesitation. You, who
have lived so near the confines of the dominion of
Nature, and mixed with her sons, need not be told
the particulars of my coming here, the privations and
dangers I encountered, and the obstacles I met and
overcame. We shall talk over these some other
day. I have already sat still here longer, I believe,
than I have done at one time these ten years. So
come, Westbrook, 'tis a fine day for a hunt; and
you are well enough to join in it.
He then whistled his dogs, who came wagging
their tails, as much delighted as their master
furnished
Sybrandt with a gun, and his eldest son, a
boy about ten years old, with another, and after
making all necessary preparations, called his wife,
an agreeable-looking Indian woman, with a voice as
soft as a flute, and an eye like an antelope.
Sakia! She is an Algonquin, said he to
Sybrandt
,
and her name translated into English is
`love.'Sakia, we shall return before night. See
that you have something good ready for us. Sakia
went her way smiling and good-humoured as a
child.
She is my wifemy good and lawful wifeand
the mother of all my children. I never had any
other, and I never wish to have. You look as if
you wanted to express your wonder that I have not
brought a civilized European lady to share my
solitude
.
But, in truth, what would such a one have
done here but fret away her soul into vapours, and
pine herself to death, and hang a dead weight upon
me and my purposes. Not one in a million of the
fine ladies I formerly associated with would have
consented to accompany me in the wilderness; and
if she had, 'tis a million to one she would have made
herself as wretched as she would have made me.
She could not hunt like me; and her lonely hours
would have been imbittered by perpetual ennui or
perpetual fears. Still less would an ignorant,
vulgar
white woman have suited me as a companion.
The ignorance of the Indian is neither troublesome
nor offensive, like that of civilized life; nor is it
accompanied
by that grossness of manner and clumsy
carriage, characteristic of hard labour. An Indian
woman is always graceful; and the sweetness of her
voice makes amends for all that is wanting in
sentiment
and expressionor rather it is both sentiment
and expression combined. No, no, young manif
you ever come to live in the woods, marry a
wood-nymph
.
You might as well bring a dancing-master
here as a fine lady. But come; we are wasting
time. Take care you don't mistake me for a wild
animal, when we get into the woods, and shoot me.
Here, Will, do you go ahead, my boy; and if old
Snacks don't behave herself, take a whip to her.
I give my boys the lead, said he, addressing
Sybrandt
,
whenever it can be done with safety. It
makes them brave and manly.
Our party soon buried themselves in the pathless
woods, and continued onward till they struck the
banks of a little lake, whose waters were of crystal,
and in whose bosom the surrounding verdant banks
were reflected with a thousand new and nameless
beauties, just as the imagination heightens and adorns
the realities of nature.
Let us sit down here awhile, said the stranger.
You seem tired. Or, if you like, you can stay
here and fish, while Will and I skirt round the lake
with our guns. I have brought fishing-tackle with
me.
Sybrandt chose this alternative, being somewhat
tired; and the stranger and his boy departed with
the dogs, to make the tour of the lake, which seemed
some half a dozen miles in circumference. Lay
your gun where you can reach it, in case a deer or
a bear comes by, hallooed he from a distance, just
as they vanished in the woods.
Influenced by the scene before him, which threw
a charming quiet and repose over his whole soul,
Sybrandt, instead of engaging in the sport of fishing,
continued to contemplate the unadorned, unsullied
beauties of nature in this her wild, secluded
paradise
.
The crystal waters lay sleeping within the
green-fringed curtains of their waving banks, and
not a sound, an echo, or a motion disturbed the
deathlike quiet of the landscape. The world, as it
presented itself at that moment to his eye, was
composed of the sky above, the little lake and its
green border beneath; all beyond was shut out from
the view. The axe had never opened a vein in the
bodies or limbs of the primeval forest, that giant
progeny which exhibited the product of the first
energies of mother earth; nor had her bosom ever,
in this lonely region, been seared by the hand of
man. Life itself seemed extinct, except in the
beating of Sybrandt's pulses, and the myriads of
little fish that sported in the transparent waters,
and turned their silvery sides ever and anon to the
bright beams of the god of day. Sybrandt little
thought, at that moment, that a few years, a single
generation would scarcely pass away, before this
region of the dead, or rather of those who never
had an existence, would spring, as if by magic, into
life and animation; that its silence would pass
away before the babbling tongues of all ages, and
almost all countries; that languages and men would
congregate within these now melancholy woods, that
never met before in any spot of all the earth; and
that the Promethean touch of courage, enterprise,
activity, energy, and perseverance would here
perform
,
in almost less than no time, the far-famed
ancient
miracle of animating the lifeless clod into
motion and intelligence.
So thought not Sybrandt. He thought of the
past and of the future, as they concerned himself
and his own affairs. They became concentrated
in his recollections and anticipations, his hopes and
his fears, his sufferings and his enjoyments. That
selfish loneliness which formed so large a portion
of his habits and his character here came over
him with renewed force, curdling and stagnating his
feelings and sympathies, except as they referred to
himself alone, and to his own exclusive objects and
pursuits. With these Catalina was so intimately
associated, that he never thought of himself without
thinking of her. There was more than usual
mortification
and sadness connected with his present
associations; for solitude is ever the nurse of
melancholy
musings, imaginary woes, and foreboding
apprehensions. In connexion with Catalina, he
recollected
little from which he could derive any
gratification
,
or on which memory could exercise its
powers of exaggeration to any other purpose than
to increase and give energy to his bitter impressions.
On the contrary, every smile of ridicule, every real
or fancied indication of her indifference, dislike, or
contempt, arose one after another before him, like
malignant spectres, pointing their skinny fingers,
and grinning in supernatural scorn. His face
became
flushed, his heart beat, and the drops of agony
started from every pore, as one by one he recurred
to the long item of imaginary neglects or insults he
had endured, and again voluntarily inflicted upon
himself the real mortifications they occasioned.
As he sat thus, as it were, eating of his own soul,
and banqueting on the bitter bread of wounded
pride and sensibility, his fishing materials remained
unnoticed at his side, and he neither heard the loud
music of the hounds, nor the report of the stranger's
gun, from time to time echoing through the woods.
His reveries were at length interrupted by the voice
of the stranger, sounding cheerfully in his ear, and
awakening him to a perception of reality. He came
laden with a variety of game, and exclaimed, as he
advanced,
Come, let us away home. I have plenty of
game, and you, I dare say, plenty of fish. We shall
have a glorious dinner, and glorious appetites. Let
us see what you have caught.
Nothing, said Sybrandt, colouring a little.
Nothing! O, thou idle or unskilful piscator,
what hast thou been doing?
Thinking, said the youth, with a sigh.
Thinking! what has a man to do with thought
among the Indians and wild beasts? Action, boy,
action is the word here in my empire of shade.
Were I to spend my time in thinking, I and my
little ones would starve. I have half a mind to
give you no dinner to-day.
I have thought away my appetite already, said
the other, somewhat sadly. The stranger eyed him
with a glance of keen inquiry.
Young man, said he, seriously, you are a
scholar; I have found out that already. But your
education, I doubt, is not quite finished. I shall put
you through an entire new course, and make a man
of you, as well as a scholar. In a few weeks
there will be a meeting of the Mohawks at my
court. Until then you will have no opportunity to
dispose of your merchandise to advantage; and I
know well that an unsuccessful Indian trader can
never rise among the frontier men, because he is
supposed to want both courage, conduct, and
perseverance
.
You must therefore stay with me till
after my grand council, and I shall have time to turn
over a new leaf with you. You want action, and
you shall have it. What say you?
My friends will be uneasy at my long absence.
O, if that is all, I am to send a messenger to
Albany in a few days, and he will carry a letter for
you. So that objection is got over.
Nobody cares about seeing me, thought Sybrandt.
What say you; is it a bargain? said the
stranger.
It is, said the other; and the matter was
decided
.
And now for home. O how gloriously
hungry I am! and they hied them towards home
with long and hasty strides.
The day was far spent when they arrived at the
door of the stranger, and found every thing prepared
for them as he had directed. His Indian wife received
him with a smile of gladness, and the children
flocked round to welcome him, and admire his game.
There was little appearance of sentiment, but much
good-humoured frankness in the meeting.
Will you have a book to occupy the evening,
said the stranger, when the night had set in. I
have books, but in truth I seldom read them now.
They make one lazy and unfit for action. But I
have no objection to your reading.
I had rather hear you talk, said Sybrandt.
Looking round and perceiving the Indian wife was
absent on her domestic duties, he added, May I
inquire if you don't find your time hang heavy on
your hands sometimes, for want of the society you
have been accustomed to?
Why, no, replied the other; I cannot say I do.
I am never idle in body or mind. Both as a matter
of necessity as well as amusement, I hunt almost
every day, which gives me appetite, occupation, and
rest when I lie down at night. Besides this, added
he, smiling, I exercise dominion over men; I
influence
at least, if not direct, the affairs of an invisible
people, as it were, hid in these woods; and this gives
sufficient occupation to my mind. There is no study
more interesting than man, and of all mankind the
savage affords to me a subject of the greatest novelty
and interest. It is curious to see how different, yet
how much alike are the civilized and savage races
of men. One is a bear-skin in its rough natural
state, the other the same skin decked on the edges
with red cloth and porcupine quills. The animal
it covered is still nothing but a bear.
You are no admirer of the animal, it seems, in
either of its forms, replied Sybrandt.
You are mistaken; I think him a decent sort
of animal enough, and have no quarrel with my
fellow-creatures
,
though I came hither to live in the
woods that I might enjoy perpetual exercise without
actual hard work, and perpetual excitement without
ruining myself at the gaming-table, or ruining others
for the purpose of keeping myself awake all day.
Yet I should suppose you would sometimes feel
lost for want of the ordinary intercourse of social
lifethe interchange of thoughtnay, the conflict
of opinions and interests, which keeps the world
going on its axis round and round for ever and ever.
I am not always alone; the Indians sometimes
visit me; but to be sure they are no great talkers,
except when they make a set speech, when, I assure
you, they cut a most respectable figure as orators.
But there is never any want of conflicting opinions
and interests when the Indian and the white man
come in contact. I fear they will never agree. I
sometimes almost despair of being able to
consummate
the plan which has gradually opened itself to
my mind during my residence here, and is now
become
the leading object of my life.
May I ask what it is? said Sybrandt.
To bring the Indians into the circle of civilized life.
I cannot but see that if they remain as they are, a
distinct
,
discordant ingredient in that great frame of
social life which is now spreading itself in every
direction, and will one day, I believe, comprehend the
whole of this vast continent, they must perish.
Nothing
can save them but conforming to the laws, and
customs, and occupations of the whites. I have
endeavoured
to prepare them gradually for this, and for that
purpose have endeavoured to gain their confidence,
and establish an influence over them. I have
succeeded
to admiration, and beyond all other white men,
with the exception, perhaps, of some of the Catholic
missionaries. Yet the truth forces itself on me
every moment of my life, and I cannot shut my eyes
to itthis influence is founded not on my superiority
in the qualifications of a civilized man, but on my
capacity to excel even the Indians in war, in hunting,
in fatigue, privations, and endurance of every kind.
This is the secret of my power. In proportion as I
become a savage the savages respect meno more.
The stranger then proceeded to relate a variety
of anecdotes illustrative of Indian habits and modes
of thinking, all calculated to establish this opinion,
and indicating that instinctive insurmountable
wildness
of character which rendered and yet renders
the labour of winning this race into the fold of
civilization
,
so dear to humanity, an almost hopeless task,
which even the ardour of faith and the zeal of
philanthropy
is sometimes tempted to abandon.
CHAPTER XIII.
The Kings of the Woods.
The
preceding conversation was interrupted by a
slight tap at the door, which was straightway opened,
and, to the no small dismay of Sybrandt, the party
of Indians whose chief had fallen on his dagger and
died at the fishing-house, headed by a new chief,
silently entered the room in which they were sitting.
The stranger received them with courtesy, and
motioned
them to sit down. They obeyed, and
remained
without speaking, while they eyed Sybrandt
with glances of keen malignant meaning.
My children come as friends? said the stranger.
The red children still love their father, replied
the chief; but they come to tell him he has a snake
in his wigwam which they must kill, and take out his
teeth.
The stranger started, and turning aside to
Sybrandt
,
said, How unthinking I have been! I
should not have detained you a moment here, after
you were able to travel: but fear not; I am your
security
that not a hair of your head shall be touched
while I carry mine on my shoulders. Then
turning
to the chief, he replied to him as follows:
I understand thy meaning.
'Tis well, said the other.
To-morrow I shall inquire into this affair.
The serpent must go with us to-night. I have
promised the wife and mother of Paskingoe they
shall sing the song of joy to-morrow, at the rising
of the sun. The Indian does not lie.
He is my friend; he is under my protection.
He cannot be the friend of our white father and
the enemy of his red children.
He killed Paskingoe in his own defence.
Paskingoe
and his people were mad!
Who made them so? The young serpent and
his fire-water. He must go with uswe want him.
He shall not go. I cannot give him up.
Then you are no longer our father, replied the
chief. You have told us you were our friend, but
it is only the white man's talk. He is never the red
man's friend when the white man is a party.
Stay till the morning, said the stranger,
apparently
greatly perplexed, stay till the morning,
and I promise you shall go away satisfied.
It is good, said the chief, we will stay. But
will the young serpent stay too?
He shall; he will not run away like a deer.
It is good, said the Indian, and they lighted
their pipes and continued to smoke for some time in
silence.
This colloquy was carried on in the Mohawk
tongue, but Sybrandt easily comprehended its object,
and it may be supposed his feelings were by no means
enviable. He remained perfectly passive, however,
justly conceiving his interference would only produce
additional irritation in the minds of the Indians.
At length they finished their pipes, and the chief
said to the stranger, Can we remain in our father's
wigwam to-night?
Will the young white man be safe till
to-morrow
?
He will, unless he tries to run away.
The stranger made no reply, but led the way to
an upper room, where the Indians laid themselves
down on the floor, and soon slumbered in that
profound
quiet characteristic of their race.
An interesting discussion ensued between
Sybrandt
and the stranger, in which the latter proposed
to aid his escape that night, by furnishing him with
a guide and a canoe, and detaining the Indians in
the room where they were sleeping till he was far
enough not to be overtaken.
And what will be the consequence? said
Sybrandt
;
the savages will never forgive you. They
will become your enemies, and if they do not
murder
you, your wife, and children, you will lose
your influence over them from this time. No, sir
the great plan you hope to accomplish shall not be
ruined for my sake. I am determined to remain
and meet what may come.
Faith, you are a fine fellowsomething more
than a scholar, I see. Be it so. But I here pledge
you my honour, no harm shall come to you but
what I will share. Let us to bed, you are safe for
to-night. The Indians never violate hospitality.
It may be supposed Sybrandt did not sleep very
sweetly that night, though he apprehended no danger
to his slumbers,it was the morrow that he feared:
and when the morrow came he rose early, and
descended into the room they had occupied the
night before. The stranger and the Indians were
already there, the former dressed in a superb suit of
British uniform, with glittering epaulettes on either
shoulder. Round the room were displayed various
articles most irresistible to the Indian fancy, and which
they eyed with looks of eager longing, interrupted
only for a moment by a glance of malignant meaning
Vol. I.F
at Sybrandt as he entered. After a pause of some
minutes, the chief addressed the stranger as follows:
My father, your son had a dream last night.
Ay? said the stranger, smiling, what was it
my son?
Your son, replied the chief, with great gravity,
your son dreamed that the Great Spirit appeared
to him, and told him his good father had made him a
present of his fine suit, and given each of his people
six new blankets. Did the Great Spirit speak the
truth? or will my father make him a liar?
The stranger paused a moment. The Great
Spirit said true; the suit and the blankets shall be
given. But, my son, I also had a dream last night.
The Great White Spirit came to my bedside, and said
in a whisper, Thy son, the chief of the Beaver tribe,
has forgiven the young trader by whose hand
Paskingoe
fell. He has given him to you, to do with
him what thou wilt. Did the Great White Spirit
speak true?
The chief looked at his companions, and they at
him, in doubt and perplexity.
I had forgotten, resumed the stranger; the
Great White Spirit said also, the mother of
Paskingoe
has dried up her tears, and his wife ceased her
groans, ever since you gave them the beautiful beads
and the necklaces of pinchbeck. Did he say true,
or did the Great White Spirit lie?
Again the Indians exchanged significant glances,
and then uttered that guttural sound by which they
are accustomed to signify their approbation.
My father, at length said the chief, you dream
too hard for your son. But you have not made our
Great Spirit lie, neither will I make yours. The
young serpent is free; but let him take care how
he comes among us again. Even my father shall
not dream him out of the fire.
The bargain was consummated; the Indians
departed
with their finery, and Sybrandt was free. As
they disappeared in the forest, old Tjerck, who had
watched the result of the embassy with deep
solicitude
,
quavered the war-whoop of the Adirondocks in
triumph. An arrow from some unseen bow at the
instant whizzed past his ear, and put a stop to his
exultation. He however preserved the arrow all his
life afterward, making it the text of a most excellent
tale, which was as little like that we have just related
as the description of most landscapes is to the
original.
The stranger explained to Sybrandt the preceding
colloquy, which had passed in the Mohawk language;
and our hero insisted upon repaying him the price of
his liberty. But this he would by no means consent
to, saying the loss was not his, as the government
supplied
the means of conciliating the Indians by such
presents as might be necessary.
F2
CHAPTER XIV.
The Stranger undertakes the reformation of our Hero.
Sybrandt
remained with the stranger, whose
character
and mode of life he admired more and more
every day. Of the thousand little peevish trammels of
civilized life, which, like the invisible ropes and pegs
of the Lilliputians, keep the mighty Gulliver, man,
bound to the earth, or, albeit, chained within a
certain
routine of prescriptive restraints, none were found
in the establishment of the stranger but those of the
simplest form. There was every thing necessary to
the gratification of a wholesome appetite, sound sleep,
and rural exercise. There were none of those
fretting
and factitious wants which, under the disguise
of domestic comforts or embellishments, make
human
beings, that call themselves enlightened, the
slaves of that wealth they acquire by the sacrifice of
health, pleasure, and liberty. An air of happy
freedom
from restraint reigned every where around; and
though every thing seemed to arrange itself into an
easy regularity, it was without effort, without noise,
and without the slightest appearance of coercion or
authority. The Indian wife had always a smile on
her face; the children, freed from the
soul-harrowing
,
soul-subduing surveillance of eternal nursing and
restraint, gambolled about, the happiest of all God's
creatures, and spent those days which Nature has
allotted as the period when her offspring shall be free
from chains, in all the luxury of playful hilarity. In
short, Sybrandt could not help observing, that while
there appeared to be no restraint, there was, at the
same time, a perfect decorum, an unstudied decency,
which answered all the ends of the most fashionable
fastidiousness.
Every day when the weather permitted, and
indeed
often when a dandy sportsman would have
shrunk from the war of the elements, they pursued
the manly, exciting sport of hunting. The image of
war, most especially in this empire of savages and
beasts of preythis course of life gradually awakened
the sleeping energies of Sybrandt's nature, that had
been so long dozing under the scholastic rubbish of
the good Dominie Stettinius, of whose hapless fate
he as yet remained ignorant. He acquired an
active
vigour of body, together with a quickness of
perception and keen attention to what was
passing
before him, that by degrees encroached deeply
on his habit of indolent abstraction. He caught
from the stranger something of his fearless,
independent
carriage, lofty bearing, and impatience of
idleness or inaction. In short, he acquired a
confidence
in himself, a self-possession, and self-respect,
such as he had never felt before, and which freed
him from the leaden fetters of that awkward
restraint
which had hitherto been the bane of his life.
Still, however, the cure was not complete; the
disease
had been deep-seated, and occasional relapses
indicated pretty clearly that a return to old scenes
and modes of life would assuredly produce a return
of the old infirmity.
One stormy day, when the wind blew such a
gale as made it dangerous to pursue their daily
sport, the stranger found Sybrandt buried in the
confused rubbish of what is known among the
simple ones as a brown study, but which among the
better sort is dignified with the more lofty epithet of
abstraction.
Westbrook, said he, with his usual brief
frankness
,
the time we have spent together, and the
circumstances under which we met, ought to have
made us friends by this time. It seems to me
that you are getting homesick. If so, say so. You
can leave me here as factor for your merchandise,
and I pledge myself to render you a true account of
the proceeds, the first good opportunity that occurs.
How say you, am I right?
Sybrandt was actually thinking of home, but not
with that strange, inexplicable feeling which sickens
us of a paradise, and makes us turn with tears of
bitter longing to the barren sands or arid
mountains
consecrated to memory under the name of
home. He had but few, very few pleasurable
recollections
stored there, and these were buried under
a thousand self-inflicted pangs of self-love and
mortification
.
He replied to the stranger in a tone of
bitter depression:
I was, indeed, thinking of home; but I have no
wish to go there just now.
Were you not happy there?
Not very.
Whose fault was that?
Sybrandt paused, and a few moments of rapid
retrospection convinced him how difficult it was to
answer this simple question.
I don't know, at length he said; sometimes
I think my own, sometimes the fault of others.
Westbrook, said the stranger, kindly, did you
ever hear the story of the king who was playing at
tennis in the midst of his courtiers?
I don't recollect, replied he, somewhat surprised.
Well, I will tell it you. A dispute arose about
some point of the game the king was playing, on
which a large bet depended. The king appealed to
his courtiers. They were silent. At length one
of his gray-headed ministers came into the
tennis-court
,
and on hearing these doubts, `Sire,' said he,
`you are wrong.' `What,' said the king, `do you
pronounce me in the wrong without knowing any
thing of the matter?' `Pardon me, sire,' said the
other, `if you had been right, these gentlemen (
turning
to the courtiers) would not have doubted.' This
story will apply to all the actions of man. His
self-love and his passions are his courtiers, and
whenever they are doubtful or silent as to the
question
of who is to blame, you may depend upon it
he is decidedly wrong. If there was any room for
doubt, his courtiers would not hesitate a moment to
decide in his favour.
Strange as it may appear, Sybrandt had never
viewed the matter in this light before, nor asked
himself the question of who was to blame for the
anguish of mind which, in truth, he had wilfully
inflicted
on himself. Dominie Stettinius was a good
and a learned man, but no philosopher. He had
never yet arrived at the conclusion, that learning
and wisdom, although actually man and wife, were
an arrant fashionable couple, and not always seen
together.
Come, said the stranger, after permitting him
to cogitate a reasonable time on his storyCome,
I have a curiosity, no idle one, to know something
more of a young man who I cannot but see is
capable
of acting, yet seems to be prone to think to
no purpose. I have long since told you my story,
now tell me yours. I see your mind is diseased
sicklyout of tune. Let me know the nature of
the disease, and my life on it, I cure you.
I believe I have nothing to tell. My story has
no action; and without action even an epic poem
is dull, replied the youth, forcing a melancholy
smile to his aid.
Never mind; I entreat you to tell it. I think
I comprehend the case from the very
acknowledgment
you have just made. Your history, as I
suspect
,
wants action.
Thus solicited, Sybrandt at length overcame his
shyness, and gave the detail of his causeless
miseries
.
As he went on, the stranger sometimes smiled,
and at others shook his head. Strange, said he, at
length, when the young man had concluded his
singular
confession, strange that a man should pass
his whole life in coining false miseries, which have
no being except in his wayward imagination! Young
man, I feel an interest in you. There is that about
you which I love and respect, let me find it where I
will. I have seen you twice placed in circumstances
to try the nerves of the stoutest, facing death
without
winking an eye, and suffering pain without
changing a muscle. Such men I acknowledge for my
fellow-creaturesmy equals. And yet, added he,
smiling, after a momentary pause, and yet you who
stood before a band of drunken savages, with their
tomahawks and scalping-knives raised to take your
life,you, who did not even so much as change
countenance
during a discussion which was to decide
whether
you were to be given up to be tortured at the stake;
why you cannot face a woman with whom you have
associated, with little intermission, from childhood!
You tremble at the idea of entering the parlour of an
honest country gentleman, and that gentleman your
uncle! You can face death in all its forms of
horror
,
but you cannot face a laugh, or even endure the
mere abstract idea of a laugh conjured up by your
own diseased fancy!
The face and forehead of Sybrandt gradually
kindled with alternate flushes of pride and shame,
as the stranger proceeded. There was certainly
more honey than gall in his speech, but our youth
had long been in the habit of turning from the sweet
to banquet on the bitter; and the old idea of being
laughed at recurring in full force, caused his heart to
swell and his forehead to moisten with the dew of
strong agonized feeling. He remained dumbfounded,
and if his life had depended upon it, could not have
uttered one word.
Did you ever, continued the stranger, in a tone
of banterdid you ever, in all your classic lore, come
across a hero, or even a person of tolerable
reputation
,
ashamed or afraid to face his equals, setting aside
his superiors? The modesty we read of there, as
an object of imitation to youth and age, is nothing
more than that dignified self-consciousness which
never asserts its claims to honours or rewards, but
leaves the world to meto them out according to its
own sense of obligation. They never thought of
praising, or of holding up for imitation, that boyish
and unmanly infirmity miscalled modesty, which
bespeaks
an internal consciousness of weakness or
degradation
,
which makes men for ever ridiculous in their
own eyes, even when not so in the eyes of others,
and is the eternal, insurmountable obstacle to great
actions. There is a glorious effrontery about
conscious
genius, which causes it to undertake and
accomplish
objects which, to timid, bashful cowards
appear beyond the reach of human power.
F 3
The word coward grated harshly on Sybrandt's
ear, and was appropriated at once to himself by
that mental process through which he was
accustomed
to distil every thing into gall and wormwood.
The stranger saw the workings of his mind, and
went on:
Nor is the folly of such timid shrinking
girlishness
in man less contemptible than its cowardice.
It is right, therefore, that he should be laughed at for
the one, and despised for the other.
Sybrandt could stand it no longer. He started
from his seat, without feeling one spark of
awkwardness
or timidity in his whole composition.
Is this language intended for me, sir? because,
if so, it cancels all obligation on my part. If I am
not a man with women, you will find me so with
men. No man shall say, or insinuate, that I am a fool
or a coward. Did you or did you not apply these
epithets to me?
As much as falls to your share in your own
honest
consciousness, no more, replied the other, with
a most provoking indifference. Sybrandt surveyed
him leisurely from top to toe, with an eye of
unflinching
defiance.
Farewell, sir, for the present. I am your guest,
and you are my benefactor. I would have been
grateful to the end of my life for the kindness of your
hospitality, and the favour of your example; but
you have left me nothing now but regrets that I ever
accepted the one, or benefited by the other.
Farewell
,
sir. Judge of the extent of my gratitude by my
forgiveness of the insult you have just passed upon
me. So far the debt is cancelled. Take care, I
entreat you, how you run up a new score.
He was proceeding to quit the house immediately,
when he was arrested by a hearty laugh from the
stranger.
Bravo! good! I honour you, Mr. Westbrook.
You have spoken like a high-spirited, honourable
gentleman. From my soul I reverence a man of
courage. It is not without reason that courage is
held the basis of all the virtues, since without it we
may be driven from our best resolves by
apprehension
of the consequences. Without the courage to
despise threats, dangers, death, no man can depend
on his other virtues for a single moment. And yet
it seems to me that all education tends to pave the
way for making cowards of us. The nurse begins
by frightening children with stories of ghosts and
hobgoblins, and making them afraid to stir in the
dark; and the priest ends by frightening the man
with horrible pictures of the agonies of death and
the torments of futurity. By heaven! it is a matter
of surprise to me that all civilized men are not
arrant
poltroons! But why, added he, after a pause,
why not act and speak at all times, and every where,
with the same manly, free spirit you have just
displayed
?
With such a face, such a figure, such a
heart and mind, who is it that breathes or ever
breathed the breath of life, be it man or woman, you
need be afraid or ashamed to look full in the eye?
Forgive me for thus trying you, or rather for
affording
you an opportunity of proving to yourself what
you really are. No one that has seen you as I have
done, in situations to try the nerves of any man,
would ever dream of your being less than
consummately
brave; and no one that has conversed with
you as I have done, and heard you, day after
day, uttering the language of learning and good
sense, would suspect you of folly, except he were
himself a fool! On my soul, what I said was but
to aid you to know thyselfthe most useful of all
lessons to man. Hereafter, when you feel yourself
shrinking from the encounter of a lady's eye, or a
puppy's glance of ridicule, recollect that you have
bearded the lion, called Sir William Johnson, in his
den, and never fear the face of man or woman from
henceforward. Are we friends again?
Sybrandt grasped the hand of Sir William in
silence, and the incident of that day exercised an
influence over his future fortunes greater, perhaps,
than all the precepts of the worthy Dominie
Stettinius
or the illustrious examples of classic lore.
The force of habit being once mastered, the
leaden fetters by which his genius had so long been
held in bondage seemed to have lost their power,
and from this time his deportment became every day
more free and manly, his conversation more frank
and racy. In short, he seemed about to verify the
great truth, that, as by yielding to one temptation
we prepare the way for submission to another, so
an obstacle once surmounted is ever afterward
more easily overcome.
CHAPTER XV.
Our Hero takes his departure.
There
was a careless frankness about Sir
William
that invited confidence and inspired
imitation
.
Add to this, he contrived every day to draw
Sybrandt out, to make him aware of his own
resources of intellect and knowledge, and animate
his consciousness by giving him the post of honour,
that is to say fatigue and danger, in all their forest
adventures. He saw that his future happiness, as
well as future fortunes, depended on his mind being
forced out of its perverted course by excitement,
action, and applause. He tried hard to make a
man of him, for he saw that Sybrandt was likely to
repay the trouble of the lessons he received.
The time now arrived when the meeting of the
Mohawk chiefs to hold long talks and receive
presents
was to take place. The relation in which
Sir William stood to the Indians was peculiar to
these early settlements; when the savages, being
numerous and warlike, were able to turn the scale
between the mighty French governors of Canada
and the puissant governors of New-York. It was
therefore necessary to conciliate them in the first
place by presents, and to fortify their influence by
working indirectly on their secret consciousness of
the superior power or superior wisdom of the white
people. Perhaps the gentleman of whom we are
now speaking exercised in his day a greater
personal
influence over these wild and wayward sons
of the forest, than any other white man that ever
existed. It was not so much as the representative
of the great king over the water that they respected
and obeyed him. It was his frankness, integrity,
and truth; but it was still more his courage, his
vigour, and his superiority in hunting, in war, in
action and endurance, in every thing which
constitutes
the pride and glory of savages, that made these
people look up to him with unqualified respect and
admiration. he stood alone among them, out of
the protection of the laws of civilization and far from
the reach of succour; yet he never suffered wrong
or violence from these wild warriors, who might
enter his house at midnight without knocking and
without creating either fear or suspicion. It has
often occurred to me that such a man, if any man
or any means are adequate to the purpose, might,
by voluntarily settling among our Indians, do much
to wean them by degrees from their present mode
of life. I do not mean that he should go there to
receive the emoluments of office, or the profits of
trade, or, least of all, as a means of living on the
charitable contributions of others; but that he should
identify himself with thembecome one of their
hunters, warriors, sages, and mingle by degrees
those feelings and habits of civilized life not
incompatible
with their present situation, with their
ancient modes of living. It might be a question,
whether the white man would become most of an
Indian, or the Indian most of a white man; but all
history indicates to us, that the ancient world was
retrieved from barbarism by the agency of a few
men of superior genius, or superior opportunities of
acquiring that knowledge and those habits necessary
to civilization. But enough of this.
Sybrandt wondered to see the majestic grace and
self-possession, mingled with respectful courtesy,
exhibited by these untutored savages. They
presented
an example of manly independence in
deportment
and language, from which he derived a lesson
for his own future conduct. It was curious to see
how near they came to the perfection of high
breeding
,
such as is now established as the standard of
excessive refinement. They neither stared at
objects
to which they were unaccustomed, nor did they
for a moment betray either surprise, curiosity, or
inferiority
.
Careless in the glances they cast around,
easy in their deportment, graceful in their actions,
there was about them an indifference approaching
almost to contempt, far more natural and graceful
than that assumed as the characteristic of superior
rank in the circles of the great. I am no
enthusiast
of Indian character or Indian manners; but
this much I will say before I conclude this
digression
,that
the most graceful, most dignified
presentation
I ever witnessed was that of the Osage chiefs
to our late worthy and ill-rewarded chief
magistrate
,
James Monroe. They certainly put the stiff
embroidery of the ambassadors, and the smirking,
simpering, seamstresslike, uneasy consequence of the
attachs quite in the background. Sybrandt learned
some lessons in relation to manner and deportment
from the Kings of the woods, that he could hardly
have acquired even from a first-rate
dancing-master
.
It is not my purpose to record the acts and
negotiations
of Sir William and the council of chiefs.
Still less shall I attempt a sketch of their
respective
orations, which, though they were not so
lengthy
as some we have heard, were very much to the
purpose. The National Intelligencer, I presume,
is regularly perused by most of my readers, and
whoever digests that paper will never want to see
or hear another speech as long as he lives; that is
to say, if he is a reasonable person.
The departure of the chiefs was speedily followed
by that of our hero, who accompanied a courier
despatched by Sir William to New-York with an
account of the result of the great council.
I am sorry to lose your society, said Sir
William
;
I shall feel its loss this winter. But action
actionaction, as the great orator said; action is
the life of lifethe vivifying spirit of all nature.
When I find myself getting low I shall dash into
the woods, and the sight of a deer shall console
me for the loss of my friend. Farewell. I hope
we shall meet again.
Do not doubt it, said Sybrandt, if you do not
come to me, I will one day, if I live, come to you.
But you will some time or other visit Albany, and
then you shall see
Catalina? said the other, archly. Well, a fair
lady is worth a far visit, and I think I will come to
your wedding, if you will give me due notice; that is
to say, if you ever muster courage to look that young
lady in the face, who is, I dare say, ten times more
uglyI beg pardonmore formidable, than the
one-eyed
Paskingoe.
Sybrandt coloured, and felt some of his old
feelings
crawling over him; but he repressed them by a
mighty effort, and replied with assumed ease:
I promise to ask you to my wedding, but my
funeral
will probably come first, and I will bid you to that.
What! a relapse! I thought I had performed a
radical cure. Then assuming an earnest
solemnity
,
he went on, Westbrook, remember, now that
you are going among old scenes and old associations,
that you guard against a return of old feelings,
weaknesses
,
and self-delusions. Are you not a man
an upright, brave, and intellectual man? Do I not
know that your heart is pure, and your intellect
unclouded
?
that you are by family, education, and
character a fit associate, an equal to any man, or
any woman either, that you are likely to encounter?
Why then, in the name of that heaven I know you dare
look in the facewhy should you falter, and lose
your self-possession both of mind and body in the
presence of any man or woman, or any number of
men and women? Think of this. Remember what
I now say, when we are distant from each other; and
rely upon it, that if Catalina is worth the winning,
you will win her if you dare. Deference is what is
due to every woman, and what every woman likes;
but if I know the sex, they are such admirers of
courage, that they can never be brought to love a
man that
fears
even them. Now God be with you,
Sybrandt, and so farewell!
CHAPTER XVI.
Showing that old Scenes revive old Habits.
They
parted each with regret, and as Sybrandt
proceeded on his journey, he tried to persuade himself
he was all, on might be all, Sir William had described.
But certain misgivings and sinkings of the soul, as
he turned his thoughts towards home, and began to
anticipate his reception from his friends, warned him
that he must look well to himself and nerve his heart,
or he might again sink into what honest Bunyan calls
the slough of Despond, and never rise again.
The little party, consisting of Sybrandt, old Tjerck,
and the courier, proceeded to the banks of the
Mohawk
river, where they embarked in a canoe for
Schenectady, then the frontier town of all the
western
settlements of this goodly State, of which it now
constitutes one of the antiquities. Not a house, not
a vestige of cultivated life adorned the banks of the
stream, yet still all was beautiful; for what is more
lovely than the union of crystal waters, verdant
meadows, waving forests, and azure skiesthe
combination
and the master-work of the great Creator!
There were men alive not many years ago, who still
remembered what the whole country then was, and
whose eyes, though dimmed with age, yet saw what
it had since become. The land itself, and the
owners
of the land, are changed; every animate and
inanimate
objectevery thing living, and every thing
deadall changed! The red man is gone, and the
white man is in his place. Such are the mutations
of the world! Shall we lament them? No. It is
the will and the work of Him that made all, governs
all, disposes all; and it is all for the best, or chance
is Providence, and Providence is chance.
They arrived without accident at Schenectady,
which, though partly rebuilt, still exhibited deep and
melancholy traces of the deplorable massacre and
conflagration of 1689, when the French and Indians
surprised the inhabitants in their beds, and set fire
to their habitations. It was a cruel butchery of men,
women, and children, which, according to custom,
was laid to the charge of the Indians, whom it is
impossible
to restrain at such times. But what right
have civilized men to complain of the excesses of
savages, whom they associate with them as allies;
whose passions they first stimulate, and then pretend
to control? Yet in the midst of these horrors a ray
of humanity breaks out from the darkness of
unlimited
massacre. A gentleman of the name of Glen
resided with his family a little way above
Schenectady
,
on the rich flats on the opposite side of the
river, where his house is, or was lately, standing, and
in possession of his descendants. He had at times
interposed his good offices in favour of the French
prisoners taken by the Mohawks, and the French
now remembered his kindness. They spared his
home, and restored all his relatives to liberty.
As Sybrandt approached nearer towards home, he
began to feel in anticipation certain decided
symptoms
of his old disease. He caught himself studying
how he should act, and what he should say to his
cousin
,
instead of relying on the circumstances of the
moment
to direct his conduct. He worked himself up
into a worry of doubt, embarrassment, and
apprehension
;
he again suffered the tortures of the sly
laughing eye of Catalina, and actually shuddered at
the thought of how awkwardly he should behave
himself. In short, by the time they came to Albany,
he had forgot the manly remonstrances of Sir
William
,
and instead of the joys of a speedy reunion
with his friends, felt only the fears of their anticipated
ridicule.
He arrived at Albany to dinner, and lingered
some time afterward in that strange indecision which
is characteristic of his state of mind. At length old
Tjerck got out of all patience, and by his ill-humour
brought his young master to a decision. As they
approached the sober and venerable mansion-house,
and saw at a distance its old gray walls, half-hid by
towering elms, with chimneys pointing to the skies,
Sybrandt actually trembled with conflicting emotions.
Had it been possible, he would have passed on to
the abode of his benefactor without stopping. But
his only road lay directly before the mansion-house,
and to pass it would be both absurd and disrespectful.
It was now just after sunset, and honest Ariel was
walking on the long piazza, which looked towards the
river, with Catalina. The scene was lovely and
quiet beyond description, and something had carried
the thoughts of Catalina to the absence of Sybrandt.
I think it happened to be the anniversary of the day he
had saved her life.
I wonder, said she, at length, what has become
or cousin Sybrandt? Is it not time that he should be
home? and is it not strange no one has heard of him,
uncle?
Poor fellow! said the good-natured Ariel, to
be sure it is. I don't wonder at not hearing from him,
for you know the mail don't travel in the wilderness.
But he ought to have been home some months ago.
I am sadly afraid something has happened to him.
He was such an awkward fellow: he never could
do any thing handy or clever. I never could teach
him to ring a pig's nose, for the life of me.
Yet he was brave as a lion, said the other,
musing. What day of the month is this, uncle?
The twenty-sixth of May.
True, the very day. And again she mused.
I should not be surprised, said Ariel, after a
pause, if he was either murdered, or a prisoner to
the Indians.
God forbid! exclaimed Catalina, lifting up her
hands, and clasping them together; God forbid my
dear cousin Sybrandt should come to any harm!
Aha! quoth Ariel, what would the colonel
say if he heard this?dear cousin Sybrandt!
He has no right to say any thing, and if he did
I would not care. But who is that coming yonder?
Where, said little Ariel, standing on tiptoe.
Yonder, on the Albany roadtwo persons on
horseback.
It must be the colonel and his man. He has
been to Albany to-day.
No, it is
not
the colonel, said Catalina, and she
looked still more intently on the travellers, whose
figures were rendered somewhat indistinct in the
twilight
now gathering round. They approached the
gate which led into the woody avenue winding up to
the mansion, and one of them dismounted to open it.
Who
can
it be? cried Catalina, while a gentle
heaving of her bosom and a little shortness of breath
marked a more than ordinary interest in the question.
In a few minutes the persons on horseback emerged
from the woody glen, through which the road wound
its way, at a little distance from the mansion, where
they could be more distinctly seen from the piazza.
One of them seems to have a black face,
observed
Ariel.
If it should be old Tjerck! exclaimed the young
damsel, eagerly.
No, no, replied the other, despondingly, I fear
we shall never see either him or his young master
again; and his good heart overflowed to his eyes.
By this time the horsemen had dismounted in the
dusky evening, and approached the piazza.
Who can it be? thought Catalina, while a
presentiment
fluttered about her heart. Sybrandt had
distinguished a female on the piazza as he
approached
,
and a thrill of mingled pleasure and
apprehension
came over him. He had rode at such a slow,
lingering pace, that old Tjerck muttered to himself,
Icod, if young massa been hunting a bear, he make
more hurry dan to see Miss Catalina!
Ariel received the young man with shouts of joy
and innumerable honest shakes of the hand; but
Catalina
,
remembering with what leisure and
deliberation
he had approached to receive her welcome,
repressed
the warm, generous impulses of her heart,
and wrapping herself in the mantle of maidenly pride,
gave him a reception so affectedly flippant and
careless
that he felt it in his innermost soul. His pride
and his feelings were equally wounded, and the
moment
of meeting between these two young people
was the prelude to a thousand after mistakes and
misapprehensions. Sybrandt, after receiving, with
all his old awkwardness and constraint, the kind
congratulations
of the rest of the family, made some
miserable mumbling attempts at an excuse for going
to see his benefactor, and departed with a heart
bursting
with its disappointed dreams, that had been
cherished in secret, and a mind wounded by the
consciousness
of folly, weakness, and inconsistency.
You don't seem glad to get home again, said the
good Dennis, observing that Sybrandt was silent and
abstracted; but I suppose you are tired and sleepy.
Well, go to bed, and to-morrow you shall tell your
story.
Sybrandt retired to bed, but not to that balmy rest
which a tried body and a quiet mind brings with it
evermore. He lay awake, thinking over the past,
and blaming his own wayward follies. He recalled
to mind the lessons and the example of Sir William,
and settled the matter a little before daylight, that he
would cast off the chains of the foul fiend that seemed
waiting to resume her empire the moment of his
return
,
and be what he was every where else but to the
woman he most wished to please. Before he was up
in the morning, he heard the cheerful voice of Ariel
calling upon him to come forth and eat his breakfast,
and tell his story, and go over to the mansion-house,
to see him hive the bees, that he pronounced to be
on the eve of emigrating, from the commotion he
observed
among them the day before.
Accordingly, after breakfast, they rode over to the
mansion-house, where Sybrandt behaved himself
better
,
and was received more to his liking, than the
night before; for Catalina had schooled herself, and
softened herself too, by recollecting she had treated
him thus unkindly on the anniversary of the day he
had saved her from drowning. Catalina inquired the
cause of his long absence, and even condescended to
say she felt great uneasiness lest he should have
been murdered, or taken captive by the hostile
Indians
and carried into Canada. This sentiment,
kindly and unaffectedly uttered, warmed the heart of
Sybrandt into a degree of confidence, and he related
the history of his trading voyage with a truth and
simplicity
which gave it additional interest. There is
nothing throws greater dignity about a man, and more
contributes to make him an object of interest, than
encountering and overcoming dangers and sufferings.
The tenderness, the love of glory, and the
admiration
for courage, which are inherent in the female
heart, are ever excited and called forth by the
recital
of perils or the detail of courageous daring.
Every woman is in this respect a Desdemona, and
Catalina was certainly a woman, for she was now
eighteen. The moment she heard the history of
the adventure of the fishing-house, and the escape
from the deputation of the Mohawk chiefs, Sybrandt
gained a new interest in her eyes, by being thus
associated
with danger and death. Under the
influence
of these feelings, she treated him with a gentle
and frank kindness, which placed him on good terms
with himself, and gave an ease and freedom to his
deportment that made Catalina one day observe,
with a smile, that he had certainly met with a
dancing-master in the woods.
But what has become of your admirer, Colonel
Sydenham? asked Sybrandt, with no small
trepidation
,
after finishing his adventures.
O, he is gone, said she, slightly blushing. His
regiment was ordered to Fort George, on the lake,
not long after you left us.
Sybrandt was pleased with the information, but
he did not like the blush. His old enemies played
about him for a moment, but he whipped them away,
and compelled himself to ask other questions, which
by degrees led to a detail of all that had happened in
his absence. During this period, which was only a
few months, a great revolution had taken place,
which I shall proceed to record with all due fidelity.
CHAPTER XVII.
An irruption of wandering Arabs, and a swarming of Bees.
I have
before noticed the inroads made upon the
virtuous simplicity of the rural populace among
whom is laid the scene of this history. Not
content
with a variety of innovations, the officers at
length committed the enormity of introducing
private
theatricals. They corrupted an honest
Dutchman
of the neighborhood to hire them his barn, which
was fitted up as a theatre, and in which they
performed
plays three times a week, to the utter
dismay
of the good Dominie Stettinius, who justly saw
in this pestilent innovation the seeds of mischief to
his hitherto simple and innocent flock. The young
people were attracted by these outlandish shows,
and late hours, family feuds, nightly elopements,
and sometimes something worse, were the
consequences
.
The good and pious dominie sighed and
fretted at these melancholy symptoms of approaching
corruption of manners, and raised his voice from the
pulpit every Sabbath-day against the theatre and its
consequences to his beloved people, over whom he had
watched for almost half a century. But the torrent
was too strong for the good man to put back or turn
from its course; for such is the sad weakness of
human nature, that the best security for its innocence
is to keep it ignorant of the very existence of guilt.
Both manners and morals seem every where at the
Vol. I.G
mercy of strangers and innovatorsof fashions
rather than opinions.
But, as if this were not enough, about the period
in which the seductions of the barn theatre began
to infect the morals and habits of the young people,
and their consequences to appear in the indications
I have just recited, a famous new-light preacher
made his appearance among them, and roused the
very echoes with a strain of fervid and impassioned
eloquence, which created a sect that seems one day
destined to extend itself to every climate and every
country of the habitable world. The sober,
practical
,
and rational doctrines and exhortations of the
good dominie, though clothed in the language and
embellished with the eloquence and grace of a
scholar, faded into nothing compared with the
trumpet
voice, violent gesture, and furious declamation
of the new apostle. His fold, especially the
precious
young lambs that had grown up under his eye,
and whom he loved, began to stray away; his flock
every Sabbath showed the absence of some one that
was never absent before; and many an empty seat
gave token of the backsliding of some inexperienced
soul, lured away from the gentle lustre of his pure
lamp of truth by the flaring, fiery tail of this erratic
meteor.
And still another evil came to beset and confound
the good man, and complete the wicked trio. A
member of the wandering tribe of American Arabs
came among and seduced the wayward affections
of the daughter and heiress of his ancient and
nearest neighbour, honest Yof Vandervelden. He
taught certain practices then exceeding rife in the
region whence he came; and the short and the long
of it was, the worthy man found himself under the
necessity of making a sacrifice of his dislike, to the
honour of the family. He soon afterward died, and
Ananias Gookin, as the wandering Arab was called,
took possession of the estate in right of his wife.
Then were the honest Dutchmen astonished,
confounded
,
and dismayed at the innovations and
improvements
of Ananias. He altered his house, he
altered his barn, he altered his fences, and he altered
every thing. When he had done altering, and
exhausted
all his ingenuity, he began to pull down,
and, finally, one day abducted the old Dutch
weathercock
,
which was brought from Holland, and had
pointed due north upon the top of the mansion of
the worthy Vandervelden far back as the memory
of man could reach.
The dominie groaned in spirit, and his firmness
forsook him, especially when a day or two
afterward
a whole wagon load of Squire Gookin's
cousins
came over to pass a week with him. Before
that week expired, they had so confounded the good
man with guessing and asking questions, that one
night, after being penned in a corner of one of his
own fields for upwards of three hours by a couple
of these terrible guessers, who pointed out a
hundred
improvements in his modest, comfortable glebe,
and expressed an intention of opening a school to
teach all the children English, the good dominie
left his flock to be devoured by the wolves, and
never returned. He had heard of the arrival of a
Dutch ship at New-York, whither he bent his way
sorrowing, and whence he embarked for his native
honest Holland to return no more. He left a letter
with his blessing and advice to Sybrandt, accompanied
by a fine folio copy of the works of Hugo Grotius,
in token of his affectionate remembrance. Honest
G 2
soul! the simplicity of religion and manners which
he advocated and exemplified during his whole life,
have, we doubt, been illy exchanged for the cant
of enthusiasm in the one, and boasted refinements
in the other.
These details, which proved mutually interesting,
were at length interrupted by a confused and
triumphant
medley of sounds and voices that made them
both start in dismay. They ran into the garden,
whence the noise proceeded, to see what was the
matter, where they found Ariel at the head of all
the household troops, man, woman, and child, black,
white, and gray. He was furiously beating a
frying-pan, accompanied by all the others, each of
whom had contrived to reinforce his music by some
rare contrivance of his own. Here stood old
Nauntje, the cook, jingling a great bunch of keys;
and there our old friend Tjerck, who had been
summoned
by Ariel for the occasion, beating a tin kettle
with an old rusty ramrod, while the little imps of
the kitchen exaggerated the terrible discord by
mustering a most singular variety of incongruous
discords. Over all was heard the shrill voice of
Ariel, scolding, directing, restraining, and
aggravating
his familiars as occasion seemed to require.
A little condensed black cloud appeared hovering
ever their heads, and sailing about in different
directions
among the trees, to which all their
attention
seemed to be directed. As it inclined to
approach
or recede, the concert became weaker or
louder, while eager anxiety and expectation sat on the
faces of all. More than once Ariel denounced the
imperial Nauntje as an old fool, for jingling her
keys too loud; and many a time did Nauntje retort,
by declaring Massa Ariel would scare the
creatures
into the woods, by the vehemence with which
he cudgelled his frying-pan. At length the little
wayward community, after enjoying a while their
emancipation from the domination of the
mother-hive
,
all at once darted down and settled themselves
upon the broad-brimmed hat of honest Ariel; being
thereunto incited either by one of the female caprices
of the queen bee, or by a fine carnation pink stuck
in the hatband.
Consternation and dismay followed this
unaccountable
manuvre; the music ceased, and Ariel
stood still for once in his life, with a whole nation
quartered on his beaver. It was impossible to
resist
an inclination to laugh at the oddity of the
adventure
,
but in truth it was no laughing matter. Of
all the populace of this world, the bees are the most
capricious; there are some people they will permit
to handle them with impunity, while they will dart
at others with indescribable fury the moment they
approach them. I have seen a swarm of young
bees taken up by handfuls and put into the new
hive, without any symptoms of hostility, by a
person
who either possessed some secret power, or to
whom they were attracted by some unaccountable
affinity. Such a man was old Tjerck, who now
came cautiously forward with a new straw hive,
which he held directly over the head of Ariel,
desiring
him at the same time to stand still for his
life. Poor Ariel was the last man in the world to
stand still, or to hold his tongue; but on this
occasion
he played the statue to a miracle. There never
was a finer figure than Ariel with the great beehive
for a hat, except a fine lady of the year 1831 in a
fashionable Parisian bonnet. While the bees were
consulting in mysterious hummings about the
expediency
of removing, and some of them were
reconnoitring
about his ears, apparently with an
intent
to make a lodgment there, the little man stood
fidgetting, first lifting one leg then the other,
hitching
his shoulders, and making divers other gestures
indicative of dire impatience. At length he could
stand it no longer, and roared out
You bloody old fool, do you think I am going
to stand still here all day? And thereupon the
whole swarm took flight and disappeared across the
river, whether alarmed at the noise, or from some
sudden caprice of her majesty the queen bee.
Deredere he go; now massa Ariel got him,
exclaimed Tjerck, in the bitterness of his heart.
I glad of it.
And so am I, said Ariel; they may go to the
dl for me. I wouldn't have stood still three
minutes longer for as many beehives as could stand
between here and Jericho.
No, grumbled Tjerck, in an under-tone; massa
Ariel nebber tand till, sept when he sleeping in
church.
Huh! said old Nauntje; massa Ariel don't
know no more about bees dan a bull's foot.
Ariel swore there was not a man in the province
understood hiving bees better; but they all gave it
against him, and declared with one voice that the loss
of the young swarm was entirely owing to his not
standing still and holding his tongue. Upon this
he denounced them as a pack of fools, and
departed
in wrath, determined not to stay to dinner.
In passing the kitchen, however, his natural instinct
prompted him to look in, and the sight of a fine
roasting pig, with a skin as white as that of a
fashionable belle after a winter's campaign, disarmed
him in a moment. He hovered round the hallowed
precincts of the kitchen till the return of queen
Nauntje, to whom he gave sundry directions about
roasting the pig, concluding by a solemn injunction
to put plenty of summer savory in the stuffing.
Dinner passed off pleasantly, and Sybrandt was
delighted to find that he drank wine with Catalina
without its going down the wrong way; nay, that
he could actually cut up a pig when everybody
was looking at him, without falling into an agony.
In the evening they strolled out upon the lawn, and
stood on the low green banks of the gliding river,
watching the passing vessels as they slipped along;
listening to the melodies of lowing herds, tinkling
bells, loud rural laughs, and all the combination of
sweet peaceful sounds, wafted across the little river
in the delicious quiet of a long summer twilight.
Sybrandt gradually became inspired by the scene
and the occasion; and unlocking, by involuntary
degrees, the stores of his mind, and giving wings to
the dormant vigour of his imagination, delighted,
instructed
,
and almost astonished Catalina with the
inspirations of his new-born intellect.
While thus engaged, they saw one of the little
black boys come running towards them in great
haste, as if something was the matter at home.
When he came up all he could say was to beg
Sybrandt
to speed to the house, for Hans Pipe, the
Indian, was there very drunk. Accordingly
Sybrandt
hastened away as fast as possible, leaving
Catalina to return at leisure.
CHAPTER XVIII.
A civilized Savage.
Hans Pipe
, as he was called by the country
people around, was an Indian of the Algonquin
nation, which had been almost exterminated by the
Mohawks in a war that happened many years before
the period at which we are now arrived. A large
portion of their warriors was cut off, and the
remnant
of the nation obliged to emigrate into Canada,
where they were received and protected by the
governor-general. Hans, whose Indian name was
Minikoue, or I drink, justified this appellation, for
he even exceeded his fellows in the Indian devotion
to fire-water. He had been taken prisoner by the
Mohawks, and rescued from torture by the influence
of Colonel Vancour, who endeavoured to teach him
the habits and manners of civilized life, and to
attach
him to his family by kindness and protection.
But the usual melancholy consequences resulted
from these kind and benevolent intentions. The
Indian, in proportion as he lost the habits of the
savage, acquired the vices of the civilized man,
sharpened to a keener edge by the wild vigour of
barbarism and the early absence of the habit of
self-restraint. His natural cunning was quickened
by the acquirement of some of the practices of the
white man; and his natural passions, such as
cruelty
,
revenge, and the love of drinking, strengthened,
the first two by an infinite series of mortifications,
insults, perhaps injuries, received from the white
people among whom he sojourned, the latter by
facility in the means of gratification.
There are certain plants, and fruits, and flowers
that grow wild in the forest, which improve by being
transplanted to the garden and cultivated with care;
there are others that shoot forth in the rank and
worthless luxuriance of weeds; and there are others
that perish under the fostering hand of the most skilful
gardener. There are birds and quadrupeds that may
be tamed, and others which retain rank traces of their
native wildness to the last. So does it seem to be
with the race of man. As the Indian orator once
said to President Monroe, The white man is born
for the sunshine, the red man for the shade. The
white man, the black man, and the man of every
colour but the red, may be tamed, and improve by
taming. He alone seems, indeed, born for the
woods; it is there the virtues he possesses can alone
be exercised to the benefit of himself and his tribe.
Place him in the sunshine, in the haunts of social
and civilized life,and sad is the experience, and
woful the truthhe becomes, ninety-nine times in a
hundred, the worst, the most mischievous of
mongrels
;
a compound of the ferocity of the savage,
and the cunning, deceit, and sensuality of the
civilized
scoundrel.
So it happened with Hans Pipe. He became a
drunkard and a vagabond; and was finally turned
away from Colonel Vancour's house, for having drawn
his knife upon one of the black children, who refused
to bring him another mug of cider. He was too lazy
to work except at trifling jobs, for which he asked
nothing but liquor, and to which nothing but liquor
G 3
could incite him. His days were spent in
drunkenness
and beastly exhibitions of savage indecencies,
and his nights consumed in prowling about thieving,
or in barns or outhouses, sleeping away the effects
of his daily debauch. Sometimes, but very rarely,
he would come to the mansion-house, where he was
sober, and beg for food or clothing, which was never
refused him. Perhaps a more worthless, dangerous
and revengeful being never crawled upon the earth,
than this wretched outcast of the savage and
civilized
world. His appearance was horrible and
appalling
.
His long, lank, raven hair hung about his
shoulders, and almost covered his low forehead;
his high cheek-bones, flattened nose, wide nostrils,
and still wider mouth, together with his miserable
garments and dirty habits, made the heart shudder
to look upon him. But it was his eyehis bitter,
malignant, bloodshot eye, circled with the flaming
ring of habitual intemperance, within which rolled
the ball of fire, that gave the most unequivocal
indications
of the fiend which kept the citadel of his heart.
It discoursed of murder, open or secret, at midnight
or midday; of a vengeance which a moment might
light up, and years would not extinguish; of secret
plots and open daring.
It happened that there was no man about the
house, or within call, when Hans Pipe came into the
kitchen brutally intoxicated, and, as usual in that
situation, insolent and ungovernable. Colonel
Vancour
had rode out after dinner on a visit of business;
the labourers had not yet returned from the fields,
and Ariel had sallied forth to expatiate on the
delights
of the roasted pig to his neighbour Mynheer
Frelinghuysen. Sybrandt found the miserable,
degraded
being brandishing his club, and vociferating
for more liquor with all his might. He was enraged
into that sort of half-wilful madness which
drunkenness
often produces, and which is not so much the
absence of reason, as of a disposition to obey its
dictates. The little black boys were cowering in
corners, afraid to run away, and even the
redoubtable
Aunt Nauntje shrunk from asserting her
authority
in her own peculiar dominion.
Sybrandt at first tried to soothe Captain Pipe, as
he called himself, into something like good-humour,
in hopes he would go away peaceably. But the
captain had lost all control of himself, or did not
choose to exert it, and answered our hero with brutal
threats against the whole household unless his
wishes were complied with. As the discussion went
on he became so indecently abusive, that Madam
Vancour and Catalina, whose apprehensions had
called them to the spot, were glad to retire out of
hearing. Sybrandt became angry, and at length,
finding the captain proceeding to force open a
cupboard
where he expected to find liquor, he seized
him by the shoulders and jerked him back with such
force as to send him reeling to the other extremity
of the kitchen. The fury of the madman redoubled.
He seemed all at once to become steady, and
advancing
quickly towards Sybrandt, who had no
weapon
in his hand, he dealt him a blow with his heavy
walking-stick, which, had it taken full effect, would
have disabled him effectually. Fortunately,
Sybrandt
,
though taken by surprise, preserved his head
by a quick motion on one side; but it fell on his left
shoulder with a force that made him reel. The
little black boys cried out with all their force; old
Nauntje sallied forth as fast as her limbs could carry
her, to call for help, and Catalina, uttering a piercing
shriek, flew into the house for the colonel's sword,
with which she returned in a minute.
But the contest was over before she arrived.
Captain
Pipe, perceiving his antagonist partly disabled
by the blow he had given, and having become
infuriated
with rage, was now a perfect savage, reckless
of every thing but vengeance, and panting for blood.
He drew the long knife which he always wore about
him since he was cast off by the colonel, and
flourishing
it in the air with a shrill demoniac shout, he
made a mortal lunge at the heart of our hero, whose
only defence was his eye and his right arm, the
former of which he kept keenly and steadily fixed
on the motions of the captain. The blow was well
aimed, but the activity and coolness of Sybrandt
enabled him to avert it by darting on one side. The
knife passed through his clothes just under the left
arm, and at the instant the young man closed with
the savage, holding him so tightly that he could not
readily extricate his weapon. A momentary yet
desperate struggle ensued, which ended in Sybrandt's
tripping up the heels of his adversary, and at the
same moment throwing him backwards with such
force that he fell upon one of the great andirons in
the chimney, and lay senseless. The knife
remained
clenched in his hand; but his eyes were
closed, and the blood flowed in torrents from the
back of his head.
At this moment Catalina returned with the sword,
which she conjured Sybrandt to accept. The
wretch is not dead, said she; I see the motion of
his breathing. He is only practising one of his
savage arts upon you. Dear Sybrandt, take the
sword; andanddo not kill him, but stand on
your defence. The youth long remembered the
dear Sybrandt, and so did the Indian, who, as
Catalina had shrewdly suspected, was only playing
the opossum, as the phrase is in rare old Virginia;
that is, only making believe he was insensible. He
intended to watch his opportunity, the moment he
recovered a little, to jump up and accomplish the
destruction of his victim. But the gift of the sword
and the caution of Catalina defeated his intention,
and engendered in his malignant heart a feeling of
intense and bitter vengeance, that afterward more
than once put the life of that young lady in
imminent
peril.
The adventure ended in the arrival of some of the
neighbours, whom the cries of Aunt Nauntje had
brought to her aid, and the depositing of Captain
Pipe in prison, where he expiated his violence by a
confinement of several months. Here he had full
leisure to brood over his revenge, and lay his plans
for its gratification. When the period of his
imprisonment
expired, he adopted an entire new mode
of life. He became perfectly temperate, docile,
and industrious. By degrees he gained the pity
and good-will of the neighbourhood, got plenty of
work, and saved every penny of his wages.
Colonel
Vancour and his family pitied, forgave, and
encouraged
him, not only by employment, but by
various little presents of money and clothes. Among
the rest Catalina, although she always shuddered
at his approach, presented him with a Bible, which
he was constantly found poring over in his hours of
leisure; for he had been taught to read while under
the patronage of Colonel Vancour. He constantly
attended church, and became a communicant, to the
great delight of many pious, well-meaning people,
who viewed him as a brand rescued from the fire.
But old Tjerck, who had once been a prisoner in
his youth among the Indians, shook his wise gray
head, and often said, He no good Christiannot
he. I see de debbil Indian in he eye yet. When
Indian most good, den he going to be most worst.
I know him; he like de panterhe most quiet
when he jist going to jump. But a white prophet
has little honour in his own country, much less a
black one.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Additional Traits of the civilized Savage.
When
Captain Pipe had saved money enough
for the purpose, he one day went to Albany, and
bought him a handsome musket to shoot ducks with,
as he said. From this time his industry flagged
not a little, and he passed much of his time in the
woods along the river, and sometimes nobody knew
where he was gone or what was his object. His
object, his sole object was revenge. He hated
Colonel Vancour, because he himself had forfeited
his protection by his base ingratitude; he hated
Sybrandt
,
for having wounded and conquered him; and,
above all, he hated Catalina, for having robbed him
of one of the sweetest moments of revenge, by
cautioning
Sybrandt against his wiles, and furnishing
him with a weapon to defeat them. Finally, he
knew that he could consummate his revenge on all
three, by taking the life of Catalina. This he
purposed
to do the first safe opportunity, and then flee
into Canada to the remnant of his tribe. For this
purpose, the moment he had got the musket, which
was safer than his knife, by enabling him to
commit
the crime unseen, he set about his purpose with
the patience, and cunning, and perseverance which
savages are known to exercise in the prosecution
of their revenge. But still, whatever may be the
intensity of the Indian desire for vengeance, it is in
some measure a point of honour to achieve it at the
least possible risk to himself. In all their
undertakings
,
the savages never wantonly or
unnecessarily
trifle with their own safety. They die bravely
but they seldom seek death.
Wherever Catalina went he kept her in his eye,
hovering and lounging at a distance, apparently
taking no notice of her, but intent on his game. In
the daytime he was prowling about the deep glen
we have described as once a favourite resort of
Sybrandt, in hopes the young lady might chance to
pay it a visit; and at night he was on the watch
about the mansion-house, like a hungry wolf
thirsting
for the blood of his victim. The barking of the
dogs often excited the notice of the household, who
believed it was occasioned by the maraudings of
wild beasts, which at that time were no uncommon
visiters. On one or two occasions a watch was set;
but nothing was discovered, for a more watchful,
wary enemy was watching them.
One dark, cloudy night, in the sultry month
of August, Catalina was sitting at her window,
which opened towards a copse of bushes and vines
that had been suffered to grow up in a state of
wild luxuriance, for the purpose of sheltering a
hundred
little birds, that sung and built their nests, and
raised their young in safety among the tangled
branches. It had rained early in the evening,
leaving
a dark, heavy sky, loaded with vapours, and a
sweltering heat in the air, that disposed both mind
and body to indolent relaxation. Swarms of little
fireflies flitted gayly among the grass and foliage,
illuminating the dark obscurity; and at far distance,
the lazy lightnings flashed dimly at intervals upon
the bosom of the dun, moveless clouds. Finding
the light in her room attracted a vast variety of the
wandering insects of the night, Catalina removed
it into a little closet adjoining, and seating herself
again at the window, indulged a long glance at
the past, a long and anxious look into the future.
For some time past the hearts of Sybrandt and
Catalina had been quietly and imperceptibly
drawing
nearer to each other. As they were more
together
,
the former gradually overcame his shy
awkwardness, and that propensity to create
mortifications
to himself which had been the bane of his
early life. Having no one to excite jealousy, and
no fear of ridicule before his eyes, his heart and his
intellects gradually budded, blossomed, and
expanded
into full maturity. The riches of knowledge
which had hitherto lain buried amid the rubbish of
awkward rusticity, the sprightly good-humour and
spirit which had been repressed by Sybrandt's great
talents for inflicting self-torment, now began to come
forth in rich profusion, exhibiting a brighter polish
every day in the soft collision with the purer metal
of a sprightly, cultivated female mind. He was
fast becoming what nature had intended him, an
object of interest and consideration to all around
him; and the star of woman was gradually leading
him to the haven of happiness as well as distinction.
How much my cousin Sybrandt improves every
day, thought Catalina, as she sat at the open
window
,
and sighed to the silence of night and darkness.
The family, all but her, had now retired to repose,
when suddenly a loud growling of the dogs awoke
her from her revery. At the same instant she
thought she distinguished something or somebody
crouching about the little copsewood. In another
instant she distinctly heard something like the shutting
of a penknife, and saw a number of sparks of fire
flash in the obscurity whence the sound seemed
to proceed. The young lady started, and was
reflecting
a moment what this could mean, when the
same sound, the same flashing of sparks of fire
occurred
,
followed by a hissing sound, and a blue
flame rising apparently out of the earth. The dogs
now began to bark most furiously, and Catalina,
shutting
her window, soon reposed her chaste and lovely
limbs between the snowy virgin sheets, not more
white and innocent than herself. She pondered for
a while on the odd things she had witnessed; but
soon the vision of a tall, dark-eyed youth, with teeth
whiter than her own fair bosom, or all Afric's ivory,
flitted before her half-sleeping, half-waking fancy,
and closing her bright blue eye with gentle pressure,
prompted her innocent sleep with a thousand
glowing
visions of future happiness.
Some little discussion took place at breakfast
concerning
the uproar among the dogs, and Catalina
mentioned what she had seen. The general
opinion
was that the noise was imaginary or accidental
the sparks nothing more than fireflies, and the
blue flame a will-o'-the-wisp. In a little while the
whole was forgotten, nor would it ever have been
recalled
to their recollection but for a circumstance
which took place not long afterward.
CHAPTER XX.
A Hit and a Miss.
Catalina
, a few days, or rather, as I believe, the
very next day after the appearance of the
will-o'-the-wisp
,
went to Albany on a visit of a week to
one of her friends. It was customary in those days
to make little journeys as well as great ones on
horseback, and Catalina was fond of an exercise in
which she excelled. In returning from this visit
she was caught in a heavy shower, which obliged
her to change her dress, and the maid had placed
the wet garments on an old fashioned high chair,
just before her chamber window, for the purpose of
drying.
What,
you
here! cried Ariel, who had just
entered
through the garden, as usual, that he might
have a chance of reconnoitring the kitchen; you
here!why I'll swear I saw either you or your
ghost sitting at the window as I came in.
Catalina smiled, and explained the cause of his
mistake.
By Jove! cried Ariel, I must get your woman
to dress me up a scarecrow for my cornfield, for I
never saw any thing more natural.
About ten in the evening of that day, as the
whole family, together with Sybrandt and Ariel
the latter, as usual, fast asleep in his chairwere
sitting around the supper-table, they were startled
by the report of a gun close to the rear of the
house, as it seemed, followed by a loud barking of
the dogs. Sybrandt and Ariel ran out of the back
door to see what was the matter, and found the whole
population of the kitchen in great commotion, talking
all together, each one telling what they knew or
imagined
.
One declared that the gun was fired from
the little copsewood, another from behind the
raspberry
bushes, a third from behind the garden fence,
and a fourth was sure he saw a man jump over the
fence immediately after the report of the gun. As
usual in such cases, it was impossible to come at
the truth, and as no harm seemed to have been
done, most people came to the conclusion that none
was intended. On returning to her room, Catalina
found the old high stuffed damask chair on which
her wet garments had been placed to dry, lying on
the floor. It seemed to have been violently
overturned
,
but her maid solemnly declared she had not
been in the room since her mistress left it, and the
whole household declared the same. The mystery
therefore remained unexplained.
The next morning, however, when the maid came
to fold up the dress heretofore described, she was
astonished
to find it perforated with round holes in two
several places.
Lord, young missee! exclaimed she, what
have you done to your riding-habit? it's all full of
holes, I declare! Catalina was puzzled to death.
She tried to recollect where and how it was possible
they could have come there, but nothing occurred to
account for them. In examining the old chair to
see if there was any thing there that might throw
light on the matter, Catalina at length observed a
small hole in the damask, about the size of those in
her riding-habit, into which she ran her taper finger,
and feeling something hard, with some little
difficulty
drew forth a leaden bullet. The maid shrieked,
and the young lady turned pale at the association of
circumstances that instantly presented themselves
to her mind, accompanied by the recollection of the
strange appearances she had witnessed a few nights
before.
The little maid was eagerly running to exhibit
the bullet to Madam Vancour and the colonel, when
Catalina stopped and directed her to remain where
she was. The young lady then sat down and
reflected
on the course it was proper to pursue. She
knew the uneasiness, nay, misery, she would inflict
on her mother especially, by communicating
circumstances
which seemed sufficiently to indicate she
had some secret enemy who sought her life; and
doubted whether any measures that might be adopted
to secure the assassin or protect her in future from
his designs would be effectual. At length Sybrandt
occurred to her, as one who might most secretly
investigate
this affair, and afford her in the mean time
protection as well as advice. Accordingly she
resolved
to communicate the whole affair to him the
first opportunity, enjoining the little maid to silence
at the same time, under penalty of her highest
displeasure
.
The little maid was sadly mortified at
losing the opportunity of telling such a wonderful
story, but being greatly attached to her young
mistress
,
to whom she had been given at the moment
of her birth, she obeyed reluctantly.
Sybrandt came over soon after to inquire if any
new discoveries had been made, for he could not
help cherishing certain vague suspicions that there
must be something more than chance or fancy in the
discharge of the gun, and the appearances observed
by Catalina as heretofore described. Catalina
invited
him to walk in the garden, and there disclosed
all the particulars as recorded in the preceding pages,
up to the discovery of the bullet, which she
exhibited
.
The young man shuddered, while at the
same time his eye flashed fire. He could scarcely
restrain himself from catching Catalina in his arms,
and pressing her to his bosom, as mothers do their
babes when they apprehend the approach of
danger
.
He gazed on her for some moments with the
most intense interest, and then exclaimed:
Dear Catalina! I will protect and defend you
with my life, and all my life!
I know you will, Sybrandt, replied she, with a
full look of more than gratitude. I know you
will, for you have risked it once already for me.
But perhaps, after all, it may be accident, the firing
of this gun.
Sybrandt shook his head. I would not
needlessly
alarm you; but it is plain to me that you
have some secret enemy who is seeking your life.
The appearances you saw that night in the
copsewood
are now clearly explained to my mind. The
click you heard, and described as resembling the
opening or shutting of a penknife, was, I have no
doubt, the cocking of a gun; the sparks were those
of the flint; and the flame, the flashing of the pan.
I recollect it was a damp, wet evening, which
accounts
for the gun missing fire.
The explanation was clear; Catalina felt a
faintness
come over her, and leaned heavily on his arm.
Go on, said she, gasping for breath; go on;
let me know the worst I am to expect.
I will; for it is necessary to your future safety.
No doubt the villain, whoever he is, mistook the
clothes on the back of the chair, which you say was
standing directly before the window, for you, and
and Here the increasing weight of Catalina
arrested
his attention, and looking in her face, he saw
her pale as death. In a moment after her strength
forsook her, and she sank in his arms overpowered
by the sense of past as well as future probable
dangers. Sybrandt placed her softly upon a little
grass terrace, hid from view by a wilderness of
flowering shrubs, and supporting her head on his
bosom, waited in wild perturbation her recovery.
In a little while she opened her eyes, blushed, and
raised herself from his arms.
At length she said, with a languid smile, You
must forgive me, I am but a woman.
And I am but a man, said Sybrandt warmly;
yet here I swear never to rest till I have dragged
this secret villain to light and punishment. And if
you, my dear cousin, will allow me, I here solemnly
devote myself to your safety from this time forward.
When I am not by your side, I will be hovering
around you unseen, watching every being that
approaches
you, or searching every secret corner
where man or beast might conceal himself.
Henceforward
it is the businessthe dutythe painful,
solemn pleasure of my existence to live for your
safety, and, if necessary, to die in your defence. Do
youdo you value me sufficiently to trust me with
the precious charge?
The soft and swelling bosom of Catalina heaved
with emotions of gratitude, confidence, and gentle
tenderness as she looked in his face with glistening
eyes, and answered,
I do value you sufficiently, and I will trust my
cousin. Who else can I trust? I dare not tell the
story of this bullet to my father and mother; for it
would plant thorns in their pillow, and destroy their
happiness. I
must
trust you, added she, with a
smile of languid, tender meaning; and if I were
not obliged to do it, still I believe I
should
trust you.
Dear Catalina! but you know methat is
enough.
Yes, we know each other, I trust, replied she,
with a look of unbounded confidence and affection.
Sybrandt did not take advantage of this moment to
tell a tale of love. There was something too
solemn
and affecting in the circumstances that gave
rise to this interview. The idea of the danger and
death that seemed hovering over her; of the secret
midnight murderer who was besetting her steps
wherever she went, and watching her sleeping and
waking, communicated to her an air of sanctity,
and gave to her glowing beauty, her confiding words,
and tender looks, a holy innocence, which, while it
melted the soul in unutterable tenderness, repressed
every selfish wish and every sensual desire. It
was settled ere they separated, that Catalina should
refrain from going out in future alone, or in the dusk
of the evening, and never show herself at the
window
after dark, until Sybrandt had taken every
measure to investigate this mysterious affair, and
detect the meditating murderer. To this object he
was now about to devote his exclusive attention,
animated by his love, as well as by the hope that,
guided as he should be by a latent suspicion which
had risen up in his mind, he might succeed in the
attempt.
What the dI have you two been doing all this
while in the garden? cried Ariel, who had arrived
during their absence, and looked very knowing as
he asked the question.
Picking flowers, answered Catalina, blushing
and then turning pale.
Picking a quarrel, I should rather suppose, by
your looks, and then he began to banter them a
little; but seeing the pain it gave them both, he was
too good-natured to pursue the amusement. Honest
Ariel never uttered a maxim in his life, but he acted
upon a very good one, to wit, never to carry jesting
to the verge of malignity, as many people do. When
he saw he gave pain, he desisted in a moment.
Perhaps he might have been a little influenced in
his self-denial on this occasion by a sly retort of
Catalina, who, in reply to an assertion that he
overheard
their whisperings, observed, with some of her
wonted arch significance, that it was only the
humming
of the bees.
Sybrandt soon after took his leave, declining an
invitation from Ariel to go and see the great ox the
good man visited every day, and on whose fat sirloin
he banqueted in glorious anticipation. The young
man pursued his way homeward in deep meditation,
of a mingled character of pleasure and pain. The
delight of having, as he could not but hope, gained
an interest in the heart of Catalina thrilled through
his frame. Yet the cup was dashed with black and
bitter ingredients. The treasure which he hoped
one day to make his own was in danger of being
torn from him by some unseen and unknown hand,
against which it behooved him to guard with
sleepless
vigilance. The dark idea of death mingled
with the bright visions of hope, and gave a
character
of deep, intense solemnity to his love. His
anticipations seemed like flowers blooming on the
verge of the grave, and the grim spectre of mortality
stalked hand in hand with the smiling cherubs Love
and Hope. Out of these conflicting feelings arose,
however, a fixed determination to devote his time,
his talents, and his life, if necessary, to the great
purpose which now took possession of his whole
soul.
H
CHAPTER XXI.
A trial of Skill.
In
casting about among the rural population of the
neighbourhood, there was but one person on whom
Sybrandt could fasten the slightest suspicion, and
that was Captain Pipe. He knew the persevering
spirit of revenge which animates the sons of the
forest, and the patience with which they watch and
wait the moment of attaining their object. He
remembered
the bitter resentment he had expressed
at being discarded by Colonel Vancour, and recalled
to mind the look of keen, deep malignity he had cast
on Catalina, as they were carrying him to prison
the day of the affray at the mansion-house. He
knew that an Indian never forgives. His sudden
change after his release from prisonhis apparent
piety, industry, and sobriety, and the circumstance
of the purchase of the gunall arose in succession
to the recollection of Sybrandt, and seemed to indicate
some deep settled purpose in the mind of the Indian.
There was no one else he could suspect, for the
character
of the neighbourhood was that of sober, quiet
simplicity
,
and no strangers had been known to visit it
for a long time past. The result of these reflections
was a determination to watch the motions of
Captain
Pipe from that time forward, and, if possible, to
do so without exciting his suspicions.
His first step was to tempt him to remain under
his eye, by offering him high wages in the employ of
H 2
Mr. Dennis Vancour. Accordingly he sought him
out for the purpose, and the Indian acceded to his
proposal without any apparent suspicion of his real
object. He came the next day; and that day, and
every other day, Sybrandt, under various pretences,
took care to have him perpetually under his eye,
avoiding every appearance of design. The Indian
had his eye on him, also, and though he discovered
no indications of being aware of this perpetual
supervision
,
his own cunning conscious heart whispered
a suspicion that redoubled his watchful self-command.
What have you done with your musket,
captain
?
said Sybrandt, one day, suddenly; and fixing
his eye upon him, he fancied he could detect a slight
start as the Indian caught the question. It was,
however, so almost imperceptible that it might have
been mere fancy.
I left it at home, said he.
Why so? there is plenty of game about this
house, as well as at Colonel Vancour's.
I never heard there was much game about the
colonel's.
O, plenty! fine shooting, especially in the night.
The birds sometimes sit in the windows to be
shot at.
The Indian, who was at that moment stooping
down, turned an upward glance of scorn at Sybrandt.
I am no foolthe Indian's game does not sit in
the windows.
Why not? suppose you were to see a beautiful
deer, standing looking out at a window at night,
would you not be tempted to shoot it?
Maybe I might, said the captain, gruffly.
But if your gun was to miss fire on account of
the damps, or the deer was to turn out only a sham,
what would you do then, captain? said Sybrandt,
affecting to be in jest.
I'd look sharper another time.
Sybrandt fancied he was probing the Indian
without
his suspecting it, but he understood the allegory
perfectly, and only wrapped himself up the more
closely in the impenetrable folds of savage
hypocrisy
.
He never went out of sight of the house
during the day, and though Sybrandt took every
means for the purpose, he could never ascertain that
he was absent at night. On one occasion he rode
out, taking care to say in the hearing of the
captain
that he was going to Albany, and should not
return till the morrow. He then actually went to
the city, from whence he returned after midnight,
leaving his horse in a field at a considerable
distance
.
He found that the captain had not left the
house, nor did he leave it that night.
By degrees he appeared to relax his
watchfulness
,
for the purpose of throwing the captain off
his guard. He left him frequently, but it was only
to visit Catalina, who always received him with a
gentle melancholy welcome, that went straight to
his heart. You come so seldom now; but I know
the reason, and thank you, would she say. It was
evident that she laboured under a deep feeling of
oppression. There was no longer any elasticity of
spirits, and the roses of her cheek gradually
changed to lilies. Sybrandt's heart would almost
burst with sorrowful tenderness when he saw how
she suffered, under the sad consciousness that the
arrow of death was pointed at her bosom, she knew
not when or by whom, and that every moment
might be her last. An inexpressible tenderness, a
solemn sympathy, a union of feelings partaking of
time and eternity, grew up between them; and their
affections became almost as pure as those of the
fabled spirits with which the imagination has peopled
the region of the skies.
But the caution of the savage never slept for a
moment; and, so far as any one knew, he never
availed himself of the absence of Sybrandt to
neglect
his employment, and leave the house, except
for a few moments at a time. Still suspicion
lingered
in the mind of Sybrandt, and when, finally,
the captain had finished his work, and there was no
longer any pretext for retaining him, he relaxed not
his vigilance, but continued to keep a wary eye upon
him wherever he went. There are no people in the
world, perhaps, so cunning and suspicious, so expert
in surprising and so difficult to be surprised, as the
sons of the forest. Continually at war, either with
their neighbours or with the wild beasts, they are
for ever under the necessity of perpetual
watchfulness
.
A thousand appearances and indications that
escape the notice of civilized men, convey lessons
of caution and experience to the savage: like the
tracks in the forest, which the white man cannot see,
they are visible to the Indian, and serve either as
guides to pursue or warnings to avoid an enemy.
Thus, notwithstanding all the care Sybrandt took
to disguise his system of espionage, the wary instinct
of Captain Pipe very soon taught him that he was
suspected and watched.
One day, not many days after the period of
quitting
his employment at Mr. Dennis Vancour's, he
came over to the mansion-house, and announced
his intention of quitting that part of the country,
and spending the rest of his days among the
remnant
of his countrymen in Canada. You
prevented
my being burned by the Mohawks, said he
to Colonel Vancour; you saved my life, but you
turned me out of doors. The Indian never forgets.
The colonel gave him a variety of little presents that
would be useful among his countrymen, telling him
at the same time to remember what he owed to the
white men, and be their friend whenever it was in
his power.
The Indian never forgetsor forgives, replied
the captain, pronouncing the latter part of the
sentence
to himself, and grating his teeth. Colonel
Vancour was not deceived. He said in his heart,
That fellow is the enemy of me and mine; thank
God, he is going away for ever.
CHAPTER XXII.
Our Hero loses his character for morals and gallantry.
The
next day the miserable cabin which the
captain
had built for himself was found shut up and
deserted. The Indian had been seen at daylight,
with his gun and his pack, wending his course to the
northward, as was supposed, on his way to Canada.
His departure freed Catalina from the load of cares,
fears, and anxieties which had oppressed her for
months past. This depression of Catalina, and the
total cessation of her rural rides and rambles had
affected
the health of that young lady, and attracted the
notice of her parents. They frequently questioned
her on the cause, but she either denied the effect,
or passed the subject off with evasions, which only
excited increased anxiety as well as curiosity. They
continued to urge her in vain to resume her usual
amusements and exercises, until now that being
freed in a great measure from her apprehensions of
Captain Pipe, she soon gathered courage and spirits
to smile and be happy again.
It was not so with Sybrandt. He could not
conquer
his suspicions that the captain was lurking
somewhere in the woods not far off. He had traced
him about three miles on the road towards the north,
and there lost sight of him; nor could he find, by
the most minute inquiries, that he had been seen on
any other road leading from the neighbourhood.
But he thought it would be cruel to mention these
suspicions to Catalina. He contented himself with
being with her wherever she went, and
perambulating
about the mansion-house the better part of
every night. Honest Dennis took him to task more
than once for the nightly dissipations in which it
was suspected he now indulged, and Sybrandt had
the painful mortification of seeing that he was daily
offending his benefactor almost past forgiveness. The
news of his having become such a rake soon spread
abroad; for what secret was ever kept in a country
neighbourhood? It reached the mansion-house, with
divers handsome additions, such as that of gambling,
drinking, and seduction. The colonel and Madam
Vancour began to behave coolly towards him;
Catalina
only reproached him with her looks and
increasing
paleness. She withdrew herself gradually
from his society, and seldom came into the room
when he happened to be on a visit.
Sybrandt was half-distracted with perplexing
anguish
.
He asked of himself whether he should
poison the happiness of Catalina and her parents,
by telling them the cause of his nocturnal rambles
from home; or leave the poor girl in ignorance and
unprotected; or sacrifice himself, his character, and
his happiness. It is better that she should believe
me a sot and a profligate, thought he, than to
wither and fade, as she did before, in the nightly
apprehension of being murdered. If there must be
a victim, it shall be myself. He continued his
course of watchfulness, and by degrees the
supposed
irregularities of his conduct banished him
from the society of her he most loved on earth.
Catalina refused any longer to see him, and now
seldom went abroad, except once in a great while
to Albany with her mother.
Observing the increasing paleness and
depression
of spirits in their daughter, the colonel and
Madam Vancour, after consulting together, and
combining various circumstances, finally agreed in
the suspicion that Catalina was attached to her
cousin, whose ill-conduct had occasioned her
unhappiness
.
In that case each agreed it was best to
separate the young people for some time; and
accordingly
it was resolved to accept an invitation
from a near relative of Catalina, to come and spend
the winter with her in New-York. The sooner
the better, said the colonel; it is now late in
autumn, and I will take her to town immediately.
The proposal was made to Catalina, who offered
no objections, and the preparations were soon made.
It was not customary to travel with so many trunks
and bandboxes as young ladies do in these days.
The next time Sybrandt called at the
mansion-house
with a message from his benefactor,
Catalina
said to herself she would see him once, only
once, before she went away for so many months.
I owe him for a life which he has rendered of little
worth; but I will see him once more, said she to
herself.
She went down stairs, where she found Sybrandt
alone. The old people had gone out to pay a
morning visit. Sybrandt started at the alteration a
few weeks had produced in Catalina, and she shrunk
at his hollow cheeks and sunken eyes. It is
remorse
and dissipation, thought she. Rallying the
pride and dignity of virtuous woman, she, however,
addressed him with a frank kindness that went to
his heart.
I am going, said she, to spend the winter in
New-York. We set out the day after to-morrow.
Thank God! thank God! exclaimed Sybrandt,
with clasped hands.
Indignation swelled at the heart of the young
lady at this ungallant, nay, insulting exclamation.
A sudden paleness was instantly succeeded by a
flush of rosy red, and a flash of her bright blue eye.
This too passed away, and a paleness still more
deadly succeeded.
At length she rallied again. So you are glad
I am going, she said, with a languid smile.
O yes, rejoiced beyond measure.
Indeed! said she; the tears gathering in her
eyes. Indeedyouyoubut I cannot help
admiring
your frankness. I see you are no hypocrite
now
at least.
Sybrandt all at once recollected himself, and
coloured at the sudden perception of the apparent
rudeness of his conduct.
Forgive me, dear Catalina. I did not know
what I was saying, or rather I was not conscious at
the moment of the strange appearance my words
would have. Forgive me.
I do; but, added she, swallowing the mingled
bitterness of wounded pride and affection. But
may I ask, cousin Sybrandt, if you really meant
what you said?
I did; but
Enough. Farewell. Since you are so happy,
it is needless for me to wish your happiness. But
I do wish it with all my soul. It will be long before
we meet again. Farewell.
Stay, dear cousin, dear Catalina.
Dear Catalina, said she, with bitter scorn.
Do we thank God when we part with those who
are dear to us? Spare your hypocrisy, sir, and
take my last farewell.
Catalina, before you go I will account for my
conduct. Permit me to see you to-morrow; then
all shall be explained.
All is explained already. I am now satisfied,
quite satisfied; and she moved slowly towards the
door.
You will one day be sorry for this. O, hear
me, I beseech you, now, since I am not to see you
again; and he placed himself between her and the
door.
Let me pass, sir, cried she, passionately. I
say again I want no explanations. Your words
and actions have both been sufficiently expressive
of late. Let me pass.
He obeyed her, bowing lowly and sorrowfully.
At the door she turned full upon him, and,
clasping
her hands, exclaimed with fervour, Thank
God, I
am
going.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The Pipe is broken at last.
Sybrandt
went away in bitterness of heart, but
with a determination, if possible, to see Catalina
once again before she departed, and give her a
full explanation of his late conduct. In the mean
time he did not for a moment relax in his vigilance.
The night turned out dark and blustering; the
frost-bitten leaves fell thick before the damp,
piercing
,
north-east wind, whose shrill moanings mingled
with the dashing of the waves along the pebbly
shores of the river. The young man was on his
watch as usual when the night set in, and as usual
saw nothing to excite suspicion, until about ten
o'clock, when he perceived the window of Catalina's
room raised, and the little black waiting-maid
standing
with a light before it, calling to some one in the
kitchen. Immediately after he fancied he heard a
more than usual stir in the little copsewood, close
by where he stood, and that he could distinguish in
the pauses of the wind the suppressed breathing of
some one near. The darkness was now intense,
and no object could be distinctly seen save those
immediately within the range of the light from the
window. A shadow passing to and fro within the
room showed that some one else was there besides
the little attendant, and his heart beat thick with
agony while it whispered it must be Catalina. The
low breathing still continued, and became quicker
and quicker. Shall I call out to Catalina to beware?
thought he. No: that would only bring her to the
window to see what was the matter. Shall I go
and alarm the house? No: in the interim her life
may be taken.Quick as thought these ideas crossed
his mind, and quick as thought he darted into the
thicket, as he beheld Catalina approach the window
to speak to some one below, and heard a clicking
sound like the cocking of a gun. As he did so he
distinguished a single low exclamation of surprise,
and immediately some one seemed making his way
violently through the branches. Sybrandt followed
the sound as fast as possible, and once or twice
fancied
he saw something moving a little way before
him. But whatever it was it evaded all his
exertions
,
and, favoured by the darkness of the night,
escaped his pursuit. On his return the shutters of
Catalina's room were closed, and believing her safe
for the night, he determined not to alarm the family.
The next day Catalina, unconscious of the
danger
that hovered around her, took a fancy to stroll
to the little rocky dell we have heretofore described
as a favourite resort of Sybrandt, where he was
once accustomed to retire to conjure up spectres of
misery and mortification. In happier times they
had been used to visit it together, and it was
associated
in the mind of Catalina with many hours of
innocent happiness. She wished to see it once
more before she left the country; led by that
attractive
sympathy which for ever draws the heart
towards
scenes of past enjoyment. The morning was
one of the favourite progeny of autumn. The
indications
of the storm the night before had passed away,
and were succeeded by a still, clear morning, a pure
elastic air, that never fails to waken pleasant
feelings
in the heart where they are not asleep for ever.
As she passed onward the blue-bird chirped his
plaintive notes of farewell ere he went to seek the
summer in some more genial climate; the
grasshoppers
,
awakened from the torpor of the chilly
night, were sporting and chirping as gay as ever,
forgetful of the past, and happily careless of the
future; the grass under her feet began to show a
pale and sickly yellowness, and every instant some
portion of the party-coloured robes of the woods
fell whispering to the ground, again to mingle with
the dust which first gave it life and maturity. All
was calm, and beautiful, and touching. It was
beauty smiling in the consciousness of being still
lovely, yet sighing in the certainty that youth is
past; that she has already gained the summit hill
of life, is now descending into the vale, and though
the prospect is still fair to look upon, it is every day
contracting into a single point, beyond which there
is nothing but eternity. The white columns of
smoke ascended straight upwards, uncurled by a
breath of wind, and presenting to the contemplative
mind images of rural happiness here, of pure and
spiritual bliss hereafter. But the feelings of
Catalina
were not in a state to enjoy the touching
beauties
of the scene, or the associations it naturally
inspired
.
She passed onwards in painful musings
until she came to the little quiet solitude, and,
seating
herself, soon became buried in the labyrinth of
her own perplexities and sorrows.
The residence of Mr. Dennis Vancour was on a
little rising ground, which overlooked the extensive
meadows spreading along the river, and commanded
from its porch a view of the mansion-house.
Sybrandt
saw Catalina depart; and the course she
pursued, as well as the whispering consciousness
of his own heart, told him whither she was going.
He turned pale and trembled when he called to
mind the circumstances of the preceding night; and
taking an opposite direction, he hastened to the little
glen, determined to hide himself and watch over her
safety. He arrived at the spot before her, and
concealing himself in the hollow of an immense
oak that nodded on the brink of the high precipice,
waited what might follow. In a few moments
Catalina
made her appearance, and seated herself, as we
have before described, in a recess among the rocks and
trees, just where the bubbling basin at the foot of the
cascade laved at her feet against the mossy stones.
There was something touching and sorrowful in
her attitude and look as she leaned on her hand,
and watched the foaming torrent tumbling down the
precipice. Now is the time to tell her all, thought
Sybrandt, and he forgot his great purpose in coming
thither for a moment. Another moment brought it
back to his remembrance. Here he remained quiet
for somewhat more than half an hour, when he
fancied he saw a pair of eyes glaring behind the thick
evergreens that skirted the rear of the high rocky
precipice
.
He shrunk closer in his covert, and in
another
moment saw a head cautiously protruded
beyond
the bushes. It was that of Captain Pipe.
He saw him look cautiously round in every
direction
;
he saw him lay himself down and crawl on his
belly, dragging his gun after him towards the edge
of the precipice, that he might gain a full view of
his victim below,and he followed him noiselessly,
creeping like a shadow rather than a substance.
At length the Indian raised himself on his knee,
cocked his unerring musket, and carried it to his
cheek. In an instant it was snatched from his grasp,
and in another instant the Indian had grappled it
again. It went off in the struggle, and Catalina,
looking up, saw a sight that recalled all her
tenderness
and all her fears.
Almost on the verge of the precipice stood
Sybrandt
and the active, powerful Indian, struggling for
life, each almost bursting their sinews to force the
other off the brink. Now one, now the other seemed
to have the advantage; now the back of one and
anon of the other was towards her; and then both
seemed to be quivering on the verge of eternity.
In vain she attempted to cry outher voice was lost
in the agony of her fears; in vain she attempted to
climb the steepher limbs refused their office.
Still the deadly struggle continued, and she saw
their quick pantings from the depth below. The
gun had been thrown away in the contest, and now
they wrestled limb to limb, heart to heart. More
than once the Indian attempted to draw his knife,
but Sybrandt gave him such full employment for
both his hands, that he as often failed in his
purpose
.
But the vigour of the youth was now waning
fast, for he had of late become weakened by
watching
and anxiety. The Indian felt the trembling of
his limbs, and heard with savage delight the
increased
quickness of his breathing. He redoubled
his exertions; he grasped him tight in his arms,
lifted him off his feet, and hurried him towards the
verge of the rock. Sybrandt made a desperate
effort; he placed one foot on the rock, and with a
quick motion of the other tripped up the heels of
the Indian. Both fell, with their heads from the
precipice, and their feet actually projecting over its
edge. Sybrandt was uppermost, but this was rather
a disadvantage, for the Indian was enabled by
violent
exertions to edge himself on by degrees, until
both were poised on the extremest verge, and hovered
on the very brink, being determined to perish with
him rather than fail in his purpose. Another
moment
and all had been over, when fortunately
Sybrandt
perceived a little evergreen growing out of
the rock within his reach. He seized hold of it,
and it sustained his grasp. With one hand he held
it fast, with the other he suddenly pushed the Indian
from under him, and he slipped over the precipice, still
grasping the legs of the young man, who now clung
to the shrub with both hands, making efforts to
shake the Indian from his hold. But for some
moments
his exertions were vain, and only served to
exhaust his remaining strength. Feeling himself
gradually relaxing his hold, and every instant
growing
fainter and fainter, he gathered himself to a last
effort. He extricated one of his legs from the grasp
of the Indian, and dashed his foot in his face with such
convulsive violence, that he loosed his hold, and fell
among the pointed rocks which projected out of
the pool below. Catalina heard the splashing of
his body in the water, and not knowing who it was
that had fallen, became insensible. Sybrandt raised
himself slowly and with difficulty, and descended as
fast as possible towards her. She waked in his
arms, and by degrees came to a comprehension of all
that had passed.
Again! at length said she, looking up tenderly,
Again! yet you thanked God I was going away.
Cannot you comprehend the reason
now
, dearest
Catalina? and will you now listen to what you
refused
to hear yesterday?
She cast a shuddering glance at the pool, I
thought I heard a groan. Perhaps the poor
creature
yet lives, and may be saved.
Let him perish! said the youth, indignantly,
O, if you only knew the days and nights of
anxious
misery he has occasioned me!
And me, yet I pity him.
And wish he were alive?
If I were sureif I could be made quite sure
neither of us could possibly ever see him again.
Go, cousin, and see if he is yet alive, but take care!
Sybrandt went and dragged the body from the
pool. It was dreadfully mangled, and apparently
lifeless. Catalina shuddered as she cast one look at it.
Let us go home, said she.
Will you not listen to my explanation now?
You are going away from me to-morrow, and we
may never meet again.
No, dearest Sybrandt. I now see it all. You
knew this wretched being had not left the country.
I did; at least I suspected so from various
circumstances
.
And you were every night on the watch, guarding
me
me
who was accusing you of spending them
in gaming, riot, and seductionyes, seductionfor
such was the story I heard. O, blessed Heaven!
what short-sighted creatures we are! And she
raised her tearful eye to his, as if to ask forgiveness.
Was it not so?
I confess it was.
But why did you not tell me you suspected the
Indian was still lurking about the neighbourhood?
What! and poison all your moments of returning
ease and happiness! No: I thought I could guard
you from the danger, without making you wretched
by knowing it.
And left me to endure suspicions a thousand
times more painful.
Recollect, dear Catalina, I could not anticipate
your suspicions.
True; and your apprehensions for my safety
prompted that ungallant wish, said she, smiling
languidly
,
`Thank God, you are going.'
What else
could
have prompted it, dear love?
And yet, much as I feared for you, I did not know
half the danger. He then related to her the
incidents
of the preceding night. She turned deadly
pale, and remained silent for a few moments.
I recollect I stood at the window more than
four or five minutes, wondering what was the matter
with the dogs. Oncetwicethrice: it is a heavy
debt, and how can I repay it?
By never doubting me again, till I deceive you.
That can never be! exclaimed she, fervently.
And will you, can you love me, and trust me,
dearest Catalina?
I canI will, said she, solemnly; and here,
before the body of that dead wretch, who has expiated
his intended crimes at your hands; in the presence
of that good Being who has preserved me from his
vengeance; by the life and all the hopes here and
hereafter of the life you have three times, perhaps
thrice three times, preserved, I promise to be yours,
and to devote myself to your happiness whenever
you shall ask it of me. I give myself to you by
this kiss, such as no man ever before received from
me, and no other ever will again. I give myself
away for ever! And she kissed his forehead with
her balmy lips.
Blessed, for ever blessed, be this day and this
hour! cried Sybrandt, as he folded her in his arms.
I cannot thank you, dearest, but I am blessed!
and he leaned his head on her shoulder,
overpowered
by the varying emotions and exertions of the
past and present.
You are hurt! screamed Catalina.
'Tis only happinessI am faint with joy; and
again he leaned his head on her panting bosom. A
dreadful shriek from Catalina roused him, and he saw
the ghastly Indian close upon him, covered with blood,
with his arm raised, and grasping his knife. Before
he could take a step to defend himself the blow was
given. The knife entered his bosom, and he staggered
backwards, but did not fall. In a moment Sybrandt
rallied himself, and evading a second blow, closed
with the now exhausted and dying wretch, whom he
dashed to the ground with furious indignation. The
agony of death came upon him, but did not quench
his ruling passion of revenge. With convulsive
agony he repeatedly buried his knife up to the hilt
in the earth, and his last breath expired in a blow.
Poor Catalina, whose mind and body had sunk
under the terrible vicissitudes of the day, during this
momentary struggle sat wringing her hands, almost
unconsciously repeating, Oncetwicethrice
four timesand then his own! What a dear, dear
purchase for a poor girl!
Sybrandt went to her and said, Fear nothing,
dearest love, he is dead.
What, Sybrandt! my preserver? Well, no
matter. I shall be dead too, soon. The Indian will
kill me now my dear preserver is gone.
Revive, dear love; it is the Indian that is dead:
he will never trouble you again.
I cannot believe it, said she, recovering a little;
I saw the knife enter your bosom, yet you do not
bleed. I am sure you must be wounded. Is there
no blood?
Sybrandt opened his bosom to assure her, and
then, for the first time, comprehended the cause of
his escaping unhurt. The point of the Indian's
knife had left its print in the centre of the ducat
which Catalina had given him when he went on his
trading voyage, and a piece of it remained sticking
there.
See Catalina, said he, you have saved my
life, and we are now even. Do you take back the
gift you just now made me?
'Twas Heaven's own doing, she replied; then
casting her eyes on the body of the Indian, she
shuddered, Is he dead; are you certain he is dead?
He is; come, and be sure of it.
No, let us quit this miserable being, and, I was
going to say, miserable place, though I shall love it
as long as I live, andand you love me, whispered
she, soft as the zephyr among the leaves.
That will be for ever! cried Sybrandt, and they
bent their way towards the mansion-house.
CHAPTER XXIV.
A Separation instead of a Union.
The
tale which Catalina had to tell, in
explanation
of her long absence, may easily be imagined.
Thanks and blessings were poured out from the lips
of the good parents. The old gentleman called the
daughter and the nephew into his presence, and
placing her hand in his, solemnly and affectionately
blessed them both as his dear children. You have
thrice saved her life, may she prove a blessing to
yours.
Dn it, said little Arieldn it, Sybrandt,
who would have though it! But come, I want you
to go look at old Frelinghuysen's ox. He is grown
as big as an elephant.
It was not for nothing, thought the silent
Dennis
it
was not for nothing he studied these old
Greeks and Romans. I wish Dominie Stettinius
were here to hear this: and the worthy man felt
proud of his adopted son.
And now it became necessary to settle the
question
whether the visit to New-York should be paid
or not paid. All things were prepared, the vessel
ready, and the lady-cousin in the capital apprized
of her invitation having been accepted. The colonel
thought they had better send an apology, and get
off as well as they could. CatalinaI confess it
with the candour becoming my profession
Catalina
fluttered between her love and her desire of
novelty. What woman could ever yet resist the
temptations of travelling and seeing the world?
She, however, dutifully left it to her parents to decide.
Madam Vancour was a woman, a very excellent
womanyet she was a woman. She did not
exactly
oppose the union of the two cousins, but still
her heart was not in it. Ambition was too strong
for gratitude. Like almost all the American women
of that and indeed every succeeding age, she had
imbibed, from her earliest years, a silly
admiration
of every thing foreign; foreign horses, foreign
dogs, foreign men, and, most especially, foreign
officers. Every thing provincial, as it was called,
she considered as bearing the brand of inferiority in
its forehead. She had, moreover, long cherished a
latent ambition to see Catalina wedded to one of his
majesty's little officials, who assumed vast
consequence
at that timewho tacked honourable to his
name, and bore the arms of some one of the
illustrious
houses who figured in the court calendar, in
the midst of griffins, sphinxes, lions, unicorns,
vultures
,
and naked savages with clubsfit emblems
of the rude plunderers who first adopted these apt
distinctions. The good lady, perhaps
half-unconscious
of her motives, almost hoped that Catalina
would forget her rustic Corydon in the gay scenes
and various sights of the metropolis, and conquer,
and be conquered by, some brilliant aid-de-camp,
perhaps
a baronet, with bloody hand for his crest.
Accordingly it was settled the visit should take place
the next day, as was originally contemplated.
Sybrandt yielded with an aching heart and a bad
grace to what he could not prevent. The busy
fiends and phantoms that beset his earlier days rose
up to his imagination, and flapped their wings, and
whispered gloomy anticipations. She would have
gay admirers, for she was an heiress and a beauty.
She would be distant from her parents, her home,
her fireside, and from all those early associations
with objects of nature, which serve as anchors by
which the heart rides steadily in all the vicissitudes
of wind and tide, and calm and tempest. And then
the cursed red-coats, whispered one malignant
demon, with a diabolical grin; if she resists them,
and the fashion, and the example of every female,
young and old, married and single, she must be more
than woman. Such gloomy, irritating, peevish
thoughts crowded on his heart the next day, as he
accompanied Catalina to the vessel which was to bear
her away; but his pride buried them with its own
hands deep in his bosom.
I shall return with the birds in the spring, said
she, observing his dead silence. You must be
happy, but you must not forget me, and she placed
her snowy hand in his. Sybrandt could scarcely
feel it, 'twas so soft.
Those who are left behind at home never
forget
,
said the youth. All that I see, and all that I
hear, is the same to-day, to-morrow, and the next,
and the next day. How then can I change?
You think, then, there is more danger that
I
should change, said Catalina, with a tender smile.
Such miracles
have
come to pass, replied he,
answering her smile with one of melancholy.
Sybrandt, said she, with solemn emphasis, see,
the river out of which you dragged me when I was
drowning is the same that rolls by the city whither I
am now going. I shall see it every day from my
window. The sun that shines there by day is the
same that yesterday saw you rescue me from
murder; and the same stars that witnessed your
nightly watchings for my safety, stand in the
firmament
there as well as here. The same air, the same
light, the same nature, and the same God, the same
memory, the same heart, will be with me wherever
I go. Be just to me, dear Sybrandt; I cannot, if I
would, forget thee!
The jealous demons fled before this bright
emanation
of truth and virtue, and Sybrandt became
reassured
.
A silent pressure of hands conveyed their
last farewell greetings, and in a few minutes
Sybrandt
was seen standing alone on a green
projecting
point of the river, watching the vessel as it
glided swiftly out of sight. When it was no longer
visible, he turned himself towards home, and the
world seemed to him suddenly changed into
emptiness
and nothing.
END OF VOL. I.